(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Yesterday was a living nightmare.”
“...perri christinaperri October 2 2017 My has many emotions today...”
“Thank you, Tom Petty, for all of the light you brought to the world.”
““you belong somewhere you feel free.” — John Mayer (@JohnMayer) October 2, 2017“Thank you, Tom Petty, for all of the light you brought to the world,” Ed Helms said.”
“I loved Tom Petty and I covered his songs because I wanted know what it felt like to fly.”
“❤️ #RIPTomPetty — Sheryl Crow (@SherylCrow) October 2, 2017“I loved Tom Petty and I covered his songs because I wanted to know what it felt like to fly,” John Mayer wrote.”
“We will miss you.”
“You brought us so much joy, @tompetty.”
“Vegas and now a great music hero has passed.”
“We will miss you.”This is unbearable.”


"Yesterday was a living nightmare."
__ Perri christinaperri October 2, 2017 I have a lot of emotions today... "
"Thank you, Tom Petty, for the light you have brought to the world."
"You belong to a place where you feel free." - John Mayer (@ John Mayer) October 2, 2017 "thank you, Tom Petty, for all the light you have brought to the world," said Ed Helms
"I like Tom Patty. I cover for his songs because I want to know how it feels to fly."
_ _わ_  #Lipton petty Cheryl crow (@ Sheryl Crow) October 2, 2017 "I like Tom Petty, I cover his songs because I want to know how it feels to fly," John Mayer wrote
"We'll miss you."
"You've brought us so much joy, @ tompetty."
"Vegas, now a great music hero has passed away."
"We'll miss you." It's too much to bear



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow...”
“Now On Spotify!”
“The Weight of These Wings will include 24 new songs from Lambert, including her latest single, “Vice.” Give it a listen in the video below.”
“Called The Weight of These Wings, the album will make its debut on November 18th.”
“While Shelton is completely devoted to The Voice right now, Lambert is preparing for the release of a double album.”
“Although Shelton and Lambert were both at the ACM Honors in August, they never encountered one another at the event.”
“The contact confirmed to Gossip Cop that the supposed meeting between Shelton and Lambert is “completely made up.“In addition, Shelton hasn’t even been in Nashville since August, likely due to his commitments for The Voice.”
“A contact close to Shelton and Lambert got in touch with Gossip Cop, a website known for exclusively debunking rumors and falsified reports in the entertainment industry.”
“It turns out the rumors are simply that, rumors.”
“So is there any truth to the rumors?”


"Follow..."
"Spotify now!"
"The weight of these wings will include Lambert's 24 new songs, including her latest single," vice said. "Listen to the video below."
The album, entitled weight of wings, will debut on November 18
"While Sheldon is now fully committed to sound, Lambert is preparing to release a double album."
"Although Sheldon and Lambert both played in the ACM championship in August, they never met in the competition."
The contact confirmed to gossip police that the meeting between Sheldon and Lambert was "totally fictional.". In addition, Sheldon has not even been to Nashville since August, probably because of his commitment to the voice
"A contact close to Sheldon and Lambert contacted gossip cop, a website dedicated to exposing rumors and false reports in the entertainment industry."
"It turns out that rumors are very simple. They are rumors."
"So what is the truth of these rumors?"



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're grown ups, and we're going to take our time and we're going to do things at our own pace."”
“"I've made plenty of mistakes in my past and [...] we're mature now.”
““We have to take our time," she told Good Morning America in June.”
“Between work, family and their relationship, the star doesn't have any complaints — though she realizes it's all about balance.”
“Lopez has said she's "blessed" to be with Rodriguez.”
“MILA KUNIS SAYS SHE WAS TO BLAME FOR 'HORRIBLE' MACAULAY CULKIN BREAKUP: 'I'LL BE THE FIRST TO ADMIT IT'The A-list couple, Lopez’s twin children and Rodriguez’s two young daughters were all in the Bahamas together on Tuesday, People reports.”
“Rodriguez later followed up that post with another gallery, captioned “Birthday girl .”The gallery included several shots of the famous duo together, including an image of them on bicycles.”
“I love you mucho Macha 13.”KARLIE KLOSS AND JOSH KUSHNER ARE ENGAGEDSeveral solo shots of Lopez were included in the mix, as was a photo of a neon sign.”
“For someone who has been about giving everything she has 365 days a year—to our children, our families, the world—I hope today, we can give you all the happiness you deserve.”
“).”The 42-year-old continued, “I see firsthand how that’s changed for Jennifer, and how she’s found joy in sharing with others.”


"When we are all grown up, we should take our time and do things at our own pace."
"I've made a lot of mistakes in the past, and we're mature now."
"We have to take our time," she told Good Morning America in June
"The star has no complaints about work, family and their relationship - even though she realizes it's all about balance."
Lopez said she was lucky to be with Rodriguez
According to people, Mira Kunis said Macaulay Calkin's breakup made her feel "terrible.". "I'll be the first to admit that," she said. The first-rate couple, Lopez's twins and Rodriguez's two young daughters were in the Bahamas on Tuesday
Rodriguez later published the article in another gallery, titled "birthday girl.". There are several famous pictures of the two in the gallery, including a picture of them riding bicycles
Carly Klaus and Josh Kushner are co filming "I love you, Macha 13.". "Several scenes of Lopez's solo" is also included in the mix, as well as a neon photo
"For someone who gives everything 365 days a year to our children, our families and the world - I hope today we can give you all the happiness you deserve."
"I've seen with my own eyes how all this has changed her and how she finds pleasure in sharing," the 42 year old added



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Is he right, or just downright rude?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Rob’s response to Blac trying to rap?”
“We have no idea how good Blac would be at rapping, but we certainly would be interested to hear it, ESPECIALLY if she spills the tea on her split with Rob in a diss track!”
“Perhaps she’s become inspired by her pal Nicki Minaj, who recently rapped about her on the track “Rake It Up,” and even invited her to be in the music video!”
“The reason rumors exploded that Blac would be trying her hand at the rap game is because she was spotted walking into Capital Records with her lawyer, and MTO reports that they offered her a $1 million recording deal.”
“We all remember the cringe-worthy song by Britney Spears’ ex Kevin Federline, “Popozao.” The world doesn’t need a repeat of THAT atrocity.”
“He is actually kind of looking forward to see her fail and thinks she will be even worse than K-Fed.” Yikes!”
““And even if she goes after Rob in her raps he thinks she will be so bad that it won’t matter because she will just be embarrassing herself.”
““Rob has had some major laughs thinking about Blac Chyna trying to rap,” an insider told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Let us know!"
"Is he right, or is he completely rude?"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Rob's reaction to Blake's attempt to rap?"
"We don't know how good Blake will be at rap, but we'll be interested, especially if she spills tea when she breaks up with Rob in diss!"
"Maybe she was inspired by her friend Nicky Minagi, who recently rapped her in the song" rake it up "and even invited her to join a music video!"
"The rumor that blac will try her out in a rap game broke out because she and her lawyer were found walking into capital records, and MTO reported that they offered her a $1 million recording deal."
"We all remember the daunting song of Britney Spears' predecessor, Kevin Federline," popozzo said. "The world doesn't need to do the same thing."
"He's kind of looking forward to seeing her fail, thinking she's going to be worse than the K-Fed." Yikes锛_
"Even if she chases rob in rap, he thinks she'll be bad, that's OK, because she'll only embarrass herself."
"Rob laughed a lot when he thought of Blake ziner trying to rap," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


__ With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Their friendship has blossomed from there.””
““They were practically inseparable at the Vogue party at Annabel’s (nightclub), and again the following night at a Miu Miu fashion party where Rob was trying to be really low key.”
““Rob looked smitten with Mabel and they spent two nights glued to each other,” an insider informs the publication.”
“...end parties together...”
“Try refreshing your browser or Robert Pattinson in new relationship Report Back to video Sources tell The Mirror the alleged lovebirds were practically inseparable during London Fashion Week last month and appeared enamoured with each other as they circulated high...”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“...of musicians Neneh Cherry and Cameron McVey...”
“The Twilight star called an end to his engagement with musician Twigs in October after a three year relationship and it appears he has since moved on with rumours suggesting he now has his eyes set on Mabel the daughter...”
“Article contentActor Robert Pattinson is reportedly getting close to singer Mabel after splitting from Fka Twigs.”


"Their friendship came from this."
"They were almost inseparable at Annabel's (nightclub) fashion party, and the next night, at a Miu Miu fashion party, rob tried to be very low-key."
"Rob seems to be fascinated by Mabel, and they're stuck together for two nights," one insider told the magazine
__ End the party together... "
"Try refreshing your browser or Robert Pattinson's video source in the new romance report. Tell the mirror that during last month's London Fashion Week, the so-called lovers were almost inseparable. When they spread on the Internet, they seemed to be infatuated with each other..."
__ Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
__ Musicians Nina cherry and Cameron McVeigh... "
"The Twilight star announced the end of his engagement to Tevez in October this year after three years of dating with the musician. It seems that there have been rumors since then that he is now looking at his daughter mable..."
"Robert Pattinson is reported to be approaching singer mable after splitting from FKA's twigs."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“They then re-united in 2010 after attending couples’ counseling.”
“Pink and Hart got married in 2006 before splitting in 2008.”
““But now Pink wants Carey to focus on being a parent — or she’ll push him out the door!”Pink showed off her maternal side recently when she spoke about how her daughter was bullied at school during MTV’s Music Video Awards.”
““They partied hard together when they were younger,” added the source.”
“They also have a daughter Willow, 6.”
““She adores Carey, but she wants to lead a more sober and sensible lifestyle now that they’ve got two kids.”The couple – who have publicly admitted to having ups and downs for years – welcomed their baby son Jameson (seven months) last December.”
“A source revealed: “Pink wishes Carey would grow up and take his responsibilities more seriously instead of getting bombed and acting like a big kid,” an insider spilled.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Then they were reunited in 2010 after attending couple counseling."
"Pinker and Hart got married in 2006 and broke up in 2008."
"But now Pinker wants Kelly to focus on parenting - or she'll push him out of the house!"! "Pinker recently showed her mother's side when she talked about her daughter being bullied at school at the MTV music video awards ceremony."
"They reveled together when they were young," the source added
"They also have a daughter, Yang Liu, 6 years old."
"She adores Kelly, but now that they have two children, she wants to live a more sober and rational life." The couple, who have publicly acknowledged years of ups and downs, welcomed their baby son Jameson (seven months) in December
"Pinker wants Carey to take his responsibilities more seriously when he grows up, instead of being bombed like a big kid," a person familiar with the matter said



**Something goes wrong**
“Tell us below!”
“We’re swooning over how cute they are together.”
“Not only has he been giving her ‘so much support’ ahead of her AMAs performance, but he’s also been taking care of her.”
“Here’s how!”
““[Selena Gomez] has been rehearsing like crazy, but she’s still dealing with a lot of nerves ahead of the [American Music Awards].”
“Justin [Bieber]‘s been amazing… he’s giving her so much support, telling her how great she’s going to do.”
“He’s been pumping her up, saying exactly what she needs to hear,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Justin hates seeing Selena stress out.”
“She’s been so busy getting ready for the AMAs, she doesn’t have as much time to take care of herself.”
“Justin worries that she doesn’t eat enough, so the other day when she was in rehearsals, he had her favorite deli in Beverly Hills deliver some soup.”


"Tell us next!"
"We are fascinated by their loveliness together."
"Before AMAS performed, he not only gave her 'so much support', but also took care of her all the time."
"That's it!"
"(Selena Gomez) has been rehearsing wildly, but before [the American Music Awards], she was still dealing with a lot of neurological problems."
"Justin is wonderful He gave her too much support and told her how well she would do
"He's been encouraging her, saying exactly what she needs to hear," a person familiar with the matter told reporters
"Justin hates to see Selena under too much pressure."
"She's busy preparing for AMAS and doesn't have much time to take care of herself."
"Justin was worried that she wasn't eating enough, so when she was rehearsing the other day, he asked her favorite Beverly Hills Deli to deliver some soup."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Due to the gaping 21-year age difference between Gomez and Theroux, it's likely that The Leftovers star and the "Fetish" singer are no more than friends—but in the small world of Hollywood, crazier things have happened.”
“But more recent reporting suggests that the pair are strictly platonic.”
“BACKGRIDLike Gomez, Collins has also been linked to The Leftovers star, with romance rumors following shortly after Theroux and Aniston's public breakup back in February.”
“...and Theroux Petra Collins...”
“In early May the two were spotted together in New York City on a group outing with a whole crew of A list pals including Paul Rudd and his wife Julie Yaeger Rooney Mara and photographer friend to both Gomez...”
“There's certainly truth that Gomez and Theroux have been spending some time together.”
“...between her Theroux and Gomez her former husband of two years and friend respectively...”
“It s all simply speculation no confirmation has come from Gomez Theroux or either of their reps though Life Style s source adds fuel to the gossip by suggesting that Jennifer Aniston is not happy about the rumored love connection...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Because of the 21-year-old age gap between Gomez and Cyrus, the leftover actress and the" fetishist "singer are probably just friends, but in the small world of Hollywood, something more crazy has happened."
"But recent reports show that the two are totally platonic."
"Like Gomez, Collins is also associated with the leftover star. There was a romantic rumor shortly after Cyrus and Aniston broke up in February."
__ And Theroux Petra Collins... "
"In early May, the two were found traveling together in New York City with a group of friends on a list, including Paul Rudd and his wife Julia grunimara and a photographer friend, dugomas..."
"There's no doubt that Gomez and Cyrus have been together for some time."
__ Between her seru and Gomez, she is her two-year ex husband and friend respectively
"It's all speculation. There's no confirmation from Gomez cerux or any of their representatives, although lifestyle sources suggest that Jennifer Aniston is not satisfied with the rumored love relationship, which adds fuel to the rumor..."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pawel's photographs have drawn comparisons with Italian businessman Gianluca Vacchi, 49, who is renowned for his toned physique.”
“He keeps them entertained with photographs of his intense workout routines, which often feature him working out topless or in muscle tanks.”
“Pawel now boasts more than 335,000 followers on Instagram.”
“...his Polish Viking Instagram The model who first started training at 16 had been posting regularly on social media but said it was only when he dyed his hair that he started building up his fan base...”
“Dedicated Before left and after photos reveal how far Pawel has come in his journey Amazed Instagram followers often ask Pawel left before and right after how old he is Social media star Pawel often posts topless workout photos on...”
“Speaking to Polish website Wirtualna Polska, Pawel, who is known online as the 'Polish Viking', explained he first dyed his hair white after he started greying 'years ago' and decided he did not like the salt-and-pepper look.”
“And while many women might balk at the idea of their husbands ageing themselves prematurely, Pawel's glamorous wife Magda is clearly more than happy to be seen with an older man.”
“Pictured, before (left) and afterGlamorous: Pawel often poses for photos with his glamorous wife, Magda, pictured togetherFollowers often comment to ask how old he is and some even think he is in his 60s.”
“Rippling: Pawel Ladziak, from Warsaw, Poland, is only 35 but makes himself look olderTransformation: The personal trainer and model started dyeing his hair when he started going grey and credits his look with his social media success.”
“The personal trainer, who is sometimes mistaken for a pensioner, deliberately ages himself in order to keep up his devoted following on Instagram, believing his unusual look sets him apart from other online stars.”


"Pavel's picture is comparable to Gianluca vacchi, a 49 year old Italian businessman known for his strong physique."
"He entertained them with pictures of him exercising nervously, often naked or in a muscle vest."
"PAWEL now has more than 335000 followers on instagram."
__︹ Instagram, his Polish Viking, a model who started training at the age of 16, often posts on social media, but he says that only when he dyed his hair did he start building his own fan base... "
"Focused front left and back right photos reveal how far PAWEL has gone in his journey. Amazing instagram fans often ask him how old he is. Social media star PAWEL often publishes naked upper body exercise photos online..."
"In an interview with wirtualna Polska, a Polish website, Pavel, who is known as" Polish Viking "on the Internet, explained that he dyed his hair white for the first time after he started to turn white" a few years ago "and decided not to like the salt and pepper."
"While many women may balk at the idea that their husbands are getting older too early, Pavel's charming wife, Magda, clearly prefers to be with an older man."
"Photos, charming in front (left): Pavel often takes pictures with his charming wife Magda. Followers in the photos often comment and ask him how old he is. Some even think he is in his 60s."
"Ripple: PAWEL ladziak in Warsaw, Poland, is only 35 years old, but he has changed his look: when the personal trainer and model started to dye his hair, he began to turn white and attributed his appearance to the success of social media."
"This personal trainer is sometimes mistaken for a pensioner. In order to stay a loyal fan on instagram, he deliberately makes himself old and thinks that his unique appearance makes him different."



**Something goes wrong**
“Would you love to see them tie the knot?”
““Their relationship is going so well right now and they are not thinking of adding anyone to the family that they have now,” a source close to Alex shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“HL found out exclusively!”
“There’s no denying Jennifer Lopez, 48, and Alex Rodriguez, 42, have an adorable relationship — but are they determined to take their love to the next level?”
“While marriage may in fact be in the picture, apparently they’re completely satisfied with the amount of kids they each already have!”
“Jennifer, after all, has 9-year-old twins Max and Emme, and A-Rod is the proud father of daughters Ella, 9, and Natasha, 13.”
“Either way though, Jennifer and Alex’s connection has never been stronger!”
“Click here to see sweet PDA pics of J.Lo & A-Rod.”
““They both love each other’s kids and that is all the extra family they need.” Fair enough, but that apparently doesn’t mean we won’t hear wedding bells in the near future!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Jennifer and Alex SHOULD have more kids?”


"Would you like to see them get married?"
A source close to Alex told reporters: "they have a very good relationship now. They don't want to have another person at home." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"HL found it
"There's no denying that Jennifer Lopez, 48, and Alex Rodriguez, 42, have a lovely relationship - but are they determined to take it to a new level?"
"In fact, marriage may be just around the corner, but obviously they are completely satisfied with the number of children they have already had!"
"After all, Jennifer has 9-year-old twins Max and Amy, and A-Rod is the proud father of 9-year-old Ella and 13-year-old Natasha."
"Anyway, the relationship between Jennifer and Alex has never been as strong as it is now!"
"Click here to see a picture of J.Lo & A-Rod's sweet PDA."
"They all love each other's children, and that's the extra family they need." That's fair, but that obviously doesn't mean we won't hear the wedding bell in the near future! "
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Jennifer and Alex should have more children?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Apparently, Kylie plans on bringing Stormi to as many shows as possible whenever her schedule and Stormi's sleep schedule allows it.”
“...source added...”
“They value their time with her and also know it s important to get time alone so the two plan date nights to dinner or movies or just stay home and have a family member or friend watch her the...”
“"Although they are Kylie and Travis, they have a very normal life when it comes to parenting.”
“If one of the parents are working or tied up in events, then the other will step in and take over or they bring young Stormi to work if possible.”
“Kylie and Travis are both extremely busy but are hands-on parents because they do not want to miss out on anything Stormi does," a source told Entertainment Tonight.”
“"The birth of Stormi has strengthened their bond together as a couple in ways they didn't even realize were possible.”
“Aside from sharing many accomplishments due to them both killing it in their respective fields, they also share a six-month-old daughter, Stormi Webster, and reports say they are doing a great job at parenting despite their busy lifestyle.”
“Kylie Jenner recently graced the cover of Forbes magazine as the youngest self-made billionaire and Travis Scott just dropped off his anticipated Astroworld album that is getting all the love.”


"Obviously, Kelly plans to bring Tommy to as many shows as her schedule and Tommy's sleep schedule allow."
__ Source added
"They cherish their time with her and know that time alone is very important, so they plan to date, have dinner or watch a movie together in the evening, or stay at home and let family or friends see her..."
"Although they are Kelly and Travis, their lives are very normal in terms of parenting."
"If one of the parents is working or tied up in activities, the other will step in and take over, or if possible, they will take little stommie to work."
"Kelly and Travis are very busy, but they're both hands-on parents because they don't want to miss anything that Tommy does," a source told entertainment tonight
"The birth of Tommy strengthened their connection as a couple, and they didn't even realize it was possible."
"In addition to sharing their achievements in their respective fields, they also shared a six-month-old daughter, Tommy Webster. It has been reported that despite their busy lifestyle, they are doing a good job in raising children. "
"Kelly Jenner recently appeared on the cover of Forbes magazine and became the youngest self-made billionaire. Travis Scott has just released his long-awaited album astroworld, which is loved by everyone."



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribeto Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
““They’re just crazy about each other.”For more on Harry and Markle’s romance — and her plans to move to London — pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
“But there was still one looming introduction that gave Meghan Markle pause.”
“A friend says the Toronto-based Suits actress was “a little nervous” at the thought of meeting boyfriend Prince Harry’s beloved grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II.”
“And though it had taken Duchess Kate five years to score face time with the 91-year-old monarch (they chatted at a 2008 royal family wedding), Markle knew she would be curtseying to Her Majesty before year’s end.”
““He’s keen to make an introduction,” a Harry pal said this spring.”
““It will happen when it’s the right time.”That perfect moment came September 3.”
“Fresh off their three-week vacation in Botswana and Zambia — a getaway one source dubbed “the trip of a lifetime” — the royal whisked 36-year-old Markle 500-plus miles north from his two-bedroom Kensington Palace flat.”
“With his dad Prince Charles and stepmother Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall staying at Birkhall, their 53,000-acre estate in Aberdeenshire, Scotland, “Harry decided to take Meghan to visit as he hadn’t been up yet all summer,” a Harry source explains in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
“Another motivation for the two-day trip, says the source: “He wanted to introduce Meghan to the queen.” So 24 hours after they arrived September 2, the duo popped over to Balmoral Castle, the queen’s summer residence, seven miles away.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"They're just crazy about each other." To learn more about Harry and Marcel's romance and her plans to move to London, check out the new issue of American weekly and start now
"But there's an impending introduction that stops Megan markel."
A friend said the Toronto actress was "a little nervous" at the thought of meeting her boyfriend Prince Harry's beloved grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II
"Although it took the Duchess of Kate five years to meet the 91 year old monarch (they chatted at a royal wedding in 2008), Marcel knew that she would curtsey to her majesty before the end of the year."
This spring, a friend of Harry's said, "he'd love to make an introduction."
"Everything will happen at the right time." The perfect moment came on September 3
"Just ended the three week holiday in Botswana and Zambia -- a source known as the" journey of life "- the royal family member, with a 36 year old horse, Kerr, heading north more than 500 miles from his two bedroom Kensington Palace.
"Since their father Prince Charles and stepmother Camilla (Duchess of Cornwall) live in bilharle, this is their 53000 Acre Estate in Aberdeen, Scotland," Harry decided to take Megan to visit because he didn't get up all summer, "one of Harry's sources explained in the new issue of American weekly
Another motive for the two-day trip, the source said, "he wants to introduce Megan to the queen." So, 24 hours after their arrival on September 2, they suddenly arrived at Balmoral Castle, the Queen's summer resort, seven miles away



**Something goes wrong**
“Clooney Movies 92 of 264 The Best Male Actors Working Today 187 of 1 017 The Best Actors in Film History...”
“While working on ER he began attracting a variety of leading roles in films with his breakthrough role in From Dusk till Dawn 1996 and the crime comedy Out of Sight 1998 in more Age 59 59 Birthplace Lexington Kentucky United States of America More George Clooney The Best George...”
“...nominations...”
“In 2018 he was the recipient of the AFI Lifetime Achievement Award Clooney made his acting debut on television in 1978 and later gained wide recognition in his role as Dr Doug Ross on the medical drama ER from 1994 to 1999 for which he received two Primetime Emmy Award...”
“He is the recipient of three Golden Globe Awards and two Academy Awards, one for acting in Syriana (2006) and the other for co-producing Argo (2012).”
“George Timothy Clooney (born May 6, 1961) is an American actor and filmmaker.”
“They both appeared in the Oceans films and they have been known to vacation together.”
“1 George ClooneyBrad Pitt and George Clooney have been friends for many years.”


"Clooney film, 92 of 264 best actors, today's work, 187 of 017 best actors, best actor in film history..."
"While working in the emergency room, he began to attract all kinds of protagonists in films. In 1996, he played a breakthrough role in twilight to dawn. In 1998, he played the crime comedy invisible in over 59. Over 59 was born in Lexington, Kentucky, USA, George Clooney, the best George..."
__ Nominations... "
"In 2018, he won the AFI Lifetime Achievement Award. Clooney made his debut on TV in 1978, and later played Dr. Doug Ross in the 1994-1999 medical drama emergency room, which won wide recognition and won two Emmy golden time Awards..."
"He won three Golden Globes and two Oscars, one for the performance of the Syrians (2006) and the other for the co production of Argo (2012)
George Timothy Clooney (born May 6, 1961) is an American actor and filmmaker
"They've all been in ocean movies, and everyone knows they're on holiday together."
"George Clooney, Brad Pitt and George Clooney have been friends for many years."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Straight Shuter‘s Rob Shuter has all the latest gossip.”
“Tickets are now available online.”
“Opening night for Friends The Musical is October 13.”
“She sees the hit show as her legacy and will not hesitate to take legal action if she doesn’t like the way she is being portrayed in the theater remake, Radar can reveal.”
“She will do just about anything to protect her brand, as her portrayal of Rachel is what launched her into stardom in the first place!”
“Sources have told Straight Shuter that Aniston and her lawyers will be taking a very close look at the script before the show is officially produced.”
“The show will bring back all six main characters from the original 1994-2004 series, but the sitcom’s main diva is not too sure it’s a good idea for the legendary comedy.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Rob Shuter of straight Shuter has all the latest gossip."
"Tickets are now available online."
"The premiere night of the musical friends is October 13."
Radar can reveal: "she regards the hit shows as her legacy, and if she doesn't like the way they are portrayed in the remake, she will take legal action without hesitation."
"She will try her best to protect her brand, because her portrayal of Rachel is the first motivation for her to become a star!"
"A source told strickleshott that Aniston and her lawyer will study the script carefully before the play is officially produced."
"The show will bring back all six of the main characters of the 1994-2004 series, but the main heroine of the sitcom is not sure, which is a good idea for the legendary comedy."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A complete list of winners is below.”
“Israel Del Toro with the Pat Tillman Award for Service, Bryan Cranston honored retired Los Angeles Dodgers announcer Vin Scully with the Icon Award, and New Orleans Saints superfan Jarrius “JJ” Robertson was honored with the Jimmy V Perseverance Award.”
“Also during the show, Michelle Obama presented the Arthur Ashe Courage Award to Special Olympics Founder Eunice Kennedy Shriver, Jon Stewart presented Master Sgt.”
“Momentum by momentous men."”
“This is the culmination of 108 years of momentum.”
“Drinking champagne in honor of the Cubs, Murray joked that "108 years of waiting is hardly a 'moment.'”
“Bill Murray appeared on stage to accept the best moment award on behalf of the Chicago Cubs, who won for the team's first World Series since 1908.”
“The winners of the awards were chosen entirely through online voting.”
“Peyton Manning hosted the 25th annual event, which aired live at 8 p.m ET on ABC.”
“Getty ImagesThe worlds of entertainment and sports collided on Wednesday night when the ESPY Awards were handed out in Los Angeles.”


"Here's the full list of winners."
Israel's del Toro won the Pat Tillman Service Award, Brian Cranston won the Los Angeles Dodgers retired announcer van Scully's idol award, and New Orleans Saint super fan jarios "JJ" Robertson won the Jimmy V Award for perseverance
During the performance, Michelle Obama also presented the Arthur Ashe courage award to Eunice Kennedy Shriver, founder of the Special Olympics, and Jon Stewart presented the staff sergeant medal
"The power of the important people."
"This is the peak of 108 years' development momentum."
"108 years of waiting is not a moment," Murray joked as he drank champagne to celebrate the bear
Bill Murray received the best time award for the Chicago Cubs, who won the world series for the first time since 1908
"The winners were chosen entirely by online voting."
Payton Manning hosted the 25th annual event, which was broadcast live on ABC at 8pm est
"On Wednesday night, when the ESPY awards ceremony was held in Los Angeles, there was a clash between the entertainment and sports circles."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's the way you feel about somebody and the commitment in your heart."”
“There are pockets of sadness."”
“I'm going to have a girls' night.'”
“But it's about living in the moment and feeling every tinge of pain, then waking up the next day and going, ‘All right, I'm going to ride my ponies.”
“I don't necessarily want to know that I have really bad, long, lonely nights ahead of me, but I have had some, and I still have a bunch ahead of me.”
“"Some of that might mean nights on my porch crying, drinking whiskey, and going, ‘Man, this sucks right now.'”
“"I just want to live a life full of everything," she told the magazine.”
“She also said she was "not going to be one of those artists who wallows in my misery so I can be artistic."”
“My favorite records are not because people lived fully happy lives.”
“That's where I'm gonna live.”


"It's your feeling and inner commitment to someone."
"There's some sadness."
"I'm going to have a girl's night."
"But just live in the moment, feel every bit of pain, and then wake up the next day and say," OK, I'm going to ride my pony. "
"I don't necessarily want to know that there are a lot of bad, long, lonely nights ahead of me, but I've had some, and there's a lot ahead of me."
"Some might mean crying on my porch at night, drinking whiskey and saying, 'man, it's terrible now.'"
"I just want a life full of everything," she told the magazine
She also said that she "will not be the kind of artist who indulges in my pain so that I can become an artist."
"My favorite record is not because people live a completely happy life."
"That's where I want to live."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“In reference to the rumored romance between Scarlett Johansson and “ Weekend Update ” anchor Colin Jost , as […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Is “ Saturday Night Live ” creator Lorne Michaels angry about members of the sketch show’s cast and crew hooking up with celebrity guest hosts?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"About the affair between Scarlett Johnson and Colin Jost, anchor of weekend update, as ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
Is Ron Michaels, the creator of "live on Saturday night," angry that the actors and crew of the skit collude with celebrity guest hosts? "



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both stars have projects to promote at Sundance – Darren, 43, has been showcasing his new virtual reality project, SPHERES: Songs of Spacetime, while 26-year-old Suki stars in upcoming movie Assassination Nation, alongside Bella Thorne.”
“Back to videoDarren was photographed with his arm around the British beauty as they took an afternoon stroll and stopped by a restaurant.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or Are Darren Aronofsky and Suki Waterhouse dating?”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“The Black Swan director split from actress Jennifer Lawrence in November, and it appears he has a new woman in his life after stepping out with Suki on Monday, while attending the Sundance Film Festival in Park City.”
“Article contentFilmmaker Darren Aronofsky has sparked rumours of a new romance with Suki Waterhouse after enjoying a cosy lunch date with the model and actress in Utah.”


"Both stars have projects to promote in Sundance - Darren, 43, has been showing his new virtual reality project, the sphere: the song of time and space, while Suki, 26, plays with Bella Thorne in the upcoming film Assassin's country."
"Back in video, Darren was photographed holding the British beauty, who took an afternoon walk and stopped in front of a restaurant."
Try refreshing your browser, or Darren Aronofsky and Suki Waterhouse are dating? "
__ Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
Black Swan director Jennifer Lawrence broke up with actress Jennifer Lawrence in November last year. It seems that he cheated with Suu Kyi on Monday while attending the park city Sundance Film Festival and has a new woman since then
"Filmmaker Darren Aronofsky sparked rumors of a new relationship with Suki Waterhouse after a cozy lunch with a model and actress in Utah."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eagle-eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping that they could “maybe start over again …but this time it means forever.” Sadly for these fans, the only way they can see Bella and Edward back together is in the pages of Stephenie Meyer’s books.”
“...where they can be friendly when they see each other in public...”
“Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunited and got ‘Twilight’ fans buzzing, but we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned if these two exes are getting back together or not.”
“For one moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan was once again a couple and all was right in the world for Twilight fans.”
“Ex-lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily-Rose Depp’s 19th birthday party on June 1.”
“However, don’t expect their love to rise from the grave.”
““There’s no chance of any kind of romantic reconciliation for Rob and Kristen,” a source close to Rob EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““That ship has well and truly sailed, and way too much has passed between them to ever reunite in that way.”
“Plus Kristen is really happy with Stella Maxwell they have an amazing relationship While there s no chance that RPatz and KStew will date again it s not all bad as the source tells HollywoodLife com that Rob thinks it s great that they ve finally got to a place...”
“Rob would love to see more of Kristen he still cares for her deep down and probably always will she was his first real love As for Kristen she feels a little awkward when she sees Rob because she still carries a lot of guilt from how their romance ended...”


Sharp eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping they could "start over But this time it means forever. " Sadly, for these fans, the only way to see Bella and Edward reunite is on Stephanie Meyer's page
__ They will be very friendly when they meet in public... "
"Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson are reunited and fans are cheering for twilight, but we've got exclusive information on whether the two ex girlfriends will get back together."
"For a moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan became a couple again, and for Twilight fans, everything was fine in the world."
On June 1, former lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily Rose Depp's 19th birthday party
"But don't expect their love to come back from the grave."
"For Rob and Christine, there is no possibility of any kind of romantic reconciliation," a source close to rob told Hollywood life
"The ship really sailed well. There was so much traffic between them that they could never reunite like this again."
"Plus Christine is really happy to have an amazing relationship with Stella Maxwell, and without the opportunity, rpatz and kstew will date again, which is not all bad news. The source told Hollywood website that rob thought it was great that they finally got to a place..."
"Rob wants to see more Christine. He still cares about her. Maybe she will always be his first love. As for Christine, when she sees rob, she feels a little embarrassed, because she is still full of guilt about their romantic ending..."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
““She’d be beyond thrilled to win an Academy Award for Best Actress — something that’s evaded both her and Angelina.”“He still considers Jen the love of his life,” the source concluded.Have something to add to the story?”
““He wants Jen involved again as he produces and develops more and more high-quality film and cable TV products.”That kind of professional partnership could pay off for Jen, too, since the insider states she wants in on “prestige projects” under his production banner.”
“Machine star wants Jen to be his partner in other pursuits In Touch further reported They worked well together when they formed the production company Plan B in 2001 an insider close to Brad told In Touch...”
“Jennifer has been married to Wanderlust co star Justin Theroux for two years now And while Brad would never dream of ruining his ex s new marriage he would take a second chance at love with Jen in a heartbeat If they can t be romantic partners though the War...”
“Brad keeps telling friends that he’s seeing everything more clearly.”However, these realisations are obviously far too late.”
““And while he’s not in love with Jen, he realises how much he does love her.”
““He has come to realise that leaving Jen for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life,” the source adds.”
“And now, he’s “in touch with emotions and his true self like never before,” the source says.And it seems like this self-awareness comes with some great realisations.”
“Years later, Brad regrets leaving the Friends star for his now-ex Angelina Jolie, a source told In Touch exclusively.Following his 2016 separation from Angie, Brad sobered up and sought therapy.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"She's excited about winning the Best Actress Oscar - something neither she nor Angelina thought of." "He still thinks Jen is the love of his life," the source said, ending. Do you have anything to add? "
"He wants Jen to be involved again in the production and development of more and more high-quality movies and cable TV products." This professional partnership is also good for Zhan, because people familiar with the matter say she hopes to participate in the prestige project under his production banner
"Robo star wants Jan to be his partner in other fields. Contact further reports that they worked very well when they set up production company plan B in 2001, Brad informed contact..."
"Jennifer has been married to Justin Cyrus, CO star of roamer, for two years. Although Brad never dreamed of ruining his ex-wife's new marriage, if they can't be romantic partners in the war, he will fall in love with her again in a flash..."
"Brad kept telling his friends that he saw everything better." However, it is obviously too late to realize this
"Although he didn't love Jane, he realized how much he loved her."
"He has realized that leaving Jane for Angelina is one of the biggest mistakes of his life," the source added
Now, however, he has "unprecedented access to emotion and his true self," the source said, she said. And then it seems that this self-awareness is accompanied by some great understanding. "
"Years later, Brad regretted leaving friends star for his ex girlfriend Angelina Jolie," a source told touch. Following his separation from Angie in 2016, Brad woke up and sought treatment. "



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images for Vogue]”
“Apart from meeting with a therapist, Kim Kardashian also arranged a meditation for her younger sister upon learning about Kendall’s dilemma.”
“The latest report from OK!”
“...via Gossip Cop alleges that the Victoria’s Secret model is a “boss from hell” who makes life tough for the people who work for her.”
“Everyone thinks she s the sweetest shyest Kardashian sister but over the last year she s made so much money and won so much praise that it s gone to her head The magazine s so called insider recalled an instance when Kendall s assistant served her the wrong kind...”
“...of iced tea and instead of being grateful Kendall reportedly made her pay for a new one out of pocket The insider also purported that the runway model would fire employees who would attempt to talk about her behind her back...”
“What she allegedly does is to tell her mother, Kris Jenner, that the employee is incompetent.”
“However, Gossip Cop shed some light on the issue and confirmed through a source close to Kendall that the magazine’s claims are unfounded.”
“As someone who has firsthand experiences of bullying, it isn’t fair if Kendall would do the same to her team.”
“Just last month, Victoria’s Secret Angel Adriana Lima defended Kendall from bullies and acknowledged her pleasant attitude.”


"[selected pictures of Pascal Le segreat / Getty Images for vogue]
"In addition to meeting with the therapist, Kim Kardashian arranged a meditation for her sister after learning about Kendall's dilemma."
"OK's latest report!"
__ Through gossip police claim that Victoria's Secret mode is a boss from hell who makes life difficult for people who work for her. "
"Everyone thinks that she is the most lovely and shy sister of Kardashian, but in the past year, she has made so much money and won so many praises, all of which are on her head. The magazine's so-called inside story recalls an example when Kendall's assistant provided her with the wrong type..."
__︹ Drinking iced tea, it is reported that Kendall not only does not appreciate her paying for a new one, but insiders also claim that T-stage models will fire employees who try to talk about her behind her back.... "
"What she is said to have done is to tell her mother, Chris Jenner, that the employee is incompetent."
"However, the gossip police revealed some information about the issue and confirmed through a source close to Kendall that the magazine's statement is groundless."
"As a person with first-hand experience of bullying, it would be unfair for Kendall to do the same to her team."
"Just last month, Victoria's Secret Angel Adriana Lima defended Kendall from bullying and admitted that she had a happy attitude."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She feels the weight of the world on her shoulders right now, and her family’s desperately worried about her.””
“However, the source still described the situation best by saying that “There are still some major demons that Britney has to fight on a daily basis, and her workload never lets up.”
“Despite a tumultuous custody battle with ex Kevin Federline, Radar Online reports that Britney Spears may have other things on her plate that would explain her erratic behavior.”
“The publication broke the news that Spears is desperate for Sam Asghari her current love interest to propose but he s dragging his feet and stalling After completing a successful run of shows in Las Vegas Spears allegedly immediately turned her attention to tying the knot with her 23 year...”
“...old boyfriend...”
“The same source claims that the real reasoning behind Spears being impatient is because of her immediate urge to have children with Asghari.”
““All she can talk about right now is having a baby.”
“She wants a girl so bad and she’s madly in love with Sam.”Asghari however, apparently is hesitant to act on Spear’s marriage advances, citing that he may not be mentally ready to completely settle down with the famous performer.”
“While this all occurs, Spears also is caught up in a heated legal battle with ex, Federline.”
“He is reportedly asking the star for more money in spousal and child support to help take care of himself along with their young children, Sean and Jayden.”


"She now feels the burden of the world on her shoulders and her family is very worried about her."
However, the source still used "Britney still has to fight with some major demons every day, and her workload has never been reduced" to describe the current situation
"Despite the ongoing custody dispute with former Kevin Federline, radar online reports that Britney Spears may have other things to do to explain her eccentric behavior."
"This article reveals the following news: spears very much hopes Sam asgary can propose to her, but after a series of successful performances in Las Vegas, he procrastinates and delays. It is said that spears immediately turns her attention to marry her 23-year-old daughter..."
__ Old boyfriend... "
"The same source claimed that the real reason for Spears' impatience was that she was eager to have a baby with asgali."
"All she can say now is to have children."
"She wanted a girl so much that she fell madly in love with Sam." However, asgali is obviously hesitant about the progress of Spear's marriage because he may not be ready to settle down with the famous performer
"While all this happened, spears also fell into a fierce legal battle with his predecessor Federline."
"It is reported that he asked the stars to provide more money for their spouses and children to help take care of themselves and their children, Sean and Jaden."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related GalleryRelated Articles...”
“Watch Entertainment Tonight on Yahoo View, available on iOS and Android.”
“For more on the Spice Girls star's tumultuous split, check out the video below.”
“WATCH: Nick Cannon, Simon Cowell, Sharon Osbourne and 'AGT' Stars Support Mel B Amid Divorce DramaDays later, Belafonte, who denied the allegations, responded when he filed a petition seeking joint custody of their 5-year-old daughter, Madison, and requesting spousal support and that Mel pay his legal fees.”
“The following month, the singer got a restraining order against her estranged husband, alleging that Belafonte beat and threatened her throughout their nearly 10-year marriage.”
“Mel filed for divorce in March, after nearly 10 years of marriage.”
“The 42-year-old entertainer is currently in a long and acrimonious split from her ex, Stephen Belafonte.”
“...on her contentious divorce...”
“Photo Kevin Mazur Getty Images While the stylish singer and TV personality is known for rocking some unusual outfits like the full body black and blue catsuit she wore on a recent live episode of AGT many fans are speculating that this dress might be a not so subtle comment...”
“Photo: Kevin Mazur/Getty ImagesWATCH: Mel B Goes Sexy in Sheer 'Superhero' Bodysuit, Gets Candid About Her Dating Life on 'AGT'The golden gown featured bright colorful letters that read, "You Will Never Own Me."”


"Related kitchen related items..."
"Watch entertainment on Yahoo view tonight and use it on IOS and Android."
"To learn more about the chaotic breakup of spice girls, please see the video below."
"Watch: Nick Cannon, Simon Cowell, Sharon Osborne and the argot stars support Mel B in the divorce. A few days later, Belafonte, who denied the charges, filed a petition to raise their five-year-old daughter Madison together, to ask for support from her spouse, and to ask Mel to pay his lawyer's fees, and he responded. "
The next month, the singer received a restraining order against her separated husband, accusing bellafonte of beating and threatening her during their nearly 10-year marriage
"Mel filed for divorce in March this year after nearly 10 years of marriage."
"The 42 year old artist is now in the process of breaking up with her ex boyfriend, Stephen Belafonte, for a long time and fiercely."
__ About her controversial divorce... "
"The picture shows Kevin Mazur Getty Images, a fashionable singer and TV star famous for swinging some unusual clothes, such as the black and blue tights she wore on the recent AGT live show. Many fans speculate that this dress may be a less subtle comment..."
"Photo: Kevin mazul / Getty imesworch: Mel B is sexy in a pure superhero tights, and tells her candidly about her dating life in a golden robe, with bright colored letters and the words" you'll never have me. "



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's the way you feel about somebody and the commitment in your heart."”
“There are pockets of sadness."”
“I'm going to have a girls' night.'”
“But it's about living in the moment and feeling every tinge of pain, then waking up the next day and going, ‘All right, I'm going to ride my ponies.”
“I don't necessarily want to know that I have really bad, long, lonely nights ahead of me, but I have had some, and I still have a bunch ahead of me.”
“"Some of that might mean nights on my porch crying, drinking whiskey, and going, ‘Man, this sucks right now.'”
“"I just want to live a life full of everything," she told the magazine.”
“She also said she was "not going to be one of those artists who wallows in my misery so I can be artistic."”
“My favorite records are not because people lived fully happy lives.”
“That's where I'm gonna live.”


"It's your feeling and inner commitment to someone."
"There's some sadness."
"I'm going to have a girl's night."
"But just live in the moment, feel every bit of pain, and then wake up the next day and say," OK, I'm going to ride my pony. "
"I don't necessarily want to know that there are a lot of bad, long, lonely nights ahead of me, but I've had some, and there's a lot ahead of me."
"Some might mean crying on my porch at night, drinking whiskey and saying, 'man, it's terrible now.'"
"I just want a life full of everything," she told the magazine
She also said that she "will not be the kind of artist who indulges in my pain so that I can become an artist."
"My favorite record is not because people live a completely happy life."
"That's where I want to live."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementJennifer Aniston has not commented on the rumors surrounding her marriage.”
“Although the actress keeps her family at a distance, they couldn’t be prouder of her accomplishments and wish her well in days to come.”
“It’s been over a decade since Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston parted ways, yet their love story isn’t over yet.”
“Following Pitt’s dramatic split with Angelina Jolie, inside sources claim that he and Aniston are giving their romance a second shot.”
“Is Aniston Pitt’s greatest love?”
“Pitt and Aniston have grown closer over the past year.”
“Pitt reportedly reached out after his divorce and reconnected with Aniston.”
“He also apologized for breaking up with her and wanted to make amends for hurting her.”
“Timothée Chalamet had one thing to say to his sister after they met Jennifer Aniston and Angelina Jolie at the Golden Globes: "Oh my, God!”
“Which side are we on?"”


"Jennifer Aniston didn't comment on the rumors surrounding her marriage."
"Although the actress keeps a distance from her family, they are very proud of her achievements and wish her all the best in the future."
"It's been more than a decade since Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston broke up, but their love story is not over yet."
After the dramatic breakup between Pitt and Angelina Jolie, inside sources say Pitt and Aniston are shooting their love a second time
"Is this Aniston Pitt's greatest love?"
"Pete and Aniston have been getting closer in the past year."
"It is reported that Pete took the initiative to contact Aniston after the divorce and reestablished contact with Aniston."
"He also apologized for breaking up with her, trying to make up for what hurt her."
After meeting Jennifer Aniston and Angelina Jolie at the Golden Globes, Timothy chalamit said to her sister, "my God
"Which side are we on?"



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“5.”
“News.”
“'”2.”
“Because if I don’t, I’m going to die.”
“I’m going to use it now.”
““It wasn’t until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened up a channel for me to be like, ‘God gave me a gift.”
“She came out with a new album that includes a single titled, “Used To Love You.”“It was really a life-saver record for me,” she told Time.”
“Gwen had a messy divorce from Gavin Rossdale after she reportedly found out he cheated.”
“Although the singer has made a new album about the end of the relationship, there is still mystery surrounding what caused the divorce.”
““That’s when it became painfully obvious that it wasn’t going to work out in my ­marriage,” he told Billboard.”


_5._
"News."
_'_2._
"Because if I don't, I'm going to die."
"I'll use it now."
"It wasn't until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened a channel for me, making me feel like" God gave me a gift. "
"She has released a new album, including a single called once loved you." "It's a life-saving record for me," she told time
"Gwen is reported to have had a messy divorce with Gavin Rosedale after she found out he was cheating."
"Although the singer made a new album about the end of the relationship, the reason for the divorce is still a mystery."
"Since then, I have painfully realized that my marriage will not bear fruit," he told billboard



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
__ One month old... "
__ Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
__ Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To all my great colleagues, I will miss you and I will be rooting for you.””
““I’m also very excited about the next chapter.”
““The National Association of Black Journalists is saddened by Tamron Hall’s departure from NBC,” the organization wrote on its website on Wednesday, February 1.”
““She broke ground as the first black female ‘Today Show’ cohost and was enjoying ratings success alongside Al Roker during the show’s third hour of programming.”
“NBC has been a leader for diversity in broadcasting, but recent reports that Hall and Roker will be replaced by former Fox News anchor Megyn Kelly are being seen by industry professionals as whitewashing.”On Thursday, an NBC spokesperson issued a response.”
““NBC News has a long and proven history as an industry leader in newsroom diversity,” the statement reads.”
““We will continue to engage in the running dialogue we’ve had for many years with the National Association of Black Journalists and other advocacy groups to advance those goals.”Earlier this week, NBC announced that Hall, 46, was leaving NBC and MSNBC.”
“She joined the Today show in 2014 and MSNBC in 2007.”
““Tamron Hall will be leaving NBC News and MSNBC when her contract expires this month,” the company said in a statement on Wednesday.”
““[January 31] was her last day as an anchor on both networks.”


"To all my great colleagues, I will miss you and I will support you."
"I'm excited about the next chapter, too."
"The National Association of Black Journalists is sad that Tamron hall has left NBC," the group wrote on its website on Wednesday, February 1
"She broke the ground as the co host of the first black female 'today show'. In the third hour of the show, she enjoyed the success of ratings with Al rock."
"NBC has always been a leader in broadcasting diversity, but recent reports that hall and rock will be replaced by former Fox News Anchor megyn Kelly have been whitewashed by industry professionals." On Thursday, a NBC spokesman made a response
"NBC news, as a diversified industry leader in newsrooms, has a long and tested history," the statement said
"We will continue years of ongoing dialogue with the National Association of Black Journalists and other advocacy groups to advance these goals." Earlier this week, NBC announced that hall, 46, would leave NBC and MSNBC
"She joined today show in 2014 and MSNBC in 2007."
"Tamron hall will leave NBC news and MSNBC when his contract expires this month," the company said in a statement on Wednesday
"January 31 is her last day as an anchor on two TV stations."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He seems to be over a hump.””
“A mole reveals the Oscar winner appeared to be “in very high spirits,which he hasn’t been for a long time.”
“The encounter noticeably perked up Brad, who’s been looking scary-skinny since his stressful split from Angie.”
“...s starring in the adventure drama were heavily enjoying each other s company and they were talking to each other all night says a snitch...”
“Spies spotted Angelina Jolie s estranged hubby doing some serious flirting with blond bombshell Sienna Miller during a private dinner with a group of friends as they celebrated the premiere of The Lost City of Z a new flick from Brad s production company Plan B Brad and Sienna who...”
“Soon-to-be single Brad Pitt is getting back in the game!”
“...will make Angelina Jolie furious...”
“Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Brad Pitt CAUGHT At Intimate Dinner With Sienna Miller Brad Pitt CAUGHT At Intimate Dinner With Sienna Miller Brad Pitt CAUGHT At Intimate Dinner With Sienna Miller All the dirty details that...”


"He seems to have passed a trough."
One mole revealed that the Oscar winner seemed to be "in such a high mood that he hasn't been for a long time."
"The encounter obviously cheered Brad up. He has been looking skinny since his stressful breakup with Angie."
One of the informants said, "well Xiao s, who starred in the adventure drama, enjoyed each other's company very much. They talked all night
"The spies found that Angelina Jolie's estranged husband was seriously flirting with the blonde Sienna Miller at a private dinner with a group of friends when they were celebrating the premiere of" lost Z city. "Brad's production company plan B, Brad and Sienna's new film, Brad and Sienna..."
"Brad Pitt, who is going to be a bachelor, is back!"
__︹ It's going to make Angelina Jolie furious... "
"Click Share on Twitter to open in a new window. Click Share on Facebook to open in a new window. Brad Pitt was caught in an intimate dinner with Siena Miller. Brad Pitt was caught in an intimate dinner with Siena Miller. Brad Pitt was caught in all the dirty details in an intimate dinner with Siena Miller..."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Former Foreign Secretary William Hague was famously entranced by Angie s good works when they met at a film screening in 2011 and has fought to stop rape being used as a weapon with the star Several days later having watched it again he was back in touch love bombing...”
“Unlike some reviewers who considered the dialogue clunky and awkward, or one critic who called it a ‘messy, unnatural war porno’, he was utterly entranced and gushed in an email to her about how he felt it ‘was comparable to Shakespeare’ with a plot ‘so strong I am still recovering’.”
“Angie may be the world’s sexiest woman, but was it likely that, after eluding hundreds of highly trained military personnel, a war criminal and alleged mass murderer would let his guard down just for the chance of a dinner date?”
“Not surprisingly, they have caused quite a stir.”
“Probably Brad [Pitt, her third husband] will go also.’The emails were found in 40,000 files obtained by the French investigative website Mediapart and shared with The Sunday Times’ Insight team.”
“She is ready.”
“‘She loves to arrest Kony.”
“‘Forget other celebrities, she is the one,’ Moreno Ocampo wrote excitedly in another email.”
“And, as one leaked email sent by Moreno Ocampo explains, once settled in, she ‘has the idea to invite Kony to dinner and then arrest him’.”
“Instead, Angie would be embedded with U.S. Special Forces close to Kony’s stronghold in northern Uganda and act as a honeytrap.”


"When former Foreign Secretary William Hage met at a film screening in 2011, he was fascinated by Angie's good works. A few days later, he watched" he's connected with the love bombing again. "
"Unlike some critics who think the dialogue is clumsy, or one critic who calls it" chaotic, unnatural war porn, "he wrote her an email in which he was engrossed in saying that he thought the dialogue was" comparable to Shakespeare "and that the plot was" so strong that I'm still recovering. "
"Angie may be the sexiest woman in the world, but is it possible that after evading hundreds of well-trained soldiers, a war criminal and an accused Holocaust murderer will relax their vigilance just for a dinner date?"
"Not surprisingly, they caused quite a stir."
"Maybe Brad (her third husband, Pete) will go too." The emails were found in 40000 documents obtained by the French research website Mediapart and shared with the "insight group" of the Sunday Times
"She's ready."
"She likes to arrest coney."
In another email, Moreno Ocampo excitedly wrote: "forget the other celebrities. She's the one."
"And, as a leaked email from Moreno Ocampo explains, once settled, she" has the idea of inviting coney to dinner and arresting him. "
"Instead, Angie will be placed in U.S. special forces close to Kony's stronghold in northern Uganda, acting as a trap."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more in the video below.”
“"The parents are committed to act as a united front to effectuate recovery and reunification."”
“...expeditious resolution of any remaining issues the statement read...”
“WATCH Angelina Jolie Brad Pitt Release First Joint Statement Amid Divorce The parties and their counsel have signed agreements to preserve the privacy rights of their children and family by keeping all court documents confidential and engaging a private judge to make any necessary legal decisions and to facilitate the...”
“Earlier this month, Pitt, 53, and Jolie, 41, released their first joint statement since their September split, sharing that they've both signed agreements to keep all of their court documents private.”
“"[Brad's team] has never spoken about the kids and won't be starting now."”
“"[Brad's team] is strictly following the privacy agreement between the two of them," the source said.”
“...not aware of such demands...”
“As for In Touch s report claiming that Pitt s estranged wife Angelina Jolie is requesting 10 000 per month in child support for their six children Maddox 15 Pax 13 Zahara 11 Shiloh 10 and twins Vivienne and Knox 8 the source told ET the actor s team is...”
“...in a private suite inside Casa Del Mar a resort in Santa Monica California where he attended a Narcotics Anonymous group party...”


"Listen to more in the video below."
"Parents are committed to achieving recovery and unity as a united front."
__ Quickly resolve any remaining issues, state as follows... "
"Looking at Angelina Jolie Brad Pitt's first joint statement on the occasion of the divorce, the parties and their lawyers have signed an agreement to keep all court documents confidential and to engage a private judge to make any necessary legal decisions to protect the privacy of their children and families and to
Earlier this month, Pitt, 53, and Julie, 41, issued their first joint statement since their breakup in September, signing an agreement to keep all court documents confidential
"(Brad's team) has never talked about children, and it won't start now."
"(Brad's team) strictly abides by the privacy agreement between them," the source said
__ I don't know these requirements... "
"As for contact magazine's report that Pitt's separated wife, Angelina Jolie, has asked for a monthly maintenance of 10000 pounds for their six children, 15 from Maddox, 13 from Zahara, 11 from Shiloh and 8 from twins Vivian and Knox, the source told et that the cast is..."
__ In a private suite in casadelma, a resort in Santa Monica, California, he attended a drug anonymous group Party



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I was like, I could use this..."VevoSo in summary: have a seat Kanye.”
“...bathtub surrounded by pearls...”
“She jetsets around the world collecting men and she can get any of them but she s so clingy that they leave and she cries and she gets another one in her web and she traps them and locks them in her mansion and she s crying in her marble...”
“But then my second reaction ended up being like, hey, that's actually a really interesting character they're writing about.”
“...me...”
“It could also be a nod to that time when Taylor made the following statement about the media Every single article had these descriptions of my personality that were very different from the actual personality and my first reaction was like that s a bummer this isn t fun for...”
“It could have been a reference to her sexual assault trial as a single dollar bill can be seen in the tub which is all Taylor wanted from winning the case.”
“But at the end of the day, Tay hasn't *actually* confirmed that the scene is about the Paris attack.”
“...for making light of the robbery...”
“Kanye feels like that was not cool because the incident was a very serious and dangerous situation Ultimately he just feels as though it s something that Taylor shouldn t have mocked Kanye isn t the only one to have said this as many critics and fans have slammed Tay...”


"So I thought, I can use this..." Vevoso concluded: please sit down, Kanye
__ The bath surrounded by pearls... "
"She collects men all over the world, she can get any one of them, but she is so clingy, they leave, she cries, she gets another in her net, she traps them, locks them in her mansion, she cries in her marble..."
"But then my second reaction was, hey, it's actually a very interesting character they wrote."
__ I am
"This may also be an affirmation of Taylor's following statement about the media. Every article describes my personality, which is totally different from my actual personality. My first reaction is that he is a tramp, which is not fun for me..."
"This may be a reference to her sexual assault trial, because you can see a dollar bill in the bathtub, which is exactly what Taylor needs to win the case."
"But at the end of the day, Tay has not confirmed that the scene was about the Paris attack."
__ Because of the understated robbery... "
"Kanye doesn't think it's cool, because it's a very serious and dangerous situation. In the end, he just thinks Taylor shouldn't laugh at Kanye. He's not the only one to say that, because many critics and fans criticize Tay..."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLife reached out to Rob and Sienna’s reps for comment.”
“The Remember Me actor ended up falling in love with Twigs’ music, and the couple introduced the two of them.”
“News in 2014 that Rob, Sienna and her now ex-fiancé Tom Sturridge all went to the singer’s concert together.”
“A source told E!”
“This would definitely be an interesting match though considering Sienna is the one who set the Twilight star up with his ex-fiancée FKA twigs.”
“While promoting their film, The Lost City Of Z at the Berlin International Film Festival in Feb. 2017, the pair looked comfortable together while posing for photos and grabbing dinner together.”
“Rob and Sienna have always seemed pretty close.”
““All of their mutual friends think Rob and Sienna would be a good match,” the insider said.”
“As for the pair’s friends, they reportedly think that these two would work really well together.”
““Now that they’re both single, the door is open for them to give this a real shot,” the source continued.”


"Hollywood Life contacted representatives of rob and Sienna for advice."
"I remember my actor finally fell in love with twig's music, and the couple introduced them."
"In 2014, it was reported that rob, Siena and her ex fiance Tom Sturridge all went to the singer's concert together."
"A source told me!"
"It's definitely an interesting game, although considering Siena who set up the Twilight star with his ex fiance FKA twig."
"When they promoted their film" lost Z City "at the Berlin International Film Festival in February 2017, the two of them seemed very comfortable when they took photos together and had dinner together."
"Rob and Sienna always seem to be close."
"All of their mutual friends think rob and Siena will be a good couple," the person familiar with the matter said
"As for the two's friends, it is reported that they think the two will cooperate very well."
"Since they are all single, the door is open for them to give this a real opportunity," the source continued



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is there truth to any these rumors, or are they just crazy talk?”
“— Kelle Jansky (@KelleJansky) August 26, 2014What do you think?”
“Gossip about the young songstress’s ‘tude have been running rampant this year.”
“Some of the stories might have a nugget of truth hidden in them, but most are just so out there that they couldn’t possible have any merit, right?”
“The most recent rumor says that Grande forces her staff to carry her like a baby, according to In Touch magazine.”
““Her new rule is that she has to be carried — literally like a baby — when she doesn’t feel like walking,” a source told the magazine.”
““She says she doesn’t want her precious feet to hit the floor.”More: 11 Times Ariana Grande tried really hard to be Mariah CareyHere are some other outlandish rumors about Grande that have popped up.”
“1.”
“She refused to do the ALS Ice Bucket ChallengeAccording to Star magazine, Grande would not film herself having ice dumped over her head because she refuses to be seen without her hair extensions or full makeup.”
““Celebrities all over the world are doing it for a good cause, but she doesn’t care,” Star says a source told them.”


"Are these rumors true, or are they just bullshit?"
"- kelle jansky (@ kelle jansky) August 26, 2014, what do you think?"
"There has been a lot of gossip about the young singer this year."
"Some stories may hide some truth, but most stories are so deviant that they can't have any value, right?"
According to in touch magazine, there was a recent rumor that Grande forced employees to hold her like a baby
"Her new rule is that when she doesn't want to walk, she has to be held - it's like a baby," a source told the magazine
"She said she didn't want her precious foot to hit the floor." More: 11 times Ariana grand really tried to be Maria Kelly, and some strange rumors about grand suddenly appeared
_1._
"She refused to take part in the ALS ice bucket challenge. According to star magazine, Grande would not photograph herself with ice on her head because she refused to be seen without hair stretching or makeup."
"Celebrities all over the world do it for a good cause, but she doesn't care," Stahl said, a source told them



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 48-year-old singer was a guest on Tuesday's The Ellen DeGeneres Show, where she gushed over her country crooner beau, and opened up about whether the two have plans to get married.”
“"He got sexier," Stefani joked, referencing her boyfriend being named "Sexiest Man Alive" by People magazine.”
“"And it just keeps getting better and cuter and more country."”
“Host Ellen DeGeneres then asked the No Doubt rocker about all the tabloid rumors surrounding her and Shelton.”
“Recent reports have claimed that the two are getting married, while others claim they're not ready yet, which Stefani briefly addressed.”
“"It's weird because, I get nervous when you talk to me about him," she admitted.”
“"I don't know why, but for some reason, the cameras are rolling and I shouldn't say something.”
“So if I say, 'We are [getting married],' then we are, and if I say, 'No, we're not,' then that would be sad, too."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 48 year old singer is a guest on Tuesday's Ellen DeGeneres Show, where she talks about her country singer Bo and whether they have plans to get married."
"He's getting sexier," Stephanie joked, noting that her boyfriend was named "sexiest man" by people magazine
"And better and better, more and more lovely, more and more rural."
"Host Alan DeGeneres then asked the unquestionable rock singer about all the tabloid stories surrounding her and Sheldon."
"There have been recent reports that the two are about to get married, while others claim that they are not ready, which Stefani briefly mentioned."
"It's strange because I'm nervous when you talk to me about him," she admits
"I don't know why, but I don't know why. The camera is rolling. I shouldn't say anything."
"So if I say 'we're going to get married', then we're going to get married. If I say 'no, we're not', then it's sad."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both are seeking joint custody and have reserved the right to obtain spousal support, according to Pratt’s filing, obtained by TMZ.”
“It’s not ideal, but yeah, I think both of us are actually probably doing better.”Pratt and Faris share a child together ― 5-year-old son Jack.”
“And we’re finding a way to navigate this while still remaining friends and still being kind to one another.”
““Divorce sucks,” Pratt told Entertainment Weekly as part of the magazine’s summer movie preview “But at the end of the day, we’ve got a great kid who’s got two parents who love him very much.”
“The actor is finally opening up about his divorce for the first time, nine months after the former couple announced they were separating after eight years of marriage.”
“We’re still not over Chris Pratt and Anna Faris’ split, and it sounds like the “Jurassic World” star isn’t, either.”


"According to the documents submitted by Pratt to TMZ, both are seeking joint custody and reserve the right to spouse support."
"It's not ideal, but I think we've both done better." Pratt and Faris gave birth to a child, Jack, a five-year-old son
"We are looking for a way to manage all this while maintaining friendships and friendliness."
"It's a terrible divorce," Pratt said in the entertainment weekly summer movie trailer, "but at the end of the day, we have a wonderful child who has two parents who love him very much."
"The actor finally made public the divorce for the first time. Nine months ago, the former couple announced that they were separated after eight years of marriage."
"We haven't finished the break-up between Chris Pratt and Anna Faris. It sounds like Jurassic world doesn't have a star either."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Coming up: Laverne Cox and Amy Schumer.”
““There are no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain I have caused others by words and actions,” he said, in part.”
““The whole thing has been very painful for me,” Couric, 61, tells PEOPLE.”
““The accounts I’ve read and heard have been disturbing, distressing and disorienting and it’s completely unacceptable that any woman at the Today show experienced this kind of treatment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I had no idea this was going on during my tenure or after I left,” she continued.”
““I think I speak for many of my former colleagues when I say this was not the Matt we knew.”
“Matt was a kind and generous colleague who treated me with respect.”
“In fact, a joke I once made on late-night television was just that, because it was completely contrary to our brother-sister relationship.”
“It’s still very upsetting.”


"Next up: Lavine Cox and Amy Schumer."
"I have no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain caused by my words and deeds," he said in part
"The whole thing was very painful for me," Couric, 61, told people
"The reports I've read and heard are disturbing, painful and disoriented. Any woman on today's show has experienced such treatment, which is totally unacceptable."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I don't know if it happened during my tenure or after I left," she continued
"When I say this is not Matt we know, I think I represent a lot of former colleagues."
"Matt is a kind and generous colleague and has a lot of respect for me."
"In fact, one of the jokes I made on late night TV was like this, because it was totally against our brother sister relationship."
"Still upset."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And scroll through the gallery below for a look back at Kanye’s most memorable quotes about his wife!”
“For more updates on Kimye’s relationship, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now.”
“Sources tell Life & Style exclusively that after a six-week trial separation earlier this year, the famous duo wanted to salvage their relationship by seeking professional help.”
““Their therapist comes to their home and talks with them,” an insider reveals.”
““They were considering divorce, but decided to try to work it out.”
“It’s been an uphill battle, but they’ve come a long way.”MORE: Kim Kardashian’s Butt Unfortunately Deflated Before Kanye West’s 40th BirthdayThe insider adds, “They’re learning how to communicate and understand each other.”
“They have learned to get along again.”
“The therapy is helping, for now.”One of the things the pair addresses in their sessions is Kanye’s anger issues.”
““They discuss his different triggers and how Kim can keep him from getting upset at home,” a different source shares.”
“But while both stars have agreed to stay together, they differ in wanting a third baby.”


"Then scroll through the gallery below to see kenye's most memorable quotes about his wife!"
"To learn more about kimye's relationship, check out the latest issue of life & style at the newsstand
According to the exclusive report of life and fashion, after six weeks of tentative separation earlier this year, the famous couple hope to save their relationship by seeking professional help
"Their psychiatrist came to their home to talk to them," a person familiar with the matter said
"They considered divorce, but decided to try to solve it."
"It's a tough fight, but they've come a long way." More information: before Kanye West's 40th birthday, Kim Kardashian's buttock has shrunk. "They are learning how to communicate and understand each other," the person added
"They learned to live together again."
"At the moment, treatment is helpful." One of the things they talked about during the treatment was Kanye's anger
"They discussed the different triggers for Kim Jong Il and how to make him uneasy at home," another source said
"However, although the two stars agree to be together, they have different ideas about wanting a third child."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gossip Cop claims MTO is completely full of it, even calling them a "disreputable webloid."”
“They report that Rihanna is not pregnant, debunking another Rihanna pregnant story posted by MTO.”
“She has been rumored to be seen with both men on occasion in the past month.”
“If Rihanna is indeed pregnant, would the father more likely be rapper Drake or Hollywood star Leonardo DiCaprio.”
“MediaTakeout.com also notes that Rihanna's belly is a little poochy, wondering if she has a small baby bump.”
“The site also claims that a close friend of RiRi's said the singer did not even smoke marijuana on 4/20 and does not want any weed smoked around her.”
“Maybe she is just trying to be healthier?”
“MTO claims they have had contact with a member of Rihanna's camp that has revealed Rihanna has stopped drinking, stopped smoking weed, and is not smoking cigarettes.”
“There are reports that Rihanna is pregnant with her first child, which leads us to ask if actor Leonardo DiCaprio is the father...or Rihanna's ex, Drake?”
“: Leonardo DiCaprio or Drake the Father?”


"Gossip police" claims that MTO is full of it, and even calls them "infamous cyber characters"
"They reported that Rihanna was not pregnant, debunking another MTO report that Rihanna was pregnant."
"There is a rumor that she has been with these two men occasionally in the past month."
"If Rihanna is really pregnant, her father is more likely to be rapper Drake or Hollywood star Leonardo DiCaprio."
_ MediaTakeout.com Also noticed that Rihanna's stomach is a little small, I don't know if she has a small lump
"The website also claims that a close friend of Riley said the singer didn't even smoke marijuana on April 20 and didn't want to smoke any around her."
"Maybe she just wanted to be healthier?"
"MTO claimed that they had contact with a member of Rihanna's camp, who revealed that Rihanna had given up drinking, smoking marijuana and smoking."
"There are reports that Rihanna is pregnant with her first child, which makes us wonder if actor Leonardo DiCaprio is her father Or Rihanna's ex boyfriend Drake? "
": Leonardo DiCaprio or father Drake?"



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...business with corporations that attempt to frown on freedom of speech censor artists and question cultural choices Deadline has reached out to NBC for comment...”
“I have loved hosting AMERICAS GOT TALENT for the last 8 seasons watching talented brave and courageous Americans accomplish their dreams in front of millions has been nothing but a joy and everyone has been a pleasure to work with but my soul won t allow me to be in...”
“There is no amount of money worth my dignity or my integrity.”
“He goes on to say,” I find myself in a dark place having to make a decision that I wish I didn’t have to, but as a man, an artist, and a voice for my community I will not be silenced, controlled or treated like a piece of property.”
“Or is this just another way to silence and control an outspoken voice who often battles the establishment.”What Cannon is referring to is a fairly standard clause in employment contracts that does not allow an employee to disparage the company they work for.”
“In my defense, I would ask how so?”
“It was brought to my attention by my “team” that NBC believed that I was in breach of contract because I had disparaged their brand.”
““This has weighed heavy on my spirit.”
““After days of deliberating over some extremely disappointing news that I was being threatened with termination by Executives because of a comedy special that was only intended to bring communities closer together, I was to be punished for a joke,” he writes on Instagram and Facebook.”
“.”


__︹ Businesses with companies that are trying to fight freedom of speech, censor artists and question cultural choices have contacted NBC for advice... "
"In the past eight seasons, I've always enjoyed hosting" America's got talent show ". It's just a pleasure to watch talented, brave and brave Americans realize their dreams in front of millions of people. Everyone is willing to work with me, but my soul doesn't allow me to join..."
"Not much money is worth my dignity and integrity."
He went on, "I found myself in a dark place and had to make a decision I didn't want to make, but as a man, an artist and a spokesman for the community, I would not be silenced, controlled or treated as a piece of property."
"Or is it just another way to suppress and control outspoken voices that often struggle with those in power?" Cannon refers to a fairly standard clause in an employment contract that does not allow employees to defame the company they work for
"In my defense, I'll ask," how did that happen? "
"My 'team' caught my attention and NBC thought I was in breach of the contract because I denigrated their brand."
"It makes my spirit heavy."
He wrote on instagram and Facebook: "after a few days of deliberation, some extremely disappointing news told me that I was threatened to be fired by executives because of a comedy special, which was just to narrow the distance between communities, and I was punished for a joke."
_._



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the couple’s decision to put their baby plans on hold, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
““Not because of a change in her love for Blake,” explains the source, “but because she feels as if it might not be meant to be.” The country star is on board with her thoughts.”
““Gwen sat in the stands and was grooving along,” a concert-goer says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““Blake sang a lot in her direction.” At one point, he even shared a sweet detail of their home life, says the witness: “Their dog was having puppies and they couldn’t wait to get home!”For now, those furry family members are serving as surrogates of sorts.”
““Blake and Gwen have decided to put plans to have a baby on hold,” an insider shares in the new issue.”
““Their feeling is if it happens naturally, great.”
“But they’ve decided to not focus on it for the time being.”Stefani, 48, and Shelton, 41, have been trying to conceive for over a year, the source reveals.”
“But the one blessing of their struggle is that it’s made them stronger than ever.”
“The source says Shelton is “absolutely devoted” to Gwen’s sons, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9, and Apollo, 4: “Blake is extremely attentive, loving and doting towards Gwen and the boys.”Shelton’s devotion is part of what made the couple try for a child together.”
““Blake has always wanted children,” explains a friend.”


"For more information about the couple's decision to suspend their family planning, please read the new issue of American weekly and start now."
"It's not because her love for black has changed," the source explained, "but because she feels it may not be predestined." The country star was on the boat with her ideas
"Gwen is sitting in the stands and walking," one concert goer said in the new issue of American weekly
"Black sang a lot to her." On one occasion, he even shared the sweet details of their family life. The witness said: "their dog gave birth to a puppy, and they can't wait to go home! "At the moment, those furry family members are acting as surrogate mothers of all kinds."
"Black and Gwen decided to postpone their plans to have children," an insider said in the IPO
"Their feeling is that if it happens naturally, that's great."
Stefani, 48, and Sheldon, 41, have been trying to conceive for more than a year, sources said
"But one of the benefits of their struggle is that it makes them stronger than ever before."
The source said Sheldon was "absolutely loyal" to Gwen's sons Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4), "black was very concerned, loving and doting on Gwen and the children." Sheldon's loyalty is one of the reasons why the couple want to have children together
"Black always wanted to have children," a friend explained



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““Michael was irate,” a source spilled.”
“Michael Strahan 'Furious' Alex Rodriguez Stole His TV Spotlight Athlete-turned-host feels 'overshadowed' by baseball great.”
“Take a seat on the bench, Michael Strahan!”
“Now it’s A-Rod who’s getting all the playing time on TV.”
““Alex Rodriguez is everywhere!” an insider exclusively told RadarOnline.com.”
““Michael is feeling overshadowed — even though he’s six-foot-five!”According to sources, A-Rod’s goal is to unseat Strahan as the “top jock” on the tube — and his ambition has the former football great watching his blind side.”
““They both have massive egos,” the source spilled.”
““Michael is seething that all anybody talks about is A-Rod.”The once-disgraced Yankee All-Star, 43, is FOX Sports’ lead MLB analyst.”
“He also is a judge on “Shark Tank” — and ABC stunned Strahan when they named Alex a contributor to “Good Morning America,” without his input.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Michael is angry," one source said
"Michael Strahan's" angry "Alex Rodriguez robbed his TV spotlight, and the player became the host, feeling" overshadowed "by the great baseball."
"Sit on the bench, Michael Strahan!"
"Now it's A-Rod that's taking up all the time on TV."
"Alex Rodriguez is everywhere! "An insider told reporters exclusively RadarOnline.com Website. "
"Michael felt eclipsed - even though he was six feet five! "According to sources, A-Rod's goal is to replace Strahan as the 'top player' on the subway - his ambition has made the former football star see his blind spot."
"They are all conceited," the source said
"Michael is boiling, everyone is talking about A-Rod." The once disgraced Yankees all star, 43, is Fox Sports MLB chief analyst
He's also a judge on shark tank, and ABC surprised Strahan by appointing Alex as a writer for Good Morning America without him



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have discussions.”
“I tell Chris [how I feel about] certain things.”
“So he turns up in the film and he’s got a plan and it’s all going to be okay.”
“Matt has the most amazing ability to project integrity and warmth.”
“It’s fun to watch with an audience who doesn’t know because they haven’t heard about it.”
“But Matt is a very important part of the movie.”
“We didn’t want to mislead people.”
“So we didn’t want to market the film using him because he’s not in it very much.”
“He didn’t have to shoot for long.”
“It’s going to be okay.”Matt very graciously agreed to do it.”


"We have a discussion."
"I told Chris something."
"So he's in the movie, and he has a plan that everything will be OK."
"Matt has the most amazing ability to show integrity and enthusiasm."
"It's fun to watch with people who don't know, because they haven't heard of it."
"But Matt is a very important part of the movie."
"We don't want to mislead people."
"So we don't want to use him to sell the film because he's not very involved."
"He doesn't have to shoot too long."
"It's going to be OK." Matt politely agreed



**Something goes wrong**
““Before, people weren’t paying enough attention to it.”
““We’re all going to have to be more diligent about it and look for any warning signs,” he said.”
“Since initially speaking out against Weinstein earlier in the week, Damon and Affleck have mostly kept silent.”
“Matt Damon and Ben Affleck have also been ensnared in the scandal to varying degrees, with Affleck himself having to fend off allegations from women on social media that he groped him.”
“But he’s not the only A-list male star to face backlash over the Weinstein controversy.”
“Marquez’ claims continued to keep Clooney’s name in the news over his professional association with Weinstein.”
“In 2005, she discussed her shopping addiction on the A&E reality show “Intervention,” the New York Post said.”
“Since leaving the show in 1997, she has only appeared in a handful of short films and TV movies, according to her IMDb page.”
“Marquez said that her complaints led her to be blacklisted.”
““Wells was the boss&I 1st reported it to him.His 1st question:Did George do something to u,” she tweeted.”


"Before, people didn't pay enough attention to it."
"We all have to work harder to find any warning signs," he said
"Damon and Affleck have been largely silent since they made their public statement to Weinstein earlier this week."
"Matt Damon and Ben Affleck were also involved in the scandal to varying degrees, and Affleck himself had to resist the accusation of being touched by women on social media."
"But he's not the only male star to face a rebound due to the Weinstein controversy."
"Marquez's comments continue to make Clooney's name in the news because of his professional relationship with Weinstein."
"In 2005, she discussed her shopping habits on the A & E reality show intervention," the New York Post said
According to her IMDB website, she has only appeared in a few short films and TV movies since she left the show in 1997
"Marquez said her complaint led to her being blacklisted."
"Wells is the boss & I reported him for the first time. His first question: George "do something to you," she tweeted



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You went too far bro,” the actor shared on Instagram.”
“Congrats to the @philadelphiaeagles; except for that one dude missing a tooth.”
“The New England Patriots defeated the Jacksonville Jaguars 24-20 during the AFC Championship game on Sunday to extend their record to the team’s tenth overall Super Bowl appearance, including quarterback Tom Brady‘s eighth Super Bowl appearance and coach Bill Belichick’s 11th.”
“In addition, the Patriots now have the chance to tie the Pittsburgh Steelers for most Super Bowl wins, with six, in franchise history.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Meanwhile, the Philadelphia Eagles became NFC Champions over the Minnesota Vikings 38-7, clinching their first Super Bowl appearance since February 2005, when they first took on the Patriots during XXXIX.”
“The rematch had plenty of celebrity supporters both in the stadium stands and in Hollywood.”
“Gisele Bündchen proudly congratulated her husband on social media with a photo of her and Brady, writing, “What a game!!!”
“Congratulations my love!”
“So happy for you and your teammates!”


"You're going too far, brother," the actor said on instagram
"Congratulations to Philadelphian, except for the guy with a missing tooth."
"The New England Patriots beat the Jacksonville Jaguars 24-20 in Sunday's AFC championship, extending their record to their 10th Super Cup participation, including quarterback Tom Brady's eighth and Coach Bill Bellick's 11th
"In addition, the Patriots now have a chance to tie most of Pittsburgh Steelers' Super Bowl wins, six, in franchise history."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"At the same time, the Philadelphia Eagles, who beat the Minnesota Vikings 38-7 to become NFC champions, made their first appearance in the super bowl since February 2005, when they met the Patriots for the first time in XXXIX."
"The second round has a lot of celebrity supporters in the stadium stands and Hollywood."
Giselle bonchen congratulated her husband with photos of her and Brady on social media, and wrote: "what a wonderful game!"
"Congratulations, dear!"
"I'm so happy for you and your teammates!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...post...”
“Image zoom Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan have split.”
“The former couple announced the split in a joint statement exclusive to PEOPLE:Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hey world!”
“So…We have something we would like to share.”
“First off, it feels odd that we have to share this kind of thing with everyone, but it’s a consequence of the lives we’ve chosen to lead, which we also happen to be deeply grateful for.”
“We’re living in an incredible moment in time, but it’s also a time where truth can easily get distorted into “alternative facts”  So we want to share the truth so you know that if you didn’t read it here then it’s most certainly fiction.”
“We have lovingly chosen to separate as a couple.”
“We fell deeply in love so many years ago and have had a magical journey together.”
“Absolutely nothing has changed about how much we love one another, but love is a beautiful adventure that is taking us on different paths for now.”


__ Publish
"Image zooming Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan broke up."
The former couple announced their separation in a joint statement: "come on, everyone. It includes news, functions and so on."
"Hey, world!"
"So We want to share something. "
"First of all, it's strange that we have to share this kind of thing with everyone, but it's the result of the life we choose to live, and we happen to be deeply grateful for it."
"We live in an incredible moment, but it's also a moment when the truth can easily be distorted into an 'alternative truth', so we want to share the truth and let you know that if you don't read it here, it must be fictional."
"We chose to separate with love."
"We fell in love so many years ago and had a wonderful journey together."
"The extent to which we love each other has never changed, but love is a beautiful adventure that is now taking us on a different path."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe.”
“Let's go get married, just for the hell of it.'"”
“Though he was later overshadowed by Kevin Federline and his fedora, Jason Allen Alexander had a good 55 hours of fame thanks to his two-day marriage to Britney Spears.”
“Who can forget how the tabloids were splashed with the happy (and totes not intoxicated couple): Britney Spears in her wedding Jason hulking over her with that unfortunate Caesar haircut and power-brows.”
“Stunning.”
“So how did this happen?”
“After a night of clubbing with her childhood friend, the pair put on The Texas Chainsaw Massacre and got inspired.”
“Dude, not even kidding.”
“"It was just so crazy, man," Alexander told Access Hollywood in the aftermath.”
“"We were just looking at each other and said, 'Let's do something wild, crazy.”


"Maybe."
"Let's get married, just for fun."
"Although Kevin Federline and his Fedora later eclipsed him, Jason Allen Alexander had a 55 hour reputation because of his two-day marriage to Britney Spears."
"Who can forget how the tabloid story about this happy couple (not a drunk couple): Britney Spears at her wedding, Jason choked her down with her unfortunate Caesar hairstyle and powerful eyebrows."
"Great."
"How did this happen?"
"After a night out with her childhood friends, they were inspired by the Texas Chainsaw Massacre."
"No kidding, man."
"It's crazy, man," Alexander told Hollywood interview afterwards
"We just looked at each other and said," let's do something crazy. "



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anything.”
“'Anything is a possibility Ellen...”
“But I do think girls had crushes on you.”
“...via spokesman Stephen Huvane AdvertisementEllen retorted: 'It's just I don't know, flirty or something.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.'”
“Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else's fictional narrative.”
“Normally we would do this privately, but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent, we wanted to convey the truth directly.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“Full statement from Aniston and Theroux on separation 'In an effort to reduce any further speculation, we have decided to announce our separation.”


"Anything will do."
"Anything is possible, Alan..."
"But I do think girls are crazy about you."
__︹ "It's just that I don't know, flirting or something," retorted Stephen Huvane, a via spokesman
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
"Anything printed about us, not directly from us, is someone else's fiction."
"Normally, we do it in private, but as the gossip industry can't resist the opportunities of speculation and invention, we want to convey the truth directly."
"We are two best friends and decided to go our separate ways, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
"Aniston and seru's complete statement on separation" in order to reduce further speculation, we decided to announce the separation



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Ben isn't ready to propose and has no plans to get engaged anytime soon, but Lindsay feels he is worth the wait.”We're rooting for ya, Shook.”
“The source makes it sound like Affleck and Garner's split was an ugly chapter in their lives that's now over and done with.”
“Unfortunately, there are some sizable barriers blocking their path.”
“According to a new report from Entertainment Tonight Lindsey is seeking a commitment from Ben, who seems hesitant to pop the question.”
“But to his credit, there's a very good reason for that:"Lindsay and Ben are very much in love,” a source tells the outlet.”
““During Ben and Jennifer [Garner's] split, Lindsay truly felt villainized.”
“Every day she spent with Ben out in the world for people to see felt like another day of public scrutiny, but her love for Ben was worth it," the insider adds.”
“"They both learned to stick by each other during those painful months.”See, therein lies the issue.”
“But the fact is Ben and Jen still aren't divorced.”
“He’s actually been told to take it slow and he's heeding that advice," the insider claims.”


"Ben is not ready to propose and has no plans to get engaged soon, but Lindsay thinks he's worth the wait." We're with you, shack
"The source gave the impression that the breakup between Affleck and Ghana was an ugly chapter in their lives, and it's over now."
"Unfortunately, there are quite a few obstacles in their way."
"According to the latest Entertainment Tonight report, Lindsay is looking for Ben's commitment, and Ben seems reluctant to ask this question."
"But to my credit, there is a good reason for this:" Lindsay and Ben are very in love, "a source told the media
"During Ben and Jennifer's breakup, Lindsay really felt like a villain."
"She's out with Ben every day and let people see her. It's like another day of public attention, but her love for Ben is worth it," the source added
"In those painful months, they all learned to support each other." Look, that's the problem
"But the truth is, Ben and Jane are not divorced yet."
"In fact, he was told to take his time and he was following the advice," the insider claimed



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gossip Cop reiterated that no one from the Kardashian/Jenner clan or anyone close to the family has talked to Hollywood Life regarding Khloe Kardashian’s decision to not reconcile with Caitlyn Jenner during her pregnancy.”
“The site quickly slammed the new scoop and confirmed that there is absolutely no truth to the claim.”
“Mrs. West has always fully supported Kris Jenner after Caitlyn Jenner said a lot of hurtful things about her mom in her books and interviews, and it has been like that for years.”
““Their family still feels slighted by Caitlyn about what she said about Kris in her book and they’ve really rallied around Kris.”However, Gossip Cop noted that Kim Kardashian’s loyalty to her family is old news.”
““Kim is standing behind her sister and she will always have her back,” the insider revealed.”
“Although Khloe Kardashian didn’t exactly say that she will keep the child away from Caitlyn Jenner, a Hollywood Life source claimed that Kim Kardashian supported her sister’s decision to not make the I Am Cait star a part of her child’s life.”
“When asked if the arrival of her baby will “affect things” with her former stepdad, Khloe Kardashian replied that things will remain as they were.”
“Since the 33-year-old TV personality will be welcoming her first child with Tristan Thompson soon, many wondered, including Ross King of the ITV show Lorraine, if this will mend her broken relationship with Caitlyn Jenner.”
“Unfortunately, their bond was ruined when the 68-year-old retired Olympic gold medal-winning decathlete transformed into a woman and started to talk badly about the Kardashian clan.”
“Khloe Kardashian and Caitlyn Jenner used to have a really close relationship, especially when the former’s dad passed away and the latter took over as the reality star’s father figure.”


"Gossip police reiterated that no one in the Kardashian / Jenner family, or anyone close to the Kardashian family, had ever talked about life in Hollywood about Caitlin Jenner's decision not to reconcile with Caitlin Jenner during her pregnancy."
"The website quickly attacked the new exclusive and confirmed that it was absolutely untrue."
"Since Caitlin Jenner said a lot of hurtful things about her mother in books and interviews, Mrs. West has been fully supportive of Chris Jenner, and has been for many years."
"For what Caitlin says about Chris in the book, their family still feel that she looks down on them, and they are really united with Chris." However, the scandal police pointed out that Kim Kardashian's loyalty to her family is old news. "
"Kim is standing behind her sister. She will always carry her sister behind her back," a person familiar with the matter said
"Although Khloe Kardashian did not say for sure that she would keep her child away from Caitlin Jenner, a Hollywood Life source claimed that Kim Kardashian supported her sister's decision not to let" I am CAIT "become a part of her child's life."
When asked if the birth of the child would affect her relationship with her former stepfather, Carol Kardashian replied that things would remain the same
"As the 33 year old TV star will soon have her and Tristan Thompson's first child, a lot of people want to know if it can repair the broken relationship between her and Caitlin Jenner, including rose king of the ITV show Lorraine."
"Unfortunately, when the 68 year old retired Olympic gold medalist turned into a woman and began to speak ill of the Kardashian family, their relationship was destroyed."
"Kardashian and Caitlin Jenner had a very close relationship, especially when their father died and they took over the role of reality TV star."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His girlfriend, Madison Parker, was with him that night and was also arrested.”
“...wrote...”
“...opening up about his sexuality...”
“The singer and younger brother of Backstreet Boys heartthrob Nick Carter revealed in a tweet on Saturday that he is attracted to both men and women.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““To start off, I would like to say that I love each and EVERY ONE of my fans,” Carter, 29, began his post, which was a screenshot of the Apple Notes app.”
““There’s something I’d like to say that I feel is important for myself and my identity that has been weighing on my chest for nearly half of my life.”
““This doesn’t bring me shame, just a weight and burden I have held onto for a long time that I would like lifted off me,” he continued.”
“Image zoom Credit Bruce Glikas FilmMagic I grew up in this entertainment industry at a very young age and when I was around 13 years old I started to find boys and girls attractive Carter who had high profile relationships with Lindsay Lohan and Hilary Duff when he was younger...”
““There were years that went by that I thought about, but it wasn’t until I was 17-years-old, after a few relationships with girls, I had an experience with a male that I had an attraction to who I also worked with and grew up with.”


"His girlfriend Madison Parker was with him that night and was arrested," he said
__ Write... "
__ Open his sexual orientation... "
"The singer and brother of backstreet boys and pop star Nick Carter tweeted on Saturday that he is attractive to both men and women."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"First of all, I want to say that I love every one of my fans," Carter, 29, began posting. This is a screenshot of Apple's notes app
"One thing I want to say is that I think it's very important to myself and my identity. It's been pressing on my chest for nearly half of the time."
"It doesn't bring me shame, it's just a burden I've been carrying for a long time, and I want to take it off," he continued
"I grew up in the entertainment industry when I was very young. When I was about 13 years old, I began to find that boys and girls were very attractive. When Carter was young, he had a high-profile relationship with Lindsay Lohan and Hillary Duff..."
"I've been thinking about it for several years, but it wasn't until I was 17 years old and had been dating girls several times that I had the experience of dating a man. I became attractive to the men I worked with and grew up with."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But he’s getting nervous now that Jonah’s trimmed 40 pounds, looks like a matinee idol and is scoring flicks that’d never tolerate a ‘tubby!’””
“Said a pal: “Josh chuckles about the mix-ups, even joking he gets movie parts Jonah’s nixed!”
“Jonah Hill’s Weight Loss Secrets: Enemas & More!”
“Fans, and even fellow stars, confuse him with his good buddy sort-of look-alike Jonah Hill!”
“Express still has surprisingly frequent encounters that make him laugh his butt off...”
“One almost can t mistake gagster Josh Gad s giant voice bellowing animated megahits like Beauty and the Beast and Frozen The Broadway biggie whose movie career is now exploding with huge flicks like Marshall and Murder on the Orient...”
“Mike Walker reports….”


"But he's starting to get nervous now. Jonah has lost 40 pounds and looks like a matinee idol, and the movies he makes will never tolerate" fat man! ""
A friend said, "Josh laughed and even joked that he got Jonah's movie part rejected!"
"Jonah Hill's weight loss tips: enemas and more!"
"Fans, and even other stars, confuse him with his best friends, a bit like Jonah hill!"
"The express still has unexpected frequent encounters, which makes him laugh like shit..."
"It's almost impossible to mistakenly assume that the comic master Josh GAD's loud voice roars the cartoons beauty and the beast and frozen the Broadway biggie, and his film career is now exploding with big movies like Marshall and murder in the East..."
"Mike Walker reports..."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prior to WrestleMania 33, The Miz roasted Cena – who “stole his girlfriend from Dolph Ziggler” – on an episode of Talking Smack.”
“And then he tried to kiss me.”Ziggler had approached Bella back in 2015 to tell her that he still had feelings for her.”
“And that s it wasn t a one page it s a 75 page agreement We should note here that John Cena and Nikki Bella have put their relationship on display on reality television for years and it s up to you whether you want to believe the scenes are...”
“I had to have your sister sign an agreement to live in the house.”
“Without it, it’s a dog fight.”
“And those who buy a handgun for self defense pray, pray they never have to use it.”
“It gives you a sense of security, and it gives you a failsafe in case something happens.”
“It is like buying a handgun for home defense.”
““Having been through that process, here is how I view it.”
“Reflecting on his failed first marriage, Cena revealed on the second episode of Total Bellas that Nikki Bella had to sign a 75-page contract before she was able to move in with him.”


Before wrestling storm 33, Miz baked senna, who "stole his girlfriend from Dolf Ziegler," in an episode of talking smack
"And then he tried to kiss me." Ziegler found Bella in 2015 and told her that he still had feelings for Bella
"This is not a one page agreement, but a 75 page agreement. We should note that John senna and Nicky Bella have been showing their relationship on reality TV for many years. Would you like to believe that these scenes are..."
"I have to get your sister to sign an agreement to live in this house."
"Without it, dogs fight."
"Those who buy pistols to defend themselves pray that they will never use them."
"It gives you a sense of security and gives you a fail safe when something happens."
"It's like buying a pistol for family defense."
"Through this process, I see it this way."
"Recalling his failed first marriage, senna revealed in the second episode of complete Bella that Nicky Bella had to sign a 75 page contract to live with him."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image credit to Portia de Rossi // via InstagramA post shared by Portia de Rossi (@portiaderossi) on Apr 12, 2016 at 8:48pm PDT”
“Also, check back with CDL for all the latest news and updates on Ellen DeGeneres right here!”
“That’s why Ellen’s been urging her to attend counseling sessions with her, according to a new report.”
“They’ve hit a rough patch in their relationship and apparently Ellen wants them to get back on track before they head towards a divorce.”
“Things have gotten so bad between Ellen and Portia that they’ve been fighting non-stop, both at home and in public.”
“In fact, one insider said that Ellen and Portia often get into heated arguments on the set of her daytime talk show.”
“To make matters worse, Ellen hates it when other people gossip about her personal problems.”
“That’s why she’s been pushing Portia to attend counseling sessions with her as one last effort to save their crumbling marriage.”
“One source close to the situation told Life & Style Weekly, “Ellen has been in counseling, both solo and with Portia.”
“Part of their therapy is to go on more date nights.”


"Photo source: Portia de Rossi / / instagra post shared by Portia de Rossi (@ portiaderossi) at 8:48 pm on April 12, 2016"
"In addition, please contact CDL for all the latest news and updates about Ellen DeGeneres!"
"According to a new report, that's why Ellen has been urging her to join her in counseling sessions."
"They're having a difficult relationship and obviously Allen wants them back on track before they get divorced."
"Things have become so bad between Ellen and Portia that they have been arguing at home and in public all the time."
"In fact, one insider said that Ellen and Portia often had fierce arguments on her daytime talk shows."
What's worse, Ellen hates to be talked about
"That's why she has been urging Portia to join her in counseling sessions as a last resort to save their broken marriage."
A person familiar with the matter told life and Fashion Weekly that "Allen has been receiving psychological counseling, whether alone or with Portia."
"Part of their treatment is going out more."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(To watch Hayes’ track record, click here) Wall Street has been keeping quiet on all things KREF, and the only other recent review also recommends a Buy.”
“We expect increased capital deployment to support earnings power and dividend coverage, and could potentially warrant an increase in the dividend as the macroeconomic outlook improves.” To this end, Hayes gives KREF a Buy and sets a $19.50 price target that indicates ~6% growth from current levels.”
“At the end of October, the company released 3Q20 earnings (the last reported quarter), showing $22.4 million in total revenue, for a 13% year-over-year gain.”
“The company has over $2 billion invested in 49 separate loans, 95% of which are senior mortgage loans.”
“Ares boasts a diversified portfolio – featuring office space, apartments, hotels, and mixed-use properties – mainly across the Southeast and West.”
“Ares Commercial Real Estate (ACRE) The first dividend pick we are looking at is Ares Commercial Real Estate, a company focused on the commercial real estate mortgage sector.”
“We are talking about at least 9% here.”
“These are stocks that the analyst initiated Buy ratings on, pointing out their high dividend yield.”
“Against this backdrop, we’ve opened up the TipRanks database to get the latest stats on Hayes’ CRE choices.”
“Hayes commented...”


(to see Hayes's track record, click here) Wall Street has been silent about everything about Craig, and the only recent comment suggested buying
"We expect that the increase in capital allocation will support profitability and dividend coverage, with dividends likely to increase as the macroeconomic outlook improves." To this end, Hayes bought kref and set a target price of $19.50, which indicates that the price is about 6% higher than the current level. "
"At the end of October, the company released its third quarter (last quarter) results, with total revenue of $22.4 million, up 13% year-on-year."
The company has more than $2 billion invested in 49 separate loans, 95% of which are senior mortgages
"Ares has a diversified portfolio of office space, apartments, hotels and multi-purpose properties, mainly in the southeast and West."
"Ares commercial real estate (acre) the first dividend option we focus on is ares commercial real estate, a company focused on the commercial real estate mortgage industry."
"We're talking about at least 9%."
"Analysts give buy ratings on these stocks, pointing to their high dividend yield."
"In this context, we have opened the tipranks database to get the latest data selected by Hayes cre."
"Hayes commented



**Something goes wrong**
“Heartbroken for those who knew him best.””
““Roy Halladay was not just one of the greatest competitors, but was also among the best men in our generation of players.”
“A fearsome competitor on the mound, Halladay, 40, earned universal appreciation within the sport, from teammates and opponents alike.”
“He was one of 23 pitchers to throw a perfect game, and joined the Yankees’ Don Larsen as the only two to fire a no-hitter in the postseason.”
“Halladay did it for the Phillies in his playoff debut, on Oct. 6, 2010, and came within a fifth-inning walk to the Reds’ Jay Bruce of also being perfect that remarkable evening at Citizens Bank Park.”
“The baseball world was in shock Tuesday after learning of Halladay’s fatal accident, which came only four years after his retirement from the Phillies, his 16-year career prematurely ended by his decision to avoid back surgery.”
““We are numb over the very tragic news about Roy Halladay’s untimely death,” the Phillies said in a statement.”
“There are no words to describe the sadness that the entire Phillies family is feeling over the loss of one of the most respected human beings to ever play the game Halladay recently purchased the A5 ICON a two seat single engine amphibious plane capable of landing on water and...”
“...his Twitter feed was filled with photographs of him flying the aircraft...”
“According to the Pasco County (Fla.) Police Department, the plane went down in the water, about a quarter-mile offshore, and Halladay died in the crash.”


"Sad for those who know him best."
"Roy haradi is not only one of the greatest competitors, but also the best player of our generation
"Haradi, 40, is a formidable player on the mound. He has won the general praise of his teammates and opponents in this sport."
"He was one of 23 pitchers who made a perfect game, and together with Yankees' Don Larson, he became the only two pitchers in the playoffs who didn't have a pitcher."
"Haradi did that for the Philadelphian in his playoff debut on October 6, 2010. In the fifth inning, he came to Jay Bruce of Liverpool, and on that extraordinary night, he was perfect at citizen bank park."
"The baseball world was shocked to learn about haradi's fatal accident on Tuesday. It happened four years after he retired from the Philadelphia Phillies, and his 16 year career ended prematurely because he decided to avoid back surgery
"We are numb to the tragic news of Roy haradi's early death," the Philadelphia man said in a statement
"It's indescribable that the whole Philadelphia family feels sad about losing one of their most respected people to play this game. Haradi recently bought the A5 icon, a two seater, single engine amphibious aircraft that can land on water, and
__ His Twitter is full of photos of him flying a plane... "
"According to the Pascoe County Police Department in Florida, the plane crashed in water about a quarter of a mile offshore and haradi was killed in the crash."



**Something goes wrong**
“CNN’s Lawrence Crook III contributed to this report.”
“Photo by David Maialetti Pool Getty Images Bill Cosby is taken away in handcuffs after he was sentenced to three to 10 years for felony sexual assault on Tuesday Sept 25 2018 in Norristown Pa Mark Makela Pool Photo via AP This is where Bill Cosby is going to prison...”
“Cosby faced three counts of aggravated indecent assault.”
“The judge presiding over Cosby’s trial released the names of the 12 jurors and six alternates in the case on Wednesday.”
“The jury room insights came less than a week after the trial judge declared a mistrial in Cosby’s case, as jurors reported being hopelessly deadlocked over more than 50 hours of deliberations.”
“Both jurors spoke on the condition of anonymity because jurors were told not to comment on the proceedings inside the jury room.”
“However, a different juror told CNN affiliate WPXI that jurors were in a “true deadlock” and that votes were generally split along 7-5 or 5-7 votes for most of the deliberations.”
“One juror told ABC News on Wednesday that ten of the 12 jurors voted to convict Cosby on two counts of aggravated indecent assault, but two people on the panel continued to hold out, leading to a deadlocked jury and a mistrial.”
“Story highlights Two jurors gave conflicting accounts of their deliberations Jurors names were released to the public Wednesday after mistrial CNN Two jurors in Bill Cosby s assault trial offered differing accounts of their deadlocked deliberations that underscore how differently they may have viewed the case...”
“NORRISTOWN, PA - SEPTEMBER 24: Actor and comedian Bill Cosby returns to the courtroom after a break with his spokesman Andrew Wyatt at the Montgomery County Courthouse, during his sexual assault trial sentencing in Norristown, Pennsylvania, U.S. September 24, 2018.”


"Lawrence crook III of CNN contributed to this report."
"David maialetti pool Getty Images on Tuesday, September 25, 2018, Bill Cosby was taken away in handcuffs after being sentenced to three to 10 years for felony sexual assault. This is where Bill Cosby was put in jail... "
"Cosby faces three counts of gross indecency."
"The judge who presided over the Cosby trial announced the names of 12 jurors and six alternate jurors in the case on Wednesday."
"The insight in the jury room came less than a week after the trial judge annulled the Cosby case, because jurors reported that they had reached a hopeless deadlock in the process of more than 50 hours of deliberation."
"Both jurors spoke anonymously because jurors were told not to comment on the proceedings in the jury room."
"However, another juror told CNN affiliate wpxi that jurors are in a" real impasse "and that the majority of the votes in the review are generally seven to five or five to seven."
"A juror told ABC News on Wednesday that 10 of the 12 jurors voted to convict Cosby of two counts of gross indecency, but two of the jurors continued to insist, leading to a deadlock and a void trial."
"Focus: two jurors gave conflicting statements about their debate. The names of the jurors were released on Wednesday after CNN's trial of Bill Cosby's attack was invalid. The two jurors gave different views on their deadlocked debate, emphasizing how different their views on the case may be... "
"Norris, Pa. - September 24: actor and comedian Bill Cosby returns to court after breaking up with spokesman Andrew Wyatt at Montgomery County Court, where he was sentenced in a sexual assault trial in Norristown, Pa., on September 24, 2018."



**Something goes wrong**
“...s split last year...”
“For the record rumors that he was inordinately chatting up ex wife Jennifer Aniston were also shot down as they hadn t contrary to what people wanted to believe completely iced each other out of their lives prior to Pitt...”
“Entertainment as a producer...”
“Also in April an insider denied that Pitt was engaging in some serious flirting with Sienna Miller during a group dinner following the Hollywood premiere of her latest movie The Lost Season of Z which counts Pitt s Plan B”
“News that he wasn't dating just yet but was going "out with friends."”
“A source told E!”
“Back in April he was reportedly "dating a bit."”
“And by all accounts, Pitt is readyish to mingle.”
“That's going to be the name of the game for Brad Pitt, newly single after close to two decades of slightly overlapping monogamy and—so the photographers hope—ready to mingle amid his divorce from Angelina Jolie.”
“Sienna who?”


__ She broke up last year... "
"The rumor that he and his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston, talked too much about each other was also rejected, because they didn't go against what people hoped, and their lives were completely frozen before Pete..."
"Entertainment as a producer..."
"Also in April, an insider denied that Pitt had a serious flirtation with Sienna Miller at a group dinner after the Hollywood premiere of his latest film, season Z lost, which is Pitt's plan B
"He hasn't dated yet, but he's going out with a friend."
"A source told me!"
"It's reported that as early as April, he was" a bit dated. "
"And, according to everyone, Pete is happy to socialize."
"It's going to be the name of Brad Pitt's game, who has just been single after nearly 20 years of slightly overlapping monogamy, so photographers hope he's ready to mix in with Angelina Jolie's divorce."
"Sienna who?"



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...recently...”
“In part because she's Beyonce.”
“And so does:"My body, my ice, my cash, all real, I'm a triple threat."”
“That line sounds innocuous enough as well as a round-about way of calling oneself number one but, as we'll explain, it appears to be a Kim Kardashian diss track.”
“"I break the internet, top two and I ain't number two."”
“The other individuals would be Jay-Z, DJ Khaled, and Future, one assumes.”
“Here are the lyrics in question:"I'm the only lady here, still the realest n--ga in the room."”
“In part, however, because her lyrics appear to be taking direct aim at Kim Kardashian.”
“But it's Queen Bey who's getting the most attention.”
“(And then there's another fairly direct call-out but we'll get to that in a moment)Let's start with that line about her body and her wealth and her ice being "all real."”


__ Recently... "
"Partly because she's Beyonce."
"My body, my ice and my money are real. I'm a triple threat."
"It sounds innocuous, and it's a circuitous way to call yourself number one, but as we'll explain, it seems to be a Kim Kardashian diss."
"I broke the Internet. I'm in the top two. I'm not second."
"The others may be Jay-Z, DJ Khaled and future, some people assume."
Here's the questionable lyrics: "I'm the only lady here, still the most real N-Ga in the room."
"Part of the reason, though, is that her lyrics seem to be directed at Kim Kardashian."
"But it's Queen Shelley who gets the most attention."
"(and then there's another fairly direct appeal, but we'll talk about that in a moment) let's start with the line that her body, her wealth and her ice are" all real. "



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Britney Spears has never been happier with boyfriend Sam Asghari and it seems the couple are getting even more serious.”
““Sam will be with Britney for [her] entire tour and they are more in love than ever,” a source exclusively reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““Even though Sam is younger than Britney, he is extremely nature for his age.”
“Don’t be surprised if they get engaged in the next year.”The news comes shortly after Asghari, 24, opened up about his relationship with the pop star, 36.”
““She motivates me more than anyone,” he told Men’s Health on July 17.”
““It’s crazy who I can be humbled by a person like her.”
“If I could be that humble when I’m that high in life, that would be the best thing.I grew up with three sisters and my personality is just to be a supportive person for my family and she’s family.”
“I’m always going to support her.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"Britney Spears and her boyfriend Sam asgali have never been so happy together. It seems that the couple have become more serious."
"Sam is going to spend the whole tour with Britney, and they love each other more than ever," a source told us exclusively in the new issue of us weekly
"Although Sam is younger than Britney Spears, he is extremely natural for his age."
"Don't be surprised if they get engaged next year." The news came shortly after the 24-year-old revealed his relationship with the 36 year old pop star
"She inspires me more than anyone else," he told men's health on July 17
"I'm crazy to be humiliated by people like her."
"It would be the best thing if I could be so modest when I was so high in my life. I grew up with three older sisters and my personality is to be a supporter of my family and her family. "
"I will always support her."



**Something goes wrong**
“Tell us now!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Kendall’s modeling decision?”
“The brunette beauty just launched her newest clothing line with Kylie and was recently spotted having some fun with rumored rapper beau, A$AP Rocky, 28, in Cannes.”
“In addition to modeling, Kendall has been busy with many other endeavors.”
“She wants to be known in her own right as a supermodel, to beat her own drum, and to make her own millions, away from the Kardashian family brand name,” our insider adds.”
“Kendall is grateful for the start in her career that the show gave her, it was a great springboard for her, but at the same time, it was a hiderence—and it’s not the thing that she wants to be known for in her life.”
“She feels like she’s finally getting there and that she’s now being booked because she’s Kendall the model, not just one of the Kardashians.”
““Kendall’s modeling career is going really amazing, and she’s worked so hard to be taken seriously.”
“With Kendall’s recent eye-catching moments in Cannes, it’s no surprise that she wants to flaunt what she’s got and make it her career goal.”
“Kendall will still make some appearances here and there in [KUWTK], and in Kylie’s new show, but only when she’s in town and around — she wants to limit her time on camera as much as possible,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Now tell us!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Kendall's decision to be a model?"
"The brunette has just launched her latest line of clothes with Kelly. Recently, it was discovered that she had a good time in Cannes with the legendary rapper Bo, a 28 year old Rocky."
"Kendall is busy with a lot of other work besides modeling."
Our insider added: "she wants to be known as a supermodel, to play drums, to make millions, and to stay away from the Kardashian brand."
"Kendall is very grateful that the play has given her the start of her career. It's a good springboard for her, but at the same time, it's also a secret. It's not something she wants to be known about in her life."
"She feels like she's finally there, and now she's booked because she's model Kendall, not just one of Kardashian."
"Kendall's modeling career is really wonderful. She works hard and is taken seriously."
"Because of Kendall's recent eye-catching moment in Cannes, it's no surprise that she wants to show off her strengths and make it her career goal."
A source told reporters: "Kendall will still be around (kutke) and Kelly's new show, but only when she's in and around the city - she wants to limit her time on camera as much as possible." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give us all your thoughts below!”
“Do you think he will ever want to date again?”
“However, an insider told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY Angie also doesn’t want to see him with someone new.”
““Even though [Angelina Jolie] wanted the split, she’s terrified Brad [Pitt] will move on and find love with someone new,” an insider told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It’s one of those she can’t live with him, and she can’t live without him, things.”
“Brad and Angie had scorching chemistry and she just can’t handle seeing him with another woman.”
“She definitely gets very jealous.”Oh, we are totally aware of the kind of chemistry that Brad, 53, and Angelina, 41, had when they were still together.”
“Their 10-year romance was fiery from the very beginning — back when they were filming Mr. & Mrs. Smith while Brad was still married to Jennifer Aniston, 48.”
“The kind of passion they had on screen had fans wondering if they had a thing for each other.”
“Those suspicions were confirmed when Brad left Jen for Angie and they embarked on a new life together in which they would have several children (both adopted and biological) and eventually get married.”


"Tell us what you think!"
"Do you think he'll want to date again?"
"However, an insider told reporters that Angie didn't want to see him with his new friends either."
"Although (Angelina Jolie) wants to break up, she's afraid Brad (Pete) will leave and find love with a new person," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"It's one of the things she can't live with him, and she can't live without him."
"Brad and Angie have a strong chemical reaction. She just can't stand to see him with another woman."
"She must be jealous." Oh, we know exactly how Brad, 53, reacts with Angelina, 41
"Their 10-year relationship was hot from the beginning - when Brad was still married to 48 year old Jennifer Aniston, and they were filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith
"Their passion on the screen makes fans wonder if they like each other."
"When Brad left Jane for angel, these suspicions were confirmed, they started a new life, they will have several children (adopted and natural) and eventually get married."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But right now, things don’t look good.”For more exclusive celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
“Originally, “Jessica had planned to raise their kids without nannies and even considered moving out of LA,” says the insider.”
““We believe in loyalty, honesty.”
“We like to have fun.”
“We like a lot of the same things,” Jessica Biel has said of her husband, Justin Timberlake.”
““He supports everything that I do.”
“And that’s [why] I think she’s such a wonderful partner.”But there’s one decision Justin just can’t support.”
““Jessica wants to wait to have more children,” an insider exclusively tells In Touch, “while Justin desperately wants another baby right now.” Before their 2012 wedding, Jessica promised the singer they’d have a big family, the insider says.”
“Then she had their son, Silas, 2, and now the 7th Heaven alum isn’t sure about baby No.”
“2.”


"But now, things don't look so good." For more exclusive celebrity news, check out the latest issue of in touch at the newsstand! "
"Initially," Jessica planned to raise her children without a babysitter and even consider moving out of Los Angeles, "the person said
"We believe in loyalty and honesty."
"We like to play."
"We like a lot of the same things," Jessica Bell said of her husband, Justin Timberlake
"He supported everything I did."
"That's why I think she's a good partner." But there's a decision Justin can't support
"Jessica wants to wait for more children," an insider told contact exclusively. "And Justin really wants another child now." Before their wedding in 2012, Jessica promised the singer that they would have a big family, people familiar with the matter said
"Then she gave birth to their two-year-old son Silas, and now alum in seventh heaven is not sure if the child is or not."
_2._



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, were you just as blown away as Taylor was over Selena’s rendition of “Wolves?” Let us know what you think in the comments below.”
“Check out these sexy pics of the best dressed celebs, including Selena, who were in attendance at the AMAs.”
“After her brave AMAs performance, Selena received some well deserved praise for intrepidly finishing her set after suffering a minor wardrobe malfunction, in which she accidentally showed off her underwear.”
“One thing’s for sure: Taylor thinks Selena’s moment in the spotlight was all about Selena rising to the occasion.”
“Selena’s AMA appearance was challenging so Taylor was completely supportive and happy for her dear friend.” We reported earlier how fans of Diana Ross, 73, dragged Taylor for her video tribute message, after some thought it was Taylor just trying to make Diana’s moment all about Taylor.”
““Taylor felt proud to be Selena’s friend, and she enjoyed watching her get back to her love performing her music live for her fans.”
““Taylor is touched and moved by Selena’s resilience,” the source went on to say.”
“Taylor has nothing but pride for her friend according to our source...”
“Taylor is totally inspired by Selena s courageous return to performing live our source said After seeing her dear friend endure a traumatic health crisis Taylor was blown away to then see Selena work hard to return to the AMAs with an emotional live performance When it comes to Selena...”
“A source EXCLUSIVELY told us that she thought her friend Selena Gomez, 25, slayed it in her AMAs performance of “Wolves,” especially considering it was her big return after her kidney surgery.”


"Hollywood stars, are you as shocked as Tyler was when Selena sang wolf? "Please let us know what you think in the comments below."
"Take a look at these sexy photos of the best dressed celebrities, including Serena, who have all joined the AMAS."
"After her brave Armas performance, Selena bravely completed her set after a small wardrobe failure. In that accident, she accidentally displayed her underwear and received some well deserved praise."
"One thing is for sure: Tyler thinks that Serena's moment in the spotlight was all about Serena's ability to cope."
"Serena's appearance at AMA is challenging, so Taylor is totally behind her and happy for her dear friends." We reported earlier on how fans of Diana Ross, 73, pulled Taylor's video as a compliment. Some people thought Taylor just wanted Diana's moments to be about Taylor. "
"Tyler is proud to be a friend of Serena, and she also likes to watch Serena return to her love and perform her music for her fans."
"Taylor was moved and moved by Selena's resilience," the source continued
"According to our sources, Taylor is only proud of her friends..."
"Taylor was completely inspired by Serena's brave return to live performance. Our source said that after seeing her dear friend endure a traumatic health crisis, Taylor was blown away, and then saw Serena work hard and return to Mars. When talking about Serena, her emotional live performance..."
"A source told us exclusively that she thought her 25-year-old friend Selena Gomez killed her in AMAS' wolfs performance, especially considering that it was a big reward after her kidney surgery."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more in the video below.”
“"[It was] just some great photos that happen to have been taken in a white dress," the rep said.”
“While fans were quick to offer their congratulations, Miley's rep slammed the rumors, telling Us Weekly that the two hadn't secretly tied the knot.”
“RELATED: Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth Enjoy Dinner Together With Their Parents -- See the Pic!”
“"I'm so happy...you are happy @mileycyrus," he wrote alongside the pic, which many assumed to be a snap of Miley in her wedding dress.”
“Rumors first sparked that Miley had gotten married to her fiance, Liam Hemsworth, after Billy Ray posed the same image to his Instagram on Thursday, boasting about how happy he was for his daughter.”
“"Glad to see so many love @MileyCyrus the same as I do #happy."”
“Been at work #StillTheKing," he wrote alongside a snapshot of Miley wearing a white top.”
“Don't jump the gun.”
“WATCH: Miley Cyrus Explains Why She Wears Liam Hemsworth’s Engagement Ring"Whoa!”


"Please see more in the video below."
"(it's) just some great photos that happened to be taken in a white skirt," the representative said
"Although fans were quick to congratulate, Miley's representative attacked the rumor and told us weekly that they were not married in secret."
Related report: Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth have dinner with their parents - see photo! "
"I'm so happy You're so happy @ Miley Cyrus, "he wrote next to the photo, which many people think is a picture of Miley in her wedding dress
"On Thursday, Billy Ray revealed the same picture on instagram, boasting about how happy he was for his daughter. After that, rumors about Miley's marriage to fiance Liam Hemsworth first broke out."
"I'm glad to see so much love @ MileyCyrus is as happy as I am."
He wrote next to a snapshot of Miley in a white coat: "always at work, still king."
"Don't shoot."
Observation: Miley Cyrus explains why dailiam Hemsworth's engagement ring "Wow!"



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For a look back at Brangelina quotes from happier times, click through the gallery below.”
“That is how I’m coping.”
“The 41-year-old actress held back tears when opening up about her family, but sources reveal exclusively to Life & Style that Brad, 53, is furious by what he sees as her quest to repair her image.”
“MORE: Brad Pitt Wins Big Court Battle Against Angelina Jolie“He feels like the entire interview was Angie’s attempt to change the narrative that she was to blame for their divorce,” an insider says.”
““Brad didn’t think Angie was being genuine at all.”
“The dramatic pauses the tears he told his friends that he thought she was acting When asked by a BBC reporter while promoting her film First They Killed My Father if she would like to say something about her separation Angelina didn t elaborate but did call it a difficult...”
“...time We are a family and we will always be a family...”
“We will get through this time and hopefully be a stronger family for it.”
“MORE: The Biological Mother of Brad and Angelina’s Daughter Zahara Wants to Connect With the 12-Year-OldShe continued, “Many people find themselves in these situations … my focus is my children, our children, and my focus is finding this way through.”
“As we said, we are and forever will be a family.”


"To review the quotes from" happy time, "click on the gallery below."
"That's how I deal with it."
"The 41 year old actress held back tears when talking about her family, but sources revealed that Brad, 53, was angry at her attempt to repair her image."
"More: Brad Pitt won a big lawsuit with Angelina Jolie," said one person familiar with the matter. "He felt that the whole interview was the culprit for Angie's attempt to change their divorce."
"Brad thinks Angie is not sincere at all."
"Dramatic pause tears, he told his friends that he thought she was acting, when a BBC reporter asked her to promote her film, they killed my father, if she wanted to say something about her separation, Angelina didn't elaborate, but did say it was a difficult..."
__ When we are a family, we will always be a family... "
"This time we'll make it through and hope to be a stronger family."
"More: the biological mother of Brad and Angelina's daughter Zahara wants to connect with her 12-year-old," she added. "A lot of people find themselves in this situation My focus is on my children, our children, and my focus is on finding the way. "
"As we said, we are and will always be a family."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In fact, the 40-year-old actress didn't catch her half-naked husband in his dressing room with a girl, nor did Pratt ask for male or ugly female assistants.”
“The rep assures fans by telling Gossip Cop that it's "complete nonsense."”
“Faris' rep, however, says the above story made by National Enquirer is not true.”
“2" star "instantly registered a request to producers for male or very ugly female assistants."”
“The "Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“The source further claimed Faris yelled at her husband, "Can't they find a GUY to help you change your jock strap?"”
“An alleged source said Pratt could be heard giggling with the girl, before his angry wife rushed in.”
“The tabloid claimed the jealous Faris was surprised after she walked into his room and caught her barely-dressed husband with a costume girl.”
“The "Mom" star got angry because her husband was not alone in the room, according to the latest issue of National Enquirer.”
“Jan 20, 2017AceShowbiz - Anna Faris is allegedly "furious" at husband Chris Pratt after finding him half-naked in his dressing on the set of his new movie.”


"In fact, the 40 year old actress didn't catch her half naked husband with a girl in the dressing room, and Platt didn't ask for a male assistant or an ugly female assistant."
The representative assured fans that he told gossip police it was "complete nonsense."
"However, the representative of Faris said that the above statement made by the state inquirers was untrue."
"2" Star "immediately registered a female assistant who required the producer to be male or very ugly."
"Guardian of the galaxy"
The source further said that Faris yelled at her husband, "can't they find a man to change your sneaker straps?"
An alleged source said Platt and the girl could be heard giggling before his angry wife rushed in
"The tabloid said that the jealous Faris came into his room and was surprised to find his ragged husband with a make-up girl."
According to the latest issue of the National Enquirer, the "Mom" star is angry because her husband is not alone in the room
"In 2017, aceshowbiz Anna Faris was said to be" angry "with her husband, Chris Pratt, because she found him wearing half naked clothes on the new set."



**Something goes wrong**
“She stated, “He did tell me that he dated a girl for like three months that had my face all plastered over her whole bedroom so that’s kind of weird, right?"”
“...where she revealed that Blake confessed he once dated a girl who was a big fan of Gwen... like, a really big fan.”
“Gwen Stefani took to Instagram on Oct. 27 to show off her brand new sparkler on THAT finger, revealing that her longtime partner and fellow The Voice coach Blake Shelton had finally popped the question.”
“"Yes please!"”
“...the 51-year-old singer captioned a sweet snap of the pair kissing while Gwen flaunts her new bling.”
“Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton are engaged — details about their relationship:Now that the pair are finally ready to tie the knot, let's take a closer look at some of the details of their realtionship.”
“They got divorced within two months of each other.”
“Gwen was previously married to singer Gavin Rossdale for 13 years.”
“The former couple shares three sons together, Kingston (11), Zuma (9), and Apollo (4).”
“They announced their drama-filled separation in August 2015.”


"She said," he did tell me that he'd been dating a girl for three months and that my face was all over her bedroom. It's a bit strange, isn't it? "
__ She revealed that Blake admitted that he had dated a big fan of Gwen... Like, a big fan. "
"On October 27, Gwen Stephanie showed off a new flash on her finger on instagram, and she revealed that her old partner and voice coach Blake Shelton finally raised the question."
"OK, thank you!"
__︹ The 51 year old singer voiced the sweet moment of the kiss, while Gwen was showing off her new jewelry
"Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon are engaged - details of their relationship country: now that they are finally ready to get married, let's take a closer look at some of their real estate details."
"They divorced in two months."
"Gwen had been married to singer Gavin Rossdale for 13 years."
The first two have three sons, Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4)
"They announced a dramatic separation in August 2015."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“LA but girlfriend Sofia hasn t been spotted with them...”
“The reality star, who has Mason, Penelope and Reign with his ex, failed to raise a smile while treating Mason to some quality one on one time.”
“7 Scott Disick was seen out and about with Mason in LA today Credit: X17Online.comDressed down, Scott, 34, wore a pair of cargo trousers and a black top, while Mason, 7, held onto his hand.”
“Their outing comes after The Sun Online revealed that the eldest sister isn’t keen on Scott’s 19-year-old girlfriend meeting their children just yet – and has told Scott to keep Sofia away.”
““Kourtney is a fierce mom, and she’ll do whatever it takes to protect her kids,” says the insider.”
““She doesn’t want them getting confused by Scott’s new girlfriend – Mason is seven, old enough to understand a lot of things now, and Kourtney doesn’t want them meeting another one of Scott’s new girlfriends, only for her to disappear from their lives in a month.”
“7 The usually cheerful Scott looked in a contemplative mood Credit: X17Online.com7 Kourtney with her two youngest children, Reign and Penelope Credit: Fame Flynet“Plus, it would kill her to see another woman ‘playing mom’ to her kids in public.”
“It would break her heart.”
““These past few months have been tough – she’s had to co-parent with Scott, and keep things nice between mom and dad.”


__ E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"Los Angeles, but girlfriend Sophia hasn't been found with them yet..."
The reality TV star, who owns Mason, Penelope and her ex boyfriend, failed to smile when he entertained Mason one-on-one
"7 Scott Disick was seen online with Mason in Los Angeles today. Com down, Scott, 34, was wearing a pair of cargo pants and a black coat, while Mason, 7, held his hand
"Before their trip, the Sun reported online that the eldest sister didn't want Scott's 19-year-old girlfriend to see their children and told him not to let Sophia get close."
"Courtney is a fierce mother and she will protect her children at all costs," the person familiar with the matter said
"She didn't want them to be confused by Scott's new girlfriend - Mason was seven years old and now understood a lot of things, Courtney didn't want them to meet Scott's new girlfriend again, and she disappeared from their lives a month later."
Com7 Courtney and her two youngest children, Revan and Penelope credit: fame flynet "in addition, seeing another woman 'playing mother' to her child in public would kill her."
"It will make her sad."
"The past few months have been tough - she had to be a parent with Scott and be friendly with her parents."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[We’ve had] a bit of FaceTime to ease it in you know.””
“He revealed: "Not yet no.”
“Get a daily email direct to your inbox with our newsletter Sign up Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailGwen Stefani has shut down rumours she's been "dumped" by Blake Shelton.”
“The No Doubt singer took to Instagram to share a picture of her country singer beau kissing her cheek.”
“The loved-up snap is a clear message that their relationship is still on - after claims she was dumped over "jealousy and drama" to do with her ex-husband Gavin Rossdale.”
“"Blake’s through with Gwen’s neediness and all the drama: her demanding, critical ex-husband and her jealousy of him and other women," a source told In Touch Weekly .”
““She told him she didn’t want to spend her life in fear of her famous partner cheating on her."”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Image GC Images Image Instagram The source added Blake told Gwen that he was going to be doing the latter part of the month long Country Freaks Tour without her...”
“...said the source...”
“"Gwen was so used to accompanying him on tour, she was upended.”


"[we have] a little FaceTime to ease you know."
"Not yet," he revealed
"I receive an email every day, which is sent directly to your in box and our newsletters registration. Thank you for subscribing to our newsletters. We have more newsletters to let me see our invalid privacy notice email. Gwen Stephanie has closed the rumor that she was" dumped "by black Sheldon."
"There's no doubt that the singer shared a picture of country singer Bo kissing his cheek on instagram."
"This love affair shows clearly that their relationship is still going on - she was dumped for her" jealousy and drama "with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale
"Blake has seen Gwen's needs and all her plays: her harsh, critical ex husband, and her jealousy of him and other women," a source told in touch weekly
"She told him she didn't want to spend her life worrying about her famous partner cheating on her."
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now image GC image instagram source added that Blake told Gwen that he would go on the second half of a month's country freak tour without her..."
__ The source said
"Gwen was so used to touring with him that she was subverted."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementIt seems like we will get multiple opportunities to see both Alex Rodriguez and Michael Strahan on television in the future.”
“In addition to GMA, Strahan is also the host of the $100,000 Pyramid, and he co-hosts FOXs NFL pregame show during football season.”
“Sources say that the move comes after Strahan got upset over the addition of future baseball Hall-Of-Famer Alex Rodriguez as a GMA contributor.”
““Tell your friends, tell your family, tell the whole town, shout it from the rooftops,” Strahan tweeted.”
““Starting September 10th @sarahaines and I will be hosting the 3rd hour of @GMA!”
“#gmaday #gma”Strahan has been a popular part of the morning news show since he left his job as co-host of Live!”
“...with Kelly Ripa in 2016.”
“But recently, when the network hired Rodriguez without his input, he was not happy and felt threatened by the move.”
“We’re so excited to announce that @michaelstrahan and @sarahaines will be co-hosts of #GMADay – our new third hour, premiering Sept. 10 at 1pm ET / 12pm C/P!”
“...https://t.co/W5KClVZvJP pic.twitter.com/z9GkaM5irv — Good Morning America (@GMA) July 23, 2018Instead of battling Rodriguez for airtime – or being worried about the former baseball player taking his place – Strahan made the move to the spinoff, and his future co-host is excited about the new show.”


"It seems that we will have a lot of opportunities to see Alex Rodriguez and Michael Strahan on TV in the future."
"In addition to GMA, Strahan is also the host of the $100000 pyramid. He co hosted fox NFL's pre game show during the football season."
"It's been reported that Strahan is upset about future Hall of fame player Alex Rodriguez joining the GMA contributors."
"Tell your friends, tell your family, tell the whole town, shout out from the roof," Strahan tweeted
"From September 10, @ sarahaines and I will host the third hour of @ GMA!"
Since he quit his job as live co host, Strahan has been a hot part of the morning news
__︹ Working with Kelly Ripa in 2016. "
"But recently, when the network hired him without Rodriguez's participation, he was not happy and felt threatened by the move."
"We are very pleased to announce that @ michaelstrahan and @ sarahaines will co host gmaday, our new third hour, premiere at 1:00 p.m. / 12:00 p.m. EST on September 10!"
_... https://t.co/W5KClVZvJPpic.twitter.com/z9GkaM5irv- Good morning, USA (@ GMA) on July 23, 2018, Strahan did not compete with Rodriguez for broadcast time, nor did he worry that the former baseball player would replace him, but chose another position, and his future co host was excited about the new program



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His renewed relationship with Jen has been a huge source of support and comfort through the toughest year of his life.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““Brad’s leaning on her as a confidante now.”
““Brad wouldn’t dream of breaking up Jen’s marriage,” a source told In Touch last month.”
“This comes on the heels of reports that Jen reconnected with her ex-husband, Brad Pitt, after splitting in 2005 when he met Angelina Jolie on the set of Mr. & Mrs. Smith.”
“They seemed to be so smitten at the sight of children.” We certainly hope they can work things out — because we’d love to see them become parents together!”
“An eyewitness spotted them at Emilio’s Ballato in NYC and recalled, “When I picked up my son, Justin pointed at him and motioned to Jen, and she turned around to smile at him.”
“Fortunately, the source continued, “They’re trying to work it out.”(Photo Credit: Getty Images)Fans may be somewhat shocked by this, considering last month Life & Style revealed the Wanderlust co-stars had a case of baby fever.”
“...her time there with him when she wasn t filming...”
“Jen loves Justin but she just doesn t want to live in the Big Apple any more than she has to said a source adding the Friends alum has given NYC her best shot The Leftovers star is a big apple boy and they originally agreed that Jen would spend...”
“Life & Style can exclusively reveal that Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux — who tied the knot in August 2015 after several years of dating — are clashing over living in the big NYC.”


"In the most difficult year of his life, his new relationship with Zhan was a huge source of support and comfort." For more information, please read the latest issue of life and style - for more exclusive content, please sign up for our newsletters
"Brad thinks of her as a confidant now."
"Brad would never dream of breaking up with Jane," a source said in contact magazine last month
Previously, it was reported that Jennifer and her ex husband Brad Pitt met Angelina Jolie on the set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2005, and the two broke up and re established contact
"As soon as they see their children, they are so obsessed," we certainly hope that they can solve the problem - because we really want to see them become parents together
"When I picked up my son, Justin pointed to him and motioned to Jan, and she turned to smile at him," recalls a witness who found them in balato, Emilio, New York
"Fortunately, the source went on," they're trying to solve this problem. " (photo source: Getty Images) fans may have been shocked by last month's life and fashion magazine's revelation of the case of baby fever in the co stars of "Tramp."
__ The time she spent with him when she wasn't filming... "
"Cherish Justin, but she just doesn't want to live in big apple than she said, a source added that friends and alumni gave her best shot in New York City. The leftover female star is a big apple boy, and they initially agreed that Jane would spend..."
According to the exclusive report of life and fashion, Jennifer Aniston and Justin serrux married in August 2015 after dating for several years, and the two clashed because they lived in New York



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Sun also reported that sources close to Pitt have denied the dating rumors and said that he and Lawrence are not together.”
“The two ended their relationship in August of 2014.”
“Prior to dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28-year-old “X-Men” co-star, Nicolas Hoult, for five years off and on.”
“Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a short fling with Coldplay lead singer and ex-husband a Gwyneth Paltrow, Chris Martin — Paltrow being another common thread between her and Brad.”
“But age hasn’t seemed to stop Lawrence before.”
“According to The Sun, Lawrence broke up with Aronofsy after a year of dating due to their great difference in age.”
“However, the tabloid checking website Gossip Cop reported that despite reports about the two A-listers becoming a pair, for now the rumors remain just rumors.”
“The source added that Pitt was nervous to contact Lawrence, but was encouraged by friends to make the first move.”
“There’s an intense connection between them!”An insider also told the magazine that Pitt allegedly reached out to Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend.”
“[They] have been enjoying lots of late nights together.”


"The sun also reported that sources close to Pitt denied rumors of a date and said he was not with Lawrence."
"The two ended their relationship in August 2014."
Before dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28 year old X-Men partner Nicholas Holt intermittently for five years
Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a brief relationship with Gwyneth Paltrow, the lead singer and ex husband of Coldplay. Chris Martin Paltrow is another common clue between her and Brad
"But age never seemed to stop Lawrence."
According to the sun, Lawrence and aronofs broke up after a year of dating because of a big age gap
"However, the tabloid censorship website gossip police report that despite reports that two first-line stars have become a couple, the current rumors are still just rumors."
"The source added that Pete was nervous about contacting Lawrence, but encouraged by his friends, he was the first to act."
"There is a close connection between them! "An insider also told the magazine that Pete was said to have contacted Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend."
"(they) spent many late nights together."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mirror Celeb has contacted Tesco for comment.”
“Onlookers were shocked to see the couple, wearing winter coats and woolly hats, walking the streets, accompanied by just one protection officer.”
“...together...”
“The Shimmer and Sparkle Cocktail Party Trivia Game, which is advertised on supermarket Tesco's website, could have upset the Royal family with this embarrassing gaffe.”
“Whoever made the game seemingly doesn't know the difference between Prince William and his younger brother Harry.”
“Whoops!”
“It gave a group of friends settling down for a round of Christmas trivia a good laugh though.”
“(Image: WENN.com)The question reads: "Prince Harry and Kate Middleton welcomed their second child in 2015, a girl named?"”
“It gives the answer as "Charlotte", which would be right, if Harry were her father.”
“Of course it's Kate's husband and Harry's big brother, Prince William, who welcomed his baby girl into the world last year.”


"Mirror celebrity has contacted Tesco for comment."
"The onlookers were shocked to see the couple in winter clothes and wool hats walking in the street, accompanied only by a protector."
__ Together... "
"The glitzy cocktail party trivia advertised on the supermarket Tesco website may upset the royal family because of this embarrassing gaffe."
"Whoever made the game doesn't seem to know the difference between Prince William and his brother Harry."
"Oh dear!"
"But it's a funny opportunity for a group of friends to settle down for Christmas trivia."
"(image: Wenwang) the question is:" Prince Harry and Kate Middleton have their second child in 2015, one named? "
The answer is "Charlotte." if Harry is her father, that's right
"Of course, Kate's husband and Harry's elder brother, Prince William, welcomed his baby girl into the world last year."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"American Idol" is set to premiere in early 2018 on ABC.”
“On the revived show, Katy will be joined by fellow coaches Lionel Richie and Luke Bryan.”
“Oct 20, 2017AceShowbiz - Katy Perry seemingly doesn't want to get reminded of her enemy Taylor Swift any where and any time, including on "American Idol" revival.”
“Now that she serves as one of the judges on the ABC show, the "Swish Swish" singer reportedly bans the contestants from singing any of Taylor's song.”
“However, a source explains to Naughty Gossip that it's not because she hates the "Look What You Made Me Do" singer, but because Katy wants to keep the spotlight on the show and the contestants.”
“"Katy wants the show to be about finding new talent not the ongoing drama between her and Taylor," reveals the source.”
“The source continues saying, "If someone auditioning sings a Taylor song then the whole thing becomes about Katy's reaction, not the person auditioning."”
“Katy reportedly "is insisting on a drama-free 'idol'."”
“In addition, "she's not exactly upset that people will be singing her hits and not Taylor's."”
“Meanwhile, Ryan Seacrest once again will host the show, which previously aired on FOX for 15 seasons since 2002 until 2016.”


American Idol will premiere on ABC in early 2018
"Katie will join other coaches, Lionel Ritchie and Luke Bryan, in the revival show
"On October 20, 2017, aceshowbiz - Katie Perry doesn't seem to want to think of her enemy Taylor Swift anywhere and at any time, including in the revival of American Idol."
"Now she's one of the judges on ABC, and it's reported that the" whoosh "singer has banned any of Taylor's songs from contestants."
However, one source explained to the mischievous gossip that it was not because she hated the "see what you ask me to do" singer, but because Katie wanted to focus on the show and the contestants
"Katie wants the show to be about finding new talent, not the ongoing drama between her and Taylor," revealed the source
The source continued, "if someone tries to sing Taylor's song, then the whole thing becomes Katie's reaction, not the person who tries."
According to reports, Katie "insists on an" Idol "without drama."
Besides, "people will sing her songs instead of Taylor's, and she's not very sad."
"Meanwhile, Ryan Seacrest will host the show again, which has been on Fox for 15 seasons from 2002 to 2016."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rymir happens to be an aspiring rapper ... who's posted vids of himself rhyming.”
“It's unclear what that fraudulent info is -- but there are reports that Jay is refusing to take a paternity test.”
“Rymir and Lillie Coley -- who calls herself his legal guardian -- say in a civil suit ... Jay Z submitted fraudulent information to the court ... to intentionally torpedo Rymir's paternity claim.”
“The guy's name is Rymir Satterthwaite and he claims his mother hooked up with Jay back in the early '90s -- before he was world famous, and long before Beyonce was in the picture.”
“Breaking NewsJay Z had a love child 21 years ago and is now blocking the guy's efforts to prove he's the son of the rap mogul ... according to legal docs.”


"Remille happens to be an aspiring rapper... He sent a video of his own rhyme. "
"It's not clear what the fraudulent information is - but there are reports that Jay refused to accept paternity testing."
"Remille and Lily Corley - who claimed to be his legal guardian - said in the civil action... Jay z filed fraud information with the court... Deliberately sabotaging rimir's parenthood. "
"This guy's name is rimir satsvait, and he claims that his mother was dating Jay in the early 1990s - before he became famous and before Beyonce appeared in the picture."
"News flash" jay z had a beloved son 21 years ago, but now he has stopped this guy's efforts to prove that he is the son of a rap tycoon... According to the legal documents. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Swift has wasted no time taking advantage of these unique circumstances.”
“With Kim Kardashian busy dealing with West’s sharp turn into Trump country, it’s unlikely that this manipulation will backfire on Swift like it did last time.”
“Since “Bad Blood” is a banger, people seemed to overlook the fact that the mean-spirited video was completely at odds with the girl power feminism that Swift and her girl squad allegedly stood for.”
“George in sheep s clothing In a move that basically made Perry s point for her Swift assembled her squad of models to star alongside her in the Bad Blood music video literally ganging up on Katy Perry...”
“...put it she basically tried to sabotage an entire arena tour In keeping with the PG nature of this beef which felt more like an argument staged through AIM away messages than a public showdown between two adults Perry responded with a Mean Girls reference Watch out for the Regina...”
“She would come up to me at awards shows and say something and walk away and I would think Are we friends or did she just give me the harshest insult of my life Eventually it was confirmed that Perry hired some of Swift s backup dancers or as Swift...”
““For years, I was never sure if we were friends or not,” Swift said.”
“In a Rolling Stone interview, Swift revealed the circumstances behind her single “Bad Blood,” referencing an unnamed female peer.”
“When this feud first flared up in 2014, it seemed like a perfect match-up between two major pop stars.”
“As an example, let’s look at Taylor Swift vs. Katy Perry.”


"Swift didn't waste time taking advantage of these unique environments."
"Given Kim Kardashian's preoccupation with the rapid transformation of the West into a trump state, this manipulation is unlikely to be as counterproductive to swift as it was last time."
"Since bad blood is a violent film, people seem to ignore the fact that this caustic video is totally inconsistent with the feminism represented by swift and her women's team."
"George in sheep's clothes at a point that basically makes Perry, she quickly assembled her modeling team, in the bad blood music video, the stars around her really unite Katie Perry..."
"To put it bluntly, she basically wants to destroy the whole arena tour, which is in line with the nature of PG beef, which feels more like a public showdown between two adults through information outside the destination. Perry responded that a mean girl should be careful of Regina..."
"She'll come up to me at the awards ceremony, say something, and then walk away, and I'll think, are we friends, or is she just giving me the most severe insult in my life, and finally proving that Perry hired some of Swift's backup dancers or swift..."
"For years, I didn't know if we were friends," swift said
"In an interview with Rolling Stone magazine, swift revealed the situation behind her single bad blood and mentioned an unknown female colleague."
"When the feud first broke out in 2014, it seemed to be a perfect match between two major pop stars."
"For example, let's look at Taylor swift and Katie Perry."



**Something goes wrong**
“Most of all for him probably.””
“4”: “We were filming on the river bank in Paris, and we have to kiss, and then the paparazzi [were] taking pictures.”Kirby said she and Cruise haven’t talked about it: “It was embarrassing.”
“I was like, that was fast!”She recalled some outlets were reported she was “in line to be wife No.”
“It would be hilarious to have parties every week.”Kirby also responded to rumors that she’s dating her “Mission: Impossible — Fallout” co-star Tom Cruise: “I had met him once in a room full of people!”
““Can you imagine if she was [queen]?”
““Margaret was known as the rebel and the naughty one ... the fun one!” Kirby said of her role.”
“...lower Kirby said she feels lucky to play Margaret and mused about how Britain would be different if the Margaret switched roles with her sister...”
“I was like What do I do I poured myself a drink she was kind of quite a trailblazer in that sense where she didn t care what people thought Kirby said she emulated Princess Margaret with lots of herbal cigarettes without tobacco or nicotine and my voice got much...”
““We couldn't do that, and I didn't know what to do with my hands,” Kirby said.”
““It was proper chain smoking… Because of that, it was just... in her body language, and it was her defense and very much utterly ... part of her image.”Kirby says there was only one scene where she wasn’t smoking — when Princess Margaret was pregnant!”


"Probably the most important thing is him."
"4": "we shoot on the banks of Paris, we have to kiss, and then the paparazzi take pictures." Kirby said she and cruise hadn't talked about it yet: "it's embarrassing."
"I think that's too fast! She recalled that some media reports said she was "waiting in line to be a wife."
"It's funny to have parties every week." Kirby also responded to a rumor that she was dating Tom Cruise, CO star of mission: the dust of the impossible: "I met him once in a room full of people!"
"Can you imagine if she was (the queen)?"
"Margaret is known as a traitor and a mischief... The funny one! "Kirby said of her role."
__ Next, Kirby said that she felt lucky to play Marguerite and thought about how Britain would be different if Marguerite and her sister changed roles... "
"I think what should I do? I poured myself a glass of wine. She is a very pioneering person. In this sense, she doesn't care what people think. Kirby said that she imitated Princess Margaret and smoked a lot of herbal cigarettes without tobacco or nicotine. My voice became very loud... "
"We can't do it, I don't know what to do with my hands," Kirby said
"It's normal chain smoking Because of this, it's just... With her body language, this is her defense, very thorough... Kirby said there was only one scene where she didn't smoke, and that was when Princess Margaret was pregnant



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“E-L-L-E!”Clue 4: During that same appearance, Ellen also suggested that she name the baby “Three” for baby number three, which may have sparked the train of thought to consider the numeral symbolism “V” in her family tree.”
“Clue 3: Fans may also recall that when Kim made an appearance on the show, Ellen had fans scream out suggestion for KKW beauty founder and at one point someone screamed out “Elle” and Ellen agreed saying, “Elle that’s a good one!”
“...double entendre...”
“Clue 2 As some may know Elle also means She in French and Kim confirmed that she was having a girl on the Ellen DeGeneres show earlier this month as well as on her website when she announced the arrival of their daughter saying She is here Was this a...”
“This seems like a strong possibility because the new addition makes five at the West household as she joins big brother Saint, 2, and big Sister North, 4.”
““L” which sounds like “Elle” and “V” which is the roman numeral number for five.”
“Clue 1: The reality star posted a picture of the Louis Vuitton logo—LV.”
“Photo credit: BACKGRIDOn Wednesday the Keeping up with the Kardashian star posted a cryptic photo to her Instagram account that appears to be hinting at the name of her daughter— and based on these indications we believe the baby’s name is Elle V. West.”
“...dying to know what the couple has decided to name their baby girl...”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West welcomed their third child and second daughter via surrogate earlier this week and now that the baby is here fans are dying to know andwelcomed their third child and second daughter via surrogate earlier this week and now that the baby is here fans are...”


__-L-L-E锛 Clue 4: in the same appearance, Ellen also suggested that she name baby No. 3 "three", which may lead people to think about the number symbol "V" in her genealogy
"Clue 3: fans may remember that when King appeared on the show, Allen made fans scream for advice to the founder of kkw beauty. Once someone screamed out" Elle ", and Allen agreed," Elle is a great idea! "
__ Pun... "
"Clue 2, some people may know that eller also means she confirmed in French and Kim that she had a girl in Ellen DeGeneres shown earlier this month, as well as on her website, when she announced their daughter had come, saying she was here as a..."
"It seems to be a big possibility because of the addition of five new families in the west, as she joins big brother saint, 2, and big sister north, 4."
"L" sounds like "Elle", while "V" is the Roman number of five
"Clue 1: the reality star posted a picture of Louis Vuitton's logo Lv."
"Photo source: backgridon Wednesday, the Kardashian star posted a mysterious photo on instagram, which seems to imply her daughter's name - based on these signs, we believe the child's name is Elle v. West."
__ Eager to know what the couple decided to name their baby girl
"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West had their third child and second daughter by surrogacy earlier this week, and now the child is here, fans are eager to know, and they have their third child and second daughter by surrogacy earlier this week, and now the child is here, fans are..."



**Something goes wrong**
““It’s a relationship that works for her.””
“Suri, her 12-year-old daughter with Cruise, was with her, as was a friend and their nanny.”
“But it’s questionable whether the “Dawson’s Creek” alum has found that with Jamie Foxx, with multiple reports suggesting that the Oscar-winning actor hasn’t been able to let go of his flirtatious, bachelor ways.”
““No one understands why Katie loves a man who can’t seem to commit or why he’s publicly humiliating her like this,” an insider told Us magazine.”
““Everyone just wants her to take care of herself and to be happy.”
“But she won’t let go of Jamie.”Foxx, 50, sparked breakup rumors earlier this month when he was spotted partying in Miami with multiple women, while Holmes, 39, was in Paris for Fashion Week.”
“Foxx also was seen getting close to his ex-girlfriend Kristin Grannis on July 4 when they watched fireworks together in Malibu.”
“On top of that, the “Ray” actor was hit with allegations that he got rough with a woman during a sexual encounter in Las Vegas 2002 and tried to force her to have oral sex with him.”
“While TMZ reported that Foxx won’t face charges in that case because the statute of limitations had run out, Holmes is reportedly unhappy with his other behavior around women, Us magazine reported.”
“Nonetheless, Holmes is not ready to give up on the relationship, because she’s “absolutely smitten” with him, the insider told Us.”


"It's a relationship that works for her."
Her 12-year-old daughter Suri, who was with cruise, was with one of her friends and their nanny
"But whether the alumni of Dawson Creek found out about Jamie fox is questionable. Many reports show that the Oscar winning actor has not been able to get rid of his frivolous and single style."
"No one understands why Katie loves a man who doesn't seem to be able to promise, or why he publicly humiliates her like this," one insider told America magazine
"Everyone just wants her to take care of herself and be happy."
"But she won't let Jamie go." Earlier this month, fox, 50, was found gathering with women in Miami, while Holmes, 39, was in Paris for fashion week, sparking rumors of a breakup
"On July 4, Fox and his ex girlfriend Christine Grannis were watching fireworks together in Malibu, and they were also seen approaching."
In addition, the "Ray" actor was accused of having sex with a woman during a one-time encounter in Las Vegas in 2002 and trying to force her to have oral sex with him
While TMZ reported that Foxx would not face charges because the statute of limitations had passed, Holmes was reported to be dissatisfied with his other behavior around women, according to US magazine
"Despite this, Holmes is not ready to give up the relationship because she is" totally obsessed "with him, the person told us



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"He told us he was excited to be at the birth and back looking the part in scrubs after his days on ER."”
“She joked: "George is sedated and should recover in a few days.”The pal added: “We all laughed at George’s statement.”
“After the twins’ birth at the £8,000-a-night Kensington wing of the Chelsea and Westminster Hospital, Clooney’s publicist said: "Ella, Alexander and Amal are all healthy, happy and doing fine".”
“Clooney, 56, also spent £100,000 with an interior decorator to install a Simon Horn nursery suite and work to baby-safe the pad is said to have cost £800,000.”
“(Image: WIREIMAGE)Another two-man team will specifically monitor the property and a quick-response security driver is on call at £100,000 a year.”
“Ocean’s 11 hunk George has laid out £100,000 on a network of motion sensors and lasers to protect his £12million mansion in Sonning, Berks.”
“But they won’t be relying on just their eyes.”
“There’s been so much work done on the house ready for them.”(Image: DAVID BENETT/GETTY)The security men are said to have been briefed to accompany the family on outings, while also taking turns to protect the nursery.”
““He and Amal have really spoiled the twins.”
“"The ‘baby bouncers’ are just the start.”


"He told us that he was very happy to see the character when he was born, and after the day he went to the emergency room, he came back to scrubs."
"George has been sedated and will be fine in a few days," she joked "We all laughed at George's words," the friend added
"After the twins were born at the 8000 pound Kensington hospital at Chelsea and Westminster hospitals every night, Clooney's publicist said:" Ella, Alexander and Amar are healthy and happy, everything is fine. "
"The 56 year old also spent 100000 pounds with an interior decorator to install Simon horn's nursery and work for the baby safe, which is said to have cost 800000 pounds."
"(photo: WireImage) another two person team will be dedicated to monitoring the hotel, with a quick response security driver on call, earning 100000 a year."
"George, the No.11 handsome man of the ocean, has invested 100000 pounds on a network of motion sensors and lasers to protect his 12 million pound mansion in boxsonning."
"But they won't just rely on their own eyes."
"The house has done a lot of preparation for them." (photo: David Bennett / Getty) it is said that security personnel have been informed to accompany their families on trips and take turns to protect the nursery
"He and Amar really spoiled the twins."
"Baby bodyguard is just the beginning."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Photo: Getty Images)Read more from Yahoo Lifestyle:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“I have never thought in a limited way and I’m not going to start.”Madonna was criticized for her appearance at the 2016 Met Gala.”
“When the 53-year-old star attended Monday’s Met Gala 2018, Parker embodied the night’s theme, “Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination,” wearing a metallic-gold Dolce & Gabbana gown with a nativity scene headpiece, but her lavish look was overshadowed by nasty comments about her appearance.”
“On Twitter, Parker was likened to a senior citizen.”
“I didn’t realize Sarah Jessica Parker was 75 years old until I saw her at the Met Gala last night — Gigi Click (@GeegeClique) May 8, 2018Sarah Jessica Parker looked 80 years old last night.”
“Wtf.”
“Tina Moore TMoore8114 May 8 2018 Bright side Sarah Jessica Parker looked 60 years old Patty Rushing patty_guynn May 8 2018 On Instagram people were just as mean BIG put her through too much StressandTheCity Girl has aged She is overdue for fillers and Sarah darling the word for today...”
“...is MOISTURIZER And when Stefano Gabbana Instagrammed some red carpet looks commenters remarked that Parker looks older and scary It s no surprise that women of a certain age aren t exactly a draw in Hollywood...”
“One study conducted by the University of Southern California’s Media, Diversity, & Social Change Initiative found that of 1,256 film characters in the 25 Best Picture-nominated films from 2014 to 2016, only 11.8 were 60 years old or older.”
“And in half of the films that did feature a significant or supporting older character, the film contained lines that emphasized or joked about age.”


"(photo source: Getty Images) read more from Yahoo! Lifestyle: follow us on instagram, Facebook and Twitter to provide fresh inspiration for your feed every day."
"I've never had limited thinking, and I'm not going to start." Madonna has been criticized for her appearance at the metropolitan party in 2016
"When the 53 year old star attended the 2018 metropolitan party on Monday, Parker wore a metallic gold Dolce & Gabbana robe and a headdress for the scene of the birth of Jesus, reflecting the theme of the evening" celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination ", but her luxurious appearance was overshadowed by bad comments about her appearance."
"On twitter, Parker is compared to an old man."
"It wasn't until I saw Sarah Jessica Parker at the met party last night that I realized she was 75 years old - Gigi click (@ geegeclique) May 8, 2018 Sarah Jessica Parker looked 80 last night."
__tf__
"Tina Moore tmoore8114 May 8, 2018 bright side Sarah Jessica Parker looks 60 years old Patty rushpatty Gayne May 8, 2018 on instagram, people's equally despicable bigwigs put too much pressure on her, and the special girl is getting old, it's time for her to use stuffing, Sarah darling is today's word..."
__︹ When Stefano Gabbana released some red carpet looks on instagrammed, critics commented that Parker looks older and more terrifying. It's not surprising that women of a certain age are not attractive in Hollywood... "
"A study by the University of Southern California's media, diversity, & social change initiative found that only 11.8 of the 1256 movie characters in the 25 best picture nominations from 2014 to 2016 were 60 or older."
"In half of the films, there is an important or supportive role for the elderly, and this film contains lines that emphasize or ridicule age."



**Something goes wrong**
“...and chart topping 3x platinum Grammy winning Back to Basics to the present in which Aguilera is returning to music after serving as a judge on The Voice and acting in several movies and television shows...”
“From surviving the domestic violence she and her mother endured at the hands of her father when Aguilera was a child to freeing herself from the constraints of her teen pop image by wrestling creative control over her musical output with her blockbuster albums the 4x platinum Grammy winning Stripped...”
“Liberation is a fitting title for the eighth studio album from multi-platinum superstar artist Christina Aguilera, given that freeing herself from other people’s expectations is a significant theme that appears throughout the singer, songwriter, and actress’s remarkable life and career.”


__ And chart 3 platinum Grammy Awards recapture basically to the present, Aguilera is back to music after acting as a judge of sound and performing in several movies and TV shows... "
"Aguilera survived the domestic violence he endured with his mother in his father's hands when he was a child, and got rid of the creative control of music output with his best-selling album" four times the platinum Grammy Award ", so as to free himself from the shackles of teenagers' pop music image..."
"Emancipation is the right title for Christina Aguilera's eighth studio album, because emancipating yourself from the expectations of others is an important theme throughout the extraordinary lives and careers of singers, songwriters and actresses."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““All you want to do is hit a home run.””
““Baseball is just like life,” she said.”
“Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to walk down the aisle with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone.”
““I do believe in marriage,” the Shades of Blue actress, 48, told Harper’s Bazaar in a story published on Thursday, March 15.”
““And I would love to grow old with somebody in a committed relationship.”
“But I’m not forcing anything right now.”As far as her relationship with the 42-year-old former Yankees player, she said: “It’s good, it’s healthy; we communicate well.”
“We understand each other’s lives in a way that most other people couldn’t.”She added: “We both entered the public eye in our early twenties and overachieved right from the start.”
“And that affects every dynamic in your life, from your family to your work to your relationships.”
“We have a similar makeup.”The pair celebrated their anniversary in February in Minneapolis, where the singer performed a concert ahead of the Super Bowl.”
“During the show, she debuted her single “Us” written by Poo Bear and produced by Skrillex, and dedicated it to Rodriguez, who was in the audience.”


"You just want to hit a home run."
"Baseball is like life," she said
"Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to get married with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone."
"I do believe in marriage," the 48 year old "blue shadow" actress told Harper market in a report published on March 15 (Thursday)
"I also want to grow old with someone who has feelings."
"But I'm not forcing anything right now." On her relationship with the 42 year old former Yankee, she said: "it's good, it's healthy; we communicate well."
"Our understanding of each other's lives is beyond most people's comprehension," she added. "We all came into the public eye in our early 20s and made remarkable achievements from the beginning."
"It affects every aspect of your life, from family to work to relationships."
In February, the two celebrated their wedding anniversary in Minneapolis, where the singer gave a concert in front of the super bowl
During the performance, she released her first single "we", which was created by bear dung, produced by scrilex and dedicated to Rodriguez in the audience



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Back in 2009, the same story flew around Hollywood, but Emma Watson shut it down by saying that Robert Pattinson is just a good friend and a super-nice guy, adding he is great to work with.”
“AdvertisementThis isn’t the first time that rumors have spread about the former co-stars.”
“Then, after the pair presented together at the Golden Globe Awards, reports surfaced that the two went public with their relationship.”
“But, fans will be disappointed to find out that there is no truth to the story, and the claims that Pattinson and Watson are dating are completely false.”
“The problem is, celebrities don’t choose who they present with at an awards show.”
“So, the fact that Pattinson and Watson shared a few minutes on stage together in no way means the two are in a relationship.”
“The pair presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
“Now, there is a new twist to the rumor, with another publication telling a tall tale about Pattinson propositioning Watson for a one-night stand.”
“#RobertPattinson opens up: "This Halloween I walked into the most extreme, ah, fancy dress party.”
“I was absolutely normcore and it was the most humiliating experience of my life."”


"The same story spread all over Hollywood as early as 2009, but Emma Watson said Robert Pattinson was just a good friend and a super good person, adding that he was very suitable to work with him."
"This is not the first time there has been a rumor about a former co star."
"Later, after the two appeared together at the Golden Globe Awards, it was reported that they had made their love affair public."
"However, fans will be disappointed to find that there is no truth in the story and that Pattinson and Watson are dating completely false."
"The problem is that celebrities don't choose who to be with at the awards ceremony."
"So, Pattinson and Watson spent a few minutes on stage together, which does not mean that they are in love."
"The two presented the best TV movie or limited edition series award, which was won by HBO's little lies."
"Now, rumors have reached a new turning point, and another publication tells a fantastic story about Pattinson's offer of a one night stand to Watson."
Robert Pattinson said, "I went into the most extreme, ah, masquerade party on this Halloween."
"I'm absolutely normal. It's the most humiliating experience of my life."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To me, what makes life interesting is the search for the right balance between these two trends.”
“So the point is not that we need to activate large parts of our dormant brain but that we need to trigger more efficient neuronal connections between the many parts the secret is in increasing the pathways making them resonate...”
“They are, in a very real sense, the baby versions of NZT 48, the magic pill in Limitless.”
“The drugs increase the amount of dopamine in the brain, raising focus, libido and overall cognitive alertness.”
“But look at where we are now: millions of people, including children, are taking Adderall and Vyvanse, psychostimulants composed of different kinds of amphetamine.”
“We don't know, certainly not now.”
“Could a pill do such a thing?”
“...together in more creative ways...”
“Otherwise, we would have certainly evolved smaller brains, or brains that are less costly metabolically.”
“Perhaps here we can extract the true lesson of the movie and the novel: hard as it is, we must learn to accept our limitations while trying to constantly transcend them.”


"For me, what makes life interesting is finding the right balance between these two trends."
"So the key is not that we need to activate most of the dormant brain, but that we need to trigger more effective neuronal connections between many parts. The secret is to increase the pathways that make them resonate..."
"In a very real sense, they are the baby version of Nzt 48, infinite magic pills."
These drugs increase dopamine levels in the brain, increasing attention, libido and overall cognitive alertness
"But look at where we are now: millions of people, including children, are taking psychostimulants made up of different kinds of amphetamines, adral and vivance."
"We don't know. We certainly don't know now."
"Can a pill do this?"
__ Together in a more creative way... "
"Otherwise, we will definitely evolve a smaller brain, or a brain with lower metabolic costs."
"Maybe here we can learn a real lesson from this film and this novel: Despite the difficulties, we must learn to accept our limitations and strive to transcend them."



**Something goes wrong**
“It was just an idea."”
“It's thought the medication Kanye is referring to are necessary to keep him balanced - but TMZ reports his team are concerned he's not taking the right dosage.”
“...meltdown on a TMZ live stream and is concerned about what it means for her reputation...”
“Kanye appeared in the TMZ offices on Tuesday and let slip a number of bizarre claims - including that he's addicted to drugs after getting plastic surgery.”
“He also sparked fury across the world by claiming being a slave was "a choice" and gushing over US president Donald Trump.”
“In the jaw-dropping rant, Kanye claimed: "I was drugged the f**k out, bro, I was on opioids and I was addicted to opioids.”
“"Two days after I got off opioids, I [screeching noise] I'm in the hospital.”
“I had plastic surgery, I got liposuction for y'all, because I didn't want y'all to call me fat, like y'all called Rob [Kardashian] at the wedding, and made him fly home before me and Kim got married."”
“Kanye then went into a spiel about how a friend had told him to stop popping the pills because "they kill genius", but doctors upped his dose from two tablets a day to seven while he was in hospital.”
“"The reason why I dropped those tweets and everything, because I was drugged the f**k out, bro," he yelled while facing the TMZ newsroom.”


"It's just an idea."
"People think Kanye's drug is necessary to keep his balance, but TMZ reports that his team is worried that he is taking the wrong dose."
__ Collapse in TMZ live and worry about what it means to her reputation... "
"Kanye showed up at TMZ's office on Tuesday and revealed some bizarre stories - including his addiction to drugs after plastic surgery."
"He also claimed that being a slave was" a choice "and talked endlessly to us president trump, which aroused the anger of the whole world."
In an astonishing roar, Kanye claimed, "I'm under anesthesia, brother. I'm taking opioids. I'm addicted to opioids."
"Two days after giving up opioids, I was (screaming) in the hospital."
"I had plastic surgery and liposuction for you, because I didn't want you to call me fat, just like you called Rob (Kardashian) at the wedding and asked him to fly home before I got married to Kim."
Kenye then began to talk about how a friend told him to stop taking these pills because "they kill genius," but the doctor increased his dose from two tablets a day to seven during his stay in hospital
"I gave up twitter and everything because I was poisoned, brother," he yelled at the TMZ newsroom



**Something goes wrong**
“...source’s claim that Brad’s “the happiest he’s been in a long time.” We want that for him so badly!”
“One thing we do hope is true about this friendship — the OK!”
“Going from academia to potential celebrity status would be hard as hell for someone to experience!”
“Friends and family are constantly asking her about Brad which is something that she did not expect.” Totally understandable.”
“She feels like all eyes are on her in Boston and she is getting more attention than ever before.”
“Even if there were sparks between the two, Neri would never pursue a romantic relationship, a source close to the professor told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY “Neri is feeling the pressure of spending time with Brad.”
“Reports about Brad and Neri’s friendship started at the beginning of April, with Page Six claiming that the two met through an architecture project at MIT, where Neri’s a professor.”
“Brad and Neri’s friendship is strictly professional, and he was actually referred to her because of her amazing credentials, a source told HollywoodLife.”
“Don’t get your hopes up about these new friends, though.”
““Amal knows Neri through mutual friends and thought she and Brad would be the perfect fit,” the source said.”


__ Sources claim Brad is "the happiest he's been for a long time.". We very much hope that he will
"There's one thing we hope this friendship is true - OK!"
"From academia to potential celebrity status, it's hard for a person to experience it!"
"Friends and family often ask her about Brad, which she didn't expect." It's totally understandable
"She felt like all the eyes were on her in Boston, and she got unprecedented attention."
"Even if there is a spark between them, nery will never pursue a romantic relationship," a source close to the professor told Hollywood life exclusively. "Nery feels the pressure to be with Brad."
"The story about Brad and Nelly's friendship began in early April. Page 6 says they met through a construction project at MIT. Nelly is a professor at MIT."
"Brad and Nelly's friendship is strictly professional, and he actually introduced her because of her amazing qualifications," a source told Hollywood life
"But don't expect too much from these new friends."
"Amar met Neri through mutual friends and thought she and Brad would be perfect fit," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“The pair has been good friends ever since they worked together for Netflix's show 'Maniac'.”
“Emma looked flawless as she wore a navy dress with gold embellishments for the event, while Justin chose to keep his look a bit casual as he opted for an all-black ensemble.”
“After her marriage with Justin Theroux ended, she has been constantly in the limelight being scrutinized for her reactions on how her ex is moving on after the split.”
“A while ago it was Selena Gomez and now it is another actress who has been drawn into the picture.”
“The Friends actress is fed up with hearing news of Emma Stone and Justin's budding romance.”
“The actress is reportedly furious seeing how things are unfolding for Emma and Justin.”
“According to Radar Online, Jennifer is filled with 'furious rage' looking at both of them get close and taking various trips together.”
““It bugs the hell out of Jen that Justin got close to Emma during their marriage and she isn’t taking this lying down,” a source told the website.”
“Jennifer is not taking news about Emma and Justin well (Photo by Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images)It seems like Jennifer is taking every bit of help she can from her pals in order to get back at Emma.”
““She’s dragging Emma every chance she gets and warning pals like Jason Bateman and Jimmy Kimmel to avoid her," the source added.”


"They've been good friends since they worked together for Netflix's show crazy."
"Emma appeared flawless in a navy blue dress with gold decoration, while Justin chose the all black suit, so she chose to keep her casual look."
"After the end of her marriage with Justin Cyrus, she has always been the focus of attention because of her reaction to the life situation after her ex-wife broke up."
"It was Serena Gomez some time ago, and now it's another actress who's been drawn into the picture."
"The friends actress is fed up with the budding romance of Emma stone and Justin."
"It's reported that the actress was very angry when she saw the development of Emma and Justin."
"According to radar online, Jennifer was filled with" anger "when she saw the two of them walking very close and traveling together
"Justin was very close to Emma in their marriage, and Emma didn't turn a blind eye to it, which surprised Jen," a source told the website
"Jennifer doesn't know much about the news about Emma and Justin (Photo by Pascal lessegrett / Getty). It seems that Jennifer has got all the help she can get from her friends to get back to Emma."
"She drags Emma whenever she gets a chance and warns friends like Jason Bateman and Jimmy Kimmel to avoid her," the source added



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Written by Nick Riganas...”
“Is there an escape from the wall-less prison of the mind?”
“Now, the eerie stranglehold of insanity tightens.”
“Then, amid bad omens, a furious and unending squall maroons the pale beacon's keepers in the already inhospitable volcanic rock, paving the way for a prolonged period of feral hunger; excruciating agony; manic isolation, and horrible booze-addled visions.”
“For the following four weeks of back-breaking work and unfavourable conditions, the tight-lipped men will have no one else for company except for each other, forced to endure irritating idiosyncrasies, bottled-up resentment, and burgeoning hatred.”
“England...”
“As the wavering cry of the foghorn fills the air the taciturn former lumberjack Ephraim Winslow and the grizzled lighthouse keeper Thomas Wake set foot in a secluded and perpetually grey islet off the coast of late 19th century New...”


"By Nick rigana..."
"Have you escaped from the prison of mind without walls?"
"Now, the terrible strangulation of insanity is getting tighter."
"Then, in the ominous omen, a violent and endless gale trapped the guardians of the pale lighthouse in volcanic rocks that were no longer suitable for living, paving the way for long-term wild hunger, extreme pain, manic isolation and terrible drunken illusion."
In the next four weeks of hard work and adverse circumstances, the tight lipped men had no one else to accompany them except each other, and they were forced to endure annoying hobbies, repressed resentments and growing hatred
"England..."
"When the sound of the foghorn swayed in the air, the silent former woodcutter Ephraim Winslow and the gray lighthouse keeper Thomas wick set foot on an isolated and forever gray island off the coast of New York at the end of the 19th century..."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The other contenders included Swift, Maroon 5, Kanye West, Miley Cyrus, The Weeknd, Carrie Underwood and Spears.”
“However, a Pepsi executive who would help determine the performer shot down the rumor in July.”
“According to Us Weekly, the 36-year-old singer and actor is "finalizing" a deal with the NFL to headline the big event in Minneapolis, Minnesota, on Feb. 4.”
“It would mark his return to the stage after the infamous "Nipplegate" incident in in 2004, when he performed with Janet Jackson for his song "Rock Your Body" and accidentally tore part of her costume off and exposed her nipple to viewers watching all over the country.”
“According to the report, if Timberlake signs the deal, he is said to be performing solo, and won't be bringing any of his former collaborators in as surprise guests.”
“Photo: Getty ImagesOf course, Timberlake isn't the only performer whose name has been dropped as a performer for the 2018 show.”
“Here are five other artists who have been reportedly tapped to headline the event Jay Z Photo Getty Images There were numerous reports that a Jay Z and Justin Timberlake co performance was being sought out for the show with a chance that they would be collaborating together being very...”
“...high according to BET”
“It's unclear if Jay-Z was also being considered as a solo act, but he was recently reported to have turned down the gig.”
“Britney SpearsPhoto: Getty ImagesTimberlake's long-time ex was also previously rumored as a consideration for the show earlier this year, marking a potential return after her last performance in 2001.”


Other competitors include swift, chestnut 5, Kanye West, Miley Cyrus, weekend, Carly Underwood and spears
"However, this rumor was refuted in July by a Pepsi executive who will help determine the company's performance."
The 36 year old singer and actor is working on an agreement with the American Football League to host a major event in Minneapolis, Minnesota, on February 4, according to us weekly
"It will mark his return to the stage after the infamous nipplegate event in 2004, when he and Janet Jackson performed for his song rock your body, accidentally tearing off part of her costume and exposing her nipples to audiences from all over the country."
"It is reported that if Timberlake signs the agreement, it is said that he will sing solo and will not bring any former collaborators as surprise guests."
"Picture: of course, Timberlake is not the only performer to be disqualified from performing in 2018."
"It is reported that there are five other artists who have been selected as the headlines of this event. Jay z photo Getty Images has many reports that jay z and Justin Timberlake are looking for cooperation opportunities for this performance, and they are likely to cooperate..."
__ Bet high
"It's not clear whether Jay-Z is also considered a solo, but recently it was reported that he turned down the concert."
"Britney spearshoto: Getty stinbeck's ex girlfriend was also rumored to be a consideration for the show earlier this year, marking her possible return after her last performance in 2001."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is sticking with Seacrest as a red-carpet Oscars host, though sources told Page Six some stars may steer clear of him, while the network will line up only friendly interviews.”
“...it’s been a tough week.”E!”
“...a privilege to work with and I adore you She added that she is looking forward to seeing Seacrest on the Oscars red carpet and Speaking on behalf of all of us here I know what an easy professional great...”
“...person you are and I feel very very lucky to work with you each and every day Seacrest has denied claims that he sexually harassed his former stylist Suzie Hardy while she was employed by the E”
“...network.”
“Ripa’s endorsement came just a day after she appeared to take a dig at Seacrest on the show, with regards to the sexual-misconduct allegations plaguing him.”
“And insiders tell us that the duo’s relationship is not as sunny as it seemed on the show Thursday.”
“Said a source: “Kelly doesn’t want to risk anything happening to ‘Live’ .”
“.”


__︹ Insist on Seacrest as the Oscar red carpet host, but a source told page 6 that some stars may avoid him, while the TV station will only arrange friendly interviews
__ It's been a tough week. " E锛_
__ It's a great honor to work with you and I admire you, she added, adding that she's looking forward to seeing Seacrest on the red carpet at the Oscars and speaking on behalf of all of us, and I know what a relaxing career it is... "
__︹ You are such a person, I feel very lucky to be able to work with you every day, Seacrest denied that he was in E
__ Network. "
"The day before LiPA spoke, she seemed to have made a dig at Seacrest in the show, talking about the sexual misconduct charges that plagued him."
"And insiders tell us that the relationship is not as sunny as it was on Thursday's show."
"Kelly doesn't want to risk anything to be alive," a source said
_._



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her official Facebook page has more than 28 million likes and over 27 million followers.”
“She is the sixth most followed user on Twitter and the 28th most followed user on Instagram.”
“She came out as a lesbian in 1997.”
“Being a lesbian, she never got married to any man and never had a husband.”
“Her body size is 34-27-35, and her shoe size is 8 (US).Talking about Ellen’s sexual orientation, she is a lesbian.”
“She has blonde hair and blue eyes.”
“She weight 59 kg.”
“She has a perfect height that suits her personality so well.”
“She is French, English, German, and Irish descent.Ellen is 5 feet and 7 inches tall.”
“She later moved to Atlanta Texas after their parents divorced.”


"Her official Facebook page has more than 28 million likes and 27 million followers."
"She's the sixth most followed user on Twitter and the 28th most followed user on instagram."
"She made her debut as a lesbian in 1997."
"As a lesbian, she has never married any man and never had a husband."
"Her size is 34-27-35 and her shoes are 8 (USA). When it comes to Allen's sexuality, she's a lesbian
"She has blonde hair and blue eyes."
"She weighs 59 kilograms."
"Her height suits her personality very well."
She is French, British, German and Irish. Alan is five feet seven. "
"After her parents divorced, she moved to Atlanta, Texas."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She hasn’t looked this happy in a long time – or since the break up with Brad more than a year ago.””
““If you look at them together, Angie is clearly smitten.”
“And sources say the pair are a perfect match, spending hours talking Cambodian politics and charity opportunities.”
“American activist who wrote the memoir First They Killed My Father which Ange recently adapted into a film...”
“That s because both Maddox and praCh were born in Camodia but didn t grow up there Ange and paCh 38 who has been dubbed the first Cambodian rap star were first introduced by mutual friend Loung Ung the Cambodian...”
“He can teach him about his homeland of Cambodia in a way he can relate to.”Angelina and praCh, second from left.”
“A further source added, “PraCh is a great role model for Maddox.”
“They’re perfect for each other,” an insider revealed to National Enquirer.”
““Angelina and praCh have a special bond.”
“Buddism...”


"It's been a long time since she was so happy - or since she broke up with Brad more than a year ago."
"If you watch it together, Angie is obviously fascinated."
"The source said the two were a perfect match and spent hours talking about Cambodian politics and philanthropic opportunities."
"The first American activist to write a memoir. They killed my father. Angie recently adapted this memoir into a movie..."
"That's because both Maddox and prah were born in kamodia, but they didn't grow up there. Angu and patch 38 are known as the first Cambodian rap stars. They were first introduced by their common friend Lang ang, a Cambodian..."
"He can teach his hometown of Cambodia in a way that he can think of." Angelina and PRACH, second from left
Another source added: "prah is a great example of Maddox."
"They are perfect for each other," an insider told the national inquirer
"Angelina and PRACH have a special relationship."
"Buddhism..."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“9 They Have to Deal With a Lot of Humiliationvia:radaronline.comTo us the Kardashians might seem powerful; they are after all celebrities with millions of fans.”
“Khloe has the whole world giving opinions on her marriage and Kourtney is dealing with a very public breakup.”
“That is why it's no surprise that they have to invest millions of dollars in looking absolutely perfect every day.”
“13 Their Beauty is Not As Real As It Seemsvia:www.thekyliejenner.comThey make money out of their beauty, it is one of their most important assets, along with their bums.”
“Wouldn't you go crazy?”
“They can't even leave their homes without needing to look flawless as the paparazzi are always waiting to catch their every move.”
“They are Michael Jackson famous, if anything they are harassed more than he was.”
“...advertising14 They will never have a 'normal' life againvia:youtube.comThis family is so famous they will probably never have normal lives again.”
“You might realize how amazing your life is and why you wouldn’t change it for the world.”
“Read this list and realize just whose life you would rather have.”


"They have to face a lot of humility iationvia:radaronline.com Send it to us. The kardashians seem to be very powerful. After all, they are celebrities with millions of fans. "
"Khloe has got the world talking about her marriage, and Kourtney is dealing with a very public breakup."
"That's why they spend millions of dollars every day to look absolutely perfect."
"Their beauty is not as real as it is Seemsvia:www.thekyliejenner.com They make money out of their beauty, and it's one of their most important assets, along with their tramps. "
"Won't you go mad?"
"Because paparazzi are always waiting to capture their every move, they don't even need to look perfect to be able to leave home."
"They are the famous Michael Jackson, if there is anything more harassed than him."
__ Ad 14 they will never have a 'normal' life youtube.com In this family, they may not have a normal life any more. "
"You may realize how wonderful your life is and why you don't change it for the world."
"After reading this list, you will realize whose life you would rather live."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When all the dust settles and Chyna runs out of things to sue for, she may find that she would have been better off if she had left the KUWTK family alone from the start.”
“The war between Blac Chyna and the Kardashians is probably going to get a lot messier before it ends.”
“Lamar Odom spotted partying it up in a strip club — Is Khloe Kardashian’s ex-husband back to his old ways?”
“...by Shaunee FlowersIf Blac Chyna wants to win her lawsuit against the Kardashians, she better make sure they can’t dig up any dirt on her.”
“Blac Chyna is suing the Kardashians for millions after claiming they have slut shamed her and shut down production on her reality show Rob & Chyna.”
“In response, the Kardashians have done something that they are known for and Chyna should have seen it coming.”
“The Kardashians hired a private investigator to follow Blac Chyna.”
“Certainly, they’re hoping that an investigator can dig up enough dirt to either prove Chyna wrong or to make her not want to continue with her lawsuit.”
“Whichever way gets this hanger-on off the Kardashians backs is probably okay with them.”
“This isn’t the first time that one of the Kardashians hired a private investigator to follow around the partner or former partner of one of the KUWTK stars.”


"When the dust settles and Zina has nothing to sue, she may find that she would have been better off if the kuteks had been left alone from the beginning."
"The war between Blake chener and Kardashian is likely to get more chaotic before it's over."
Lamar Odom discovered this at the strip club - is Kardashian's ex husband back in his old way of life? "
__︹ If Blake Zina wants to win the case against Kardashian, she'd better make sure they don't dig out any stains on her
"Blac Chyna is suing the Kardashian family for millions of dollars for claiming that Kardashian's Slut humiliated her and shut down the production of her reality show rob & Chyna."
"In response, the kardashians have done something that is well known, and chener should have foreseen that."
"The kardashians hired a private investigator to follow Blake chener."
"Of course, they want investigators to dig up enough evidence to prove Zina wrong, or to make her not want to continue her lawsuit."
"Either way to get the hanger off Kardashian's back, they might be OK."
"It's not the first time the kardashians have hired a private detective to track a partner or former partner of kutke's star."



**Something goes wrong**
“The crew, apparently, sided with Johnson on the set of “Fate.” TMZ reported that many people got sick of Diesel holding up shooting by showing up late and goading people — including Johnson — by criticizing their acting.”
“Said one celebrity publicist close to the films, “Vin is always a douche” on set, and “Dwayne is always a doll.”(Representatives for Johnson and Diesel did not return requests for comment.)”
“Insiders reveal that the turmoil has been a long time coming.”
“...refusing to start the day before 10 a m...”
“Candy asses Furthermore he wrote when you watch this movie next April and it seems like I m not acting in some of these scenes and my blood is legit boiling you re right According to TMZ Johnson was boiling mad at Diesel repeatedly showing up to set late and...”
“The ones that don’t are too chicken s–t to do anything about it anyway.”
““Some conduct themselves as stand up men and true professionals, while others don’t.”
“My male co-stars however are a different story,” he wrote.”
“Dwayne finally lost patience after [multiple] films when Vin showed up late for their final [shared] scene on ‘Fate’“My female co-stars are always amazing, and I love ’em.”
“On Aug. 8, 2016, Johnson posted a scathing — but blind — Facebook attack on one or more unnamed male co-stars.”


Obviously, the crew is on Johnson's side in destiny. TMZ reported that many people were tired of the delay because they were late and stimulated them by criticizing the acting skills of people including Johnson
A celebrity publicist familiar with the film said that on the set, "Wen is always a fool" and "Dwayne is always a doll." (representatives from Johnson and diesel did not respond to requests for comment.)
"Insiders say the turmoil has been going on for a long time."
__ Refuse to start before 10 am... "
"When you saw the film next April, he wrote," it seems that I didn't perform in some of the scenes. My blood was boiling. You're right. According to TMZ, Johnson was angry at the constant tardiness of diesel, and... "
"Those who are not too timid will not do anything at all."
"Some people act like people who stand up and are really professionals, while others are not."
"However, my male partner is a different matter," he wrote
"Dwayne finally lost patience after making (several) films because Wen was late for the last (sharing) scene of fate." "My female partners are always amazing and I love them."
"On August 8, 2016, Johnson launched a severe but blind attack on one or more unnamed male partners on Facebook."



**Something goes wrong**
“She stated, “He did tell me that he dated a girl for like three months that had my face all plastered over her whole bedroom so that’s kind of weird, right?"”
“...where she revealed that Blake confessed he once dated a girl who was a big fan of Gwen... like, a really big fan.”
“Gwen Stefani took to Instagram on Oct. 27 to show off her brand new sparkler on THAT finger, revealing that her longtime partner and fellow The Voice coach Blake Shelton had finally popped the question.”
“"Yes please!"”
“...the 51-year-old singer captioned a sweet snap of the pair kissing while Gwen flaunts her new bling.”
“Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton are engaged — details about their relationship:Now that the pair are finally ready to tie the knot, let's take a closer look at some of the details of their realtionship.”
“They got divorced within two months of each other.”
“Gwen was previously married to singer Gavin Rossdale for 13 years.”
“The former couple shares three sons together, Kingston (11), Zuma (9), and Apollo (4).”
“They announced their drama-filled separation in August 2015.”


"She said," he did tell me that he'd been dating a girl for three months and that my face was all over her bedroom. It's a bit strange, isn't it? "
__ She revealed that Blake admitted that he had dated a big fan of Gwen... Like, a big fan. "
"On October 27, Gwen Stephanie showed off a new flash on her finger on instagram, and she revealed that her old partner and voice coach Blake Shelton finally raised the question."
"OK, thank you!"
__︹ The 51 year old singer voiced the sweet moment of the kiss, while Gwen was showing off her new jewelry
"Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon are engaged - details of their relationship country: now that they are finally ready to get married, let's take a closer look at some of their real estate details."
"They divorced in two months."
"Gwen had been married to singer Gavin Rossdale for 13 years."
The first two have three sons, Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4)
"They announced a dramatic separation in August 2015."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Axel made a couch in our house called the 'Kanye couch' because Kanye designed it with him."”
“"My office is all Vincent Van Duysen, but Kanye is so good at it, he loves to draw out pieces.”
“"My husband makes all of his own furniture in his office," she said.”
“In a previous interview with Architectural Digest, Kim Kardashian West revealed that her husband is quite the builder.”
“It would also not be surprising if West got pretty hands-on in the construction of his new pool.”
“As Architectural Digest reported, this wasn't just a ploy to expand his résumé—he worked with Axel Vervoordt on the Hidden Hills home, sharing photos of its Zen Brutalist aesthetic on Twitter.”
“"We’re looking for architects and industrial designers who want to make the world better," he wrote on Twitter.”
“In May, the multihyphenate added another hyphen when he announced he was starting a new architecture firm called Yeezy Home.”
“There's no word on who designed the pool, but it would not be surprising if it turned out to be Kanye West himself.”
“Whether this is specifically to deter would-be skinny-dippers, or if it's just another add-on to their already tight security team, is unclear.”


"Axel made a sofa in our house called 'Kanye sofa', because Kanye designed it with him."
"My office is full of Vincent van duyson, but Kanye is good at painting."
"My husband makes his own furniture in the office," she said
"In a previous interview with architectural digest, Kim Kardashian West revealed that her husband is an excellent builder."
"It's not surprising that west can do it himself when building a new pool."
"As architectural digest reports, it's not just about expanding his resume - he worked with Axel vervoordt at his home in Yinshan, sharing photos of his Zen savage aesthetics on twitter."
"We are looking for architects and industrial designers who want to make the world a better place," he tweeted
In May, when he announced the launch of a new construction company called yeezy home, muhiphenate added a hyphen
"It's not known who designed the pool, but it's not surprising if Kanye West turns out to have designed it himself."
"It's not clear whether it's designed to deter people who want to be thin or just another addition to their already tight security team."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They share six kids and are in the process of finalizing their divorce.”
“Pitt split from Angelina Jolie in September 2016.”
“She kept a low-profile in a black trench coat and oversized sunglasses.”
“The academic was spotted on Wednesday, April 18, strolling through the Massachusetts Institute of Technology campus in Cambridge, Massachusetts.”
“...new love and friends can hear his grin when speaking to him...”
“Brad feels badly about this of course but he is powerless to stop it Despite prying eyes a source exclusively revealed to Us earlier this month that Pitt is absolutely smitten by Oxman and their chemistry is off the charts Even more the War Machine actor is glowing around his...”
““Neri is extremely uncomfortable with all of the media attention and feels that her personal life has now come under a microscope,” said the pal of the architectural designer, 42.”
“Although the twosome have managed to keep their romance under wraps, they’ve been thrust into the spotlight since news of their relationship broke.”
““They are going to have fun and see where it goes,” the insider added.”
“...another and not worrying about the future...”


"They have six children and are going through divorce procedures."
"Pete broke up with Angelina Jolie in September 2016."
"She's wearing a black windbreaker and oversized sunglasses, keeping a low profile."
The scholar was found wandering around the MIT campus in Cambridge, Massachusetts, on Wednesday, April 18
__ New love and friends can hear his smile when he speaks... "
"Brad is certainly very sad about this, but he can't stop it, although his peeping eyes, an exclusive source revealed to us earlier this month, Pete was absolutely glowing around him by Oxman and their chemical off the surface chemicals, and even more war machine actors..."
A friend of the 42 year old architect said: "Neri is extremely upset about all the media attention. She feels that her personal life has now been put under the microscope."
"Although the two have managed to cover up their relationship, they have been in the spotlight since the news came out."
"They'll have a good time and see where it goes," the person familiar with the matter added
__ On the other hand, don't worry about the future... "



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think now that they’re out in the open as a couple, Katie and Jamie will start attending events together?”
““Tom has known about Katie and Jamie’s secret relationship since the beginning and it has always bothered him that they were hooking up.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how Tom Cruise is feeling so betrayed by Jamie Foxx dating his ex-wife Katie Holmes, according to a source.”
“We’ve got a bro-code violation going on!”
“Tom Cruise, 55, and Jamie Foxx, 49, were once pals, as the megastar recruited the actor to star with him in 2004’s action film Collateral.”
“They remained friendly up until the Annie star began dating Katie Holmes, 38, just a year after she divorced Tom in 2012 in such a dramatic way.”
“Four years later, Holmes and Foxx have finally taken their romance out into the open, but the Mission: Impossible star has aware that they were a couple for some time and isn’t thrilled that his friend would date his former wife.”
“HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“While Katie and Jamie did their best to keep things a secret from the world, Tom is too well-connected and found out about them shortly after their romance began,” a source close to Tom tellsEXCLUSIVELY.”
“They were spotted over Labor Day weekend holding hands together while walking down the beach in Malibu and didn’t appear to care that the paparazzi captured the PDA.”


"Hollywood actresses, do you think Katie and Jamie will start to participate in the event together now that they are in public as a couple?"
"Tom knew the secret relationship between Katie and Jamie from the very beginning. They were colluding with each other and bothered him all the time."
"We have exclusive coverage of Tom Cruise's betrayal when he was dated by Jamie Fox and his ex-wife Katie Holmes."
"We have violated the brotherhood code!"
"Tom Cruise, 55, and Jamie fox, 49, used to be good friends because the superstar recruited the actor in the 2004 action movie promo."
"They were friendly until the Anne star started dating Katie Holmes, 38, a year after she divorced Tom in such a dramatic way in 2012."
Four years later, Holmes and fox finally made their relationship public, but mission: the impossible star knew they were a couple for some time, and was not excited about his friend's date with his ex-wife
"Exclusive to Hollywood life."
"Although Katie and Jamie did their best to keep secrets from the outside world, Tom was so close that they found them soon after their relationship started," a source close to Tom said
"They were found walking hand in hand on Malibu beach during the Labor Day weekend and didn't seem to care that the paparazzi caught the PDA."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There's no way she would have done that if she knew!”
“We doubt it, as she just posted a gushing Instagram tribute to the A-list actor for Father's Day.”
“...one on the way we wonder if they ve already told Jen Garner...”
“Rumor has it the SNL producer is in the process of permanently relocating to the West Coast to be with her man which means their respective children will all be under one roof If they ve really got a little...”
“If she's expecting a child with the Oscar winner, at some point they're going to have to blend their families.”
“...little girl around...”
“Well we reviewed all the snapshots and watched the video and we re almost positive she s got a bun in the oven A source tells X17 It s not lost on us either that she s suddenly bringing her...”
“...or perhaps this striped dress was just unflattering and these pix were shot from bad angles...”
“She even tried the age ol hide the belly with the purse trick but it didn t work on us We know what you re thinking it could have been a gust of wind making her mid section look fuller...”
“...a noticeable baby bump...”


"If she knew, she couldn't have done that!"
"We're skeptical about that because she just published a gushing article on instagram in memory of A-rated father's Day actor."
__ One is on the way, and we want to know if they've told jangana... "
"It's rumored that SNL producers are moving permanently to the west coast with her men, which means that their respective children will be under the same roof if they really have a little..."
"If she wants to have a child with an Oscar winner, at some point, they have to integrate the family."
__ The little girl around me... "
"Well, we've seen all the snapshots and videos, and we're almost sure she had a bun in the oven, and a source told x17 that it didn't lose us either, and she suddenly brought her..."
__︹ Or this striped skirt doesn't look good, these photos are taken from a bad angle... "
"She even tried to hide her belly with her purse, but it didn't work for us. We know what you're thinking. Maybe a gust of wind made her belly look fuller..."
__ Obvious baby lump... "



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Maybe one day they will be hearing wedding bells, but for now, they’re enjoying their relationship as it is.”
“Fellow Voice coach Adam Levine weighed in on just how real their relationship is, and the effects of their love being out there for everyone to see.”
“News explained why the couple may be trying to keep their “very public relationship off the radar for awhile.”They have no problem with showing off their love for each other, but their regular PDA led some to believe their relationship just couldn’t be real.”
“E!”
“They’re trying to stay out of the public eyeStefani and Shelton’s relationship may have blossomed on reality TV as The Voice coaches, but they’re trying to make their relationship a bit more private.”
“They know they have found their true soulmate.”Next: This could be beneficial to their relationship.”
“They are perfect for each other.”
“According to Entertainment Tonight’s source, “They are on cloud nine for each other.”
“They’re stronger than everIt’s easy to see that Stefani and Shelton are in love — and just because they aren’t rushing down the aisle doesn’t mean they aren’t stronger than ever.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"Maybe one day they'll hear the wedding bell, but now they're enjoying their relationship."
"Adam Levine, who is also a voice coach, talks about how real their relationship is and how their love affects everyone."
The news explains why the couple may try not to pay attention to their "very public relationship" for the time being. They have no problem showing off their love for each other, but the handheld computers they often use make some people believe that their relationship can't be true
__锛_
"They're trying to stay out of the public eye. The relationship between tefani and Sheldon may have developed as a voice coach on reality TV, but they're trying to make their relationship more private."
"They know they've found a real soul mate." Next step: it could be good for their relationship
"They're perfect for each other."
According to a source for entertainment tonight, "they're all out there."
"They're stronger than anyone else, and it's easy to see that Stefani and Sheldon are in love - just because they didn't rush into marriage doesn't mean they're stronger than ever."



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch the film’s trailer above.”
“A Simple Favor — also starring Rupert Friend, Jean Smart, Linda Cardellini, Andrew Rannells, and Sarah Baker — is set for release on Sept. 14.”
“Emily As of Wednesday Lively unfollowed most of the accounts she previously tracked and is now following only women named Emily Nelson 37 of them to be exact...”
“Emily if you re out there we re all really worried In anticipation of the trailer s release Lively sent fans into a tizzy Monday by deleting all of her Instagram posts save for a single photo of a hangman style game which spelled out the question What happened to...”
“I’m realizing I don’t know her as well as I thought I did.”
“Some of us are better at hiding it than others.”The biggest reveal the trailer presents, however, is Emily grinning in a crimson wig after Stephanie explains: “Five days ago, Emily went missing.”
“You can get close to her, but never quite reach her.”As quick flashes of police sirens, a violent car crash, and deliciously smirky glances flash onscreen, Emily reminds us: “Everybody has a dark side.”
“Crazy Rich Asians star Henry Golding, who plays Emily’s husband, Sean, continues: “She is an enigma, my wife.”
“She’s this wonderful, elegant person,” Anna Kendrick (as Stephanie) says of Lively’s character in the preview, which the latter debuted Wednesday morning via her Twitter account.”
““I do consider Emily my best friend.”


"Look at the movie trailer above."
A little help, starring Rupert fried, Jean smart, Linda cadrini, Andrew lannells and Sarah Baker, will be released on September 14
"As of Wednesday, Emily lively had withdrawn most of the accounts she had previously tracked, and now only tracked women named Emily Nelson, 37 of whom, to be exact..."
"Emily, if you're there, we're really worried about the release of the trailer. Lively deleted all her instagram posts on Monday, leaving only a picture of a hangman style game, which clearly shows what happened..."
"I realized I didn't know her as well as I thought."
"Some of us are better at covering up than others." However, the highlight of the trailer is Emily wearing a crimson wig and smiling. Stephanie explains, "five days ago, Emily disappeared."
"You can get close to her, but you can never get close to her." When the sound of the siren flashed quickly, a violent car accident, and a charming smile flashed on the screen, Emily reminded us: "everyone has a dark side."
"She's a mystery, my wife," continued Henry Golding, star of "crazy Asians," who plays Emily's husband Sean
Anna Kendrick (as Stephanie) said of her role in "lively": "she's a wonderful, elegant person. She made her debut on Wednesday morning through her twitter account
"I think Emily is my best friend."



**Something goes wrong**
“He also added that he'd better get "some sleep stored away before the babies are born".”
“He said "George should pour himself a good cup of coffee each morning."”
“Recently, George was advised on raising twins by Prince Albert of Monaco, who has twins himself.”
“In addition, the Clooneys paid for their neighbours to rent a £780,000 cottage.”
“The package was said to include a holiday to Corfu, a six-week stay in a luxury hotel and a £30,000 lump sum.”
“Amidst reports that they might spend a million dollars on their nursery, George and Amal reportedly gave their neighbours a £45,000 compensation package for the noise caused by the renovations to their estate recently.”
“The couple is already known to be pretty generous with their money.”
“George also wants Amal to be completely relaxed during the birth, which is why he hired an Italian masseuse for the hotshot lawyer for $5,000.”
“Amal is also apparently flying in two 'birth companions' from Los Angeles for around $30,000.”
“According to entertainment portal Aceshowbiz.com, the Hollywood star has rented out the entire Kensington Wing at London's Chelsea and Westminster Hospital, which essentially comes down to $580,000 for a week's stay.”


He added that he had better "store sleep before the baby is born."
"George should pour himself a good cup of coffee every morning," he said
"Recently, Prince Albert of Monaco advised George to raise twins. He has twins himself."
"In addition, the clooneys paid their neighbors to rent a 780000 pound cottage."
"The package is said to include a vacation at Corfu, six weeks at a luxury hotel and a one-time payment of 30000 pounds."
"It has been reported that George and Amar may spend $1 million on their nursery, and they are reported to have offered 45000 in compensation to their neighbors for the noise caused by the recent renovation of their estate."
"Everyone knows that the couple are very generous with their money."
"George also wants Amar to be completely relaxed during childbirth, which is why he hired an Italian masseur for $5000 to become a hot lawyer."
"Amar apparently took two" birth partners "from Los Angeles, and the price was about $30000."
According to the entertainment portal Aceshowbiz.com According to the website, the Hollywood star has rented out the whole Kensington building of London's Chelsea and Westminster hospitals, and the weekly hospitalization expenses have been basically reduced to 580000 dollars. "



**Something goes wrong**
““Big Little Lies” premiered on HBO in early 2017 and went on to win eight Primetime Emmy Awards at the 69th annual ceremony in Sept. of the same year, including best limited series or TV movie, and acting wins for Kidman, Dern, and Alexander Skarsgård.”
“Dern is repped by CAA and Untitled Entertainment.”
“Woodley returns as Jane Chapman, with Dern coming back as Renata Klein, and Kravitz reprising the role of Bonnie Carlson.”
“The trio join previously announced returning cast members Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman, with Meryl Streep also joining the second season as Perry’s mother.”
“In the second season, while processing Perry’s sudden death, Jane is trying to build a new life for herself and Ziggy.”
“Renata is now faced with new challenges in her marriage, while Bonnie struggles with Perry’s death and is forced to face demons in her past.”
“Woodley and Dern were both nominated for an Emmy and a Golden Globe award in the supporting actress category for their work on the show’s first season, with Dern winning both awards.”
“Woodley is repped by Management 360 and Hyperion Talent.”
“Kravitz is repped by Paradigm and Untitled Entertainment.”
“Moriarty will also serve as producer.”


"Lies big and small" premiered at HBO in early 2017 and won eight golden time awards at the 69th Emmy Awards ceremony in September of the same year, including the best limited series or TV movie award, as well as the performance awards of Kidman, Dean and Alexander scarsgarde
"Dean is represented by CAA and untitled entertainment."
"Woodley as Jane Chapman, dean as Renata Klein, Kravitz as Bonnie Carlson."
"The trio announced the return of actors Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman, and Meryl Streep joined season two as Perry's mother."
"In season two, when dealing with Perry's sudden death, Jane is trying to build a new life for herself and Ziggy."
"Renata's marriage is now facing new challenges, while bonnie is fighting Perry's death and forced to face the demons of the past."
"Woodley and Dean both received Emmy and Golden Globe supporting actress nominations in the first season of the show, and Dean won two awards at the same time."
"Woodley is represented by 360 management and Hyperion talent."
"Kravitz was replaced by Paragon and untitled entertainment."
"Moriarty will also be the producer."



**Something goes wrong**
“Top 5 Male Models in Arabic Music Videos...”
“He wrote: 'Was gonna wait a while to say anything but word travels fast, listen plain and simple Hailey I am soooo in love with everything about you!”
“According to TMZ, the pair have decided to postpone their wedding until 2019, as they don't want to 'put pressure' on themselves and rush the big day.”
“Justin, 24, and his model girlfriend, 21, are still excited about becoming man and wife, but feel making the 'commitment' to each other is what really matters.”
“Holding off Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin are waiting until next year to tie the knot despite getting engaged last month pictured in July A source told the site Justin and Hailey are waiting until sometime next year to tie the knot as they feel they ve made the commitment...”
“...and that s the most important thing...”
“While the couple have faced criticism for getting engaged so quickly, the source revealed the pop star is sure Hailey is the one, having been besotted with her for many years.”
“The insider continued: 'Justin's been in love with her for a long time, so this didn't just come from out of the blue.'”
“Taking it slow: According to new reportes, the pair have decided to postpone their wedding until 2019, as they don't want to 'put pressure' on themselves and rush the big dayMailOnline has contacted both Justin and Hailey's representatives for further comment.”
“Justin proposed to Hailey, who is the daughter of actor and producer Stephen Baldwin, during a trip to the Bahamas last month.”


"Top five male models in Arabic music videos..."
He wrote: "I had to wait for a while to talk about something, but the words spread too fast. Listen to the simple Haley, I love you so much!"
"According to TMZ, the two decided to postpone the wedding to 2019 because they didn't want to 'put pressure' on themselves to make a big day."
"Justin, 24, and his model girlfriend, 21, are still excited to be a couple, but they think it's really important to make a 'commitment' to each other."
"Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin didn't get married until next year. Although they got engaged last month, the photo was taken in July. A source told the website that Justin and Haley would wait until sometime next year to get married because they felt they had made a promise..."
__ This is the most important... "
"Although the couple were criticized for being engaged too quickly, the source revealed that the pop star must be Haley because she has been addicted to it for many years."
"Justin has been in love with her for a long time, so it didn't happen all of a sudden," the person said
"Take your time: according to the latest report, the two decided to postpone their wedding to 2019 because they didn't want to 'put pressure' on themselves. Mailonline has contacted representatives of Justin and Hailey for further comment on their big day."
Justin proposed to Haley, the daughter of actor and producer Stephen Baldwin, while traveling in the Bahamas last month



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Answering her own question, Kylie says 25 while Caitlyn says 30.”
“A source close to the Kardashian-Jenner brood tells ET that Caitlyn Jenner "wasn't happy at first about Kylie becoming a young mother."”
“The source adds that Caitlyn is also "hesitant" about her daughter's boyfriend, Travis Scott.”
“As for Kylie, the source says she "wasn’t happy about how Caitlyn responded."”
“That being said, the 20-year-old reality star still maintains a relationship with the 68-year-old former Olympian, who understands that Kylie is an adult and can make her own decisions.”
“While Caitlyn may have been apprehensive about her daughter becoming a young mom, Kylie has said in the past that this is what she has always wanted.”
“In a 2016 episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians, Kylie asks Caitlyn, "What do you feel like is a good age to have kids?"”
“"I feel like 30 is too late," the youngest Jenner sister touts.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"To answer your question, Kelly said she was 25, and Caitlin said she was 30."
A source close to the Kardashian Jenner family told et that Caitlin Jenner "was not happy at first about Kelly becoming a young mother."
The source added that Caitlin was also "hesitant" about her daughter's boyfriend Travis Scott
As for Kelly, the source said she was "not satisfied with Caitlin's reaction"
"Having said that, the 20-year-old reality TV star still has a relationship with the 68 year old former Olympic athlete, who understands that Kelly is an adult and can make her own decisions."
"Although Caitlin may be worried about her daughter becoming a young mother, Kelly has said in the past that this is what she has always wanted."
"In a 2016 episode," follow Kardashian, "Kelly asked Caitlin," what age do you think is a good time to have children? "
"I think it's too late to be 30," said Sister Jenner, the youngest
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



**Something goes wrong**
“Jenner’s rep simply said, “Not true.””
“We’ll be announcing our cast closer to our premiere date.” Season 26 is expected to premiere this spring.”
“When asked about the casting news, ABC told Page Six in a statement, “We do not confirm or comment on casting rumors.”
“In June 2017, Amanda Seales took her to task at Katy Perry’s “Friends and Family: Dinner with Discourse” event.”
“Jenner has been confronted before over her opinions.”
“While recruiting the trans activist could be a good idea for ratings, we’re told insiders are worried about potential backlash because of her political views.”
“Rob Kardashian competed in the 13th season and became the first runner-up.”
“Stepdaughter Kim Kardashian competed in the seventh season and placed 11th in the competition.”
“If the 68-year-old Olympic gold medalist signs on the dotted line, she’ll be the third member of her family to slip on their dancing shoes for cameras.”
“We hear ABC is actively in talks to land Caitlyn Jenner for the 26th season, which will feature just 10 athletes for an unusually short four-week season.”


Jenner's representative just said, "it's not true."
"We will announce the cast as we approach the premiere date." Season 26 is expected to premiere this spring
"When asked about casting news, ABC said on page 6 in a statement," we do not confirm or comment on casting rumors. "
"In June 2017, Amanda seares took her to Katy Perry's" friends and family: dinner with words. "
"Jenna has been questioned for her opinion before."
"While recruiting this cross-cultural activist may be a good idea to boost ratings, we are told that insiders are worried about a potential backlash because of her political views."
"Rob Kardashian played in her 13th season and finished second
"Stepdaughter Kim Kardashian played in her seventh season and was 11th in the competition."
"If the 68 year old Olympic gold medalist signs the dotted line, she will be the third person in the family to put on dancing shoes to take pictures."
"We've heard that ABC is actively talking to Caitlin Jenner about the transfer of their 26th season, which will be a very short four week season with only 10 players



**Something goes wrong**
“Advertisement'Whilst these traditions are not necessarily dark, there is the option here to use the magic for a darker purpose.”
“Then let the candle burn all the way down.”
“'When a person works magic to "keep" or "get" a particular love interest, it may work, but only for a short period of time,' she said.”
“Trying to control someone else’s will, as she believes Angelina is doing with her magic, won’t work.”
“HATHOR’S MIRROR: A LOVE SPELL FOR HALLOWEEN Carrie has shared a spell for those looking for love at Halloween, but advises that anyone who uses it must have pure intentions.”
“'Angelina is known to have a strong interest in the occult, especially Voodoo and Hoodoo.”
“For her, obsession and possession equal love.'”
“'It feeds into her tendencies towards BDSM.”
“'The way she used to wear her ex-husband Billy Bob Thornton's blood in a vial around her neck, this is a form of blood magic,' she explained.”
“...back following her split from Brad last year The actress flew her tattooist to Cambodia to do a new inking that would spiritually bind her marriage to Brad but months later they split up Carrie says Angelina has always been interested in the dark arts...”


"Advertising" although these traditions are not necessarily dark, but we can choose to use magic to achieve a darker purpose
"Then keep the candle burning."
When a person uses magic to "maintain" or "acquire" a particular love interest, it may work, but only for a short period of time, she said
"Trying to control other people's will, as she believes Angelina does with her magic, doesn't work."
"Hathor's mirror: the love curse of Halloween Carrie shares a curse for those who are looking for love on Halloween, but she suggests that anyone who uses it must have a pure intention."
"As we all know, Angelina is very interested in mystics, especially voodoo and witchcraft."
"For her, obsession and possession are equal to love."
"It's fueling her bias toward BDSM."
"She used to put her ex husband Billy Bob Thornton's blood in a small bottle and put it around her neck. It's a kind of blood magic," she explained
__︹ After she broke up with Brad last year, the actress flew to Cambodia with her tattoo artist, injecting a new spiritual bond into her marriage with Brad. But a few months later, they broke up. Carrie said that Angelina has always been interested in dark art... "



**Something goes wrong**
“So I really hope he was out of his right mind … It’s just so childish.’MORE : Kourtney Kardashian replaces Scott Disick and makes new boyfriend Younes Bendjima part of the family...”
“That’s disgusting.”
“So to say that he’s gonna have people get beat up?”
“‘At the end of the day, she’s still the mother of his children.”
“She said: ‘I just can’t believe that he would stoop this low and speak to her like this.”
“It’s just so ridiculous.’At the height of the drama, Kourtney claims Scott messaged her saying: ‘Anyone who gets in the middle [between us] will not be pleased with the outcome.’After learning of Kourtney’s accusation, her sister Khloe also blasted the way Scott behaved, calling him ‘childish’.”
“‘Kourtney is genuinely trying to go away and have a good time and he’s trying to like, freak her out and make Kourtney think that there’s gonna be some crazy drama running.”
“She explained: ‘I think it’s clear to everyone that Scott is doing this just to try to one-up Kourtney, and that seems super malicious.”
“Scott arriving in Nice in May (Picture: Alex But Kim considered Scott’s behaviour to be ‘malicious’ as he was also seen partying with a number of other women, including Sofia Richie and Ella Ross, while Kourtney was on holiday with her new boyfriend Younes Bendjima.”
“It’s not a good look for Scott, at all.’AdvertisementAdvertisementKendall, 21, replied by saying Scott thought he was making Kourtney – with whom he has Mason, seven, Penelope, five, and Reign, two – ‘mad’ by going on a vacation with Bella.”


"So I really hope he's crazy It's naive. " More: Courtney Kardashian replaces Scott Disick and makes new boyfriend yones benjima a part of the family
"It's disgusting."
"So he's going to get beaten?"
"At the end of the day, she's still the mother of his child."
"She said: 'I can't believe he's bent to talk to her like this.'"
"That's ridiculous." At the climax of the plot, Courtney claims Scott sent her a message saying, "no one among us will be satisfied with the result." After learning of Courtney's accusations, her sister Chloe also attacked Scott's behavior, calling him "naive."
"Courtney really wants to leave and have a good time. He wants to like her, scare her and make Courtney think there will be a crazy plot."
"I think it's clear to everyone that Scott did it just to please Courtney, which seems very malicious," she explained
"Scott arrived in nice in May (photo: Alex, but king thought Scott's behavior was' malicious' because he was also seen partying with some other women, including Sophie aristic and elaroth, while Courtney was on holiday with her new boyfriend, yons benjima."
"It's not good for Scott at all." Kendall, 21, replied that Scott thought he was making Courtney - he and he had 7-year-old Mason, 5-year-old Penelope and 2-year-old Rafe - who were "Crazy" because of vacationing with Bella



**Something goes wrong**
“We have to shake some things up With astute awareness of her position in the pop cosmos Perry has always understood the power of reinvention moving from vintage pin up One of the Boys to kitsch vamp Teenage Dream to pick yourself up and carry on warrior the more spiritually...”
“We have to change.”
“Get.”
“Not.”
“Do.”
“People.”
““Because.”
““We all know that tone and context are everything, so this might be one of my last print interviews,” she says, setting her phone down next to my Dictaphone.”
“But before we start, she shows me her iPhone, which is already recording.”
“She’s keen to make it clear nothing is off limits: “I’m going to give you everything and more,” she beams.”


"We have to change something and be keenly aware of her position in the pop music world. Perry has always understood the power of re creation, from the old-fashioned nail on a boy to the kitsch vamp, to the dream of teenagers, to cheer up and fight more spiritually. "
"We have to change."
"Get it."
"No
"Go ahead."
"People."
"Because."
"We all know that intonation and background determine everything, so this may be my last printed interview," she said, putting her cell phone next to my recorder
"But before we started, she showed me her iPhone, which was already recording."
"She wanted to make it clear that nothing was forbidden:" I'll give you everything and more, "she said



**Something goes wrong**
“While Miranda and Anderson made their relationship official a few months later, Blake appears to confirm that this rumored affair may have gone down with his recent post.”
““Gwen has been a rock of support for Blake since they met and he was first going through his divorce,” our source went on to say.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY told HL how she & Blake are dealing with the scandal!”
“Blake Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his ex Miranda Lambert, 34, and the fact that Miranda allegedly started dating her married tour mate Evan Felker while she was still seeing her ex Anderson East.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY gave us the deets about how Blake and Gwen are reacting to Miranda’s dating scandal that allegedly broke up a marriage, according to reports.”
““Blake and Gwen have been talking a lot about the latest drama with Blake’s ex Miranda,” our source said.”
““Upon hearing the news that Miranda is involved with someone else yet again, hopping from guy to guy, Blake opened up to Gwen about the darker secrets of his marriage with Miranda.”
“They discussed the doubt the heartache and the mistrust Blake developed for Miranda that led to the end of their marriage When it comes down to it the newest bombshell surrounding Miranda s complicated love life has only brought Blake...”
“...and Gwen closer...”
““Gwen and Blake have bonded over the latest drama with Miranda and his ex’s dating habits have had the strange effect of making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever as a couple.”


"A few months later, Miranda and Anderson officially announced their relationship, and Blake seems to confirm that this rumor may be related to his recent post."
"Gwen has been a supporter of Blake since they met, and he experienced a divorce for the first time," our source continued
"A source close to Gwen told HL exclusively how she and black handled the scandal!"
"Black Sheldon, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his 34 year old ex boyfriend, Miranda Lambert, and the fact that Miranda is said to have started dating her married travel partner, Ivan felke, while still dating her ex boyfriend Evan felke in the East."
"It is reported that a source close to Gwen exclusively disclosed to us Blake's and Gwen's reaction to Miranda's dating scandal, which is said to have led to the breakdown of their marriage."
"Blake and Gwen have been talking about the latest drama with Blake's former Miranda," our source said
"When he heard that Miranda had another relationship with another man, Blake jumped from one man to another and opened the secret of his marriage to Gwen."
"They discussed Blake's suspicion, heartache and distrust of Miranda, which eventually led to the end of their marriage. In the final analysis, the latest bomb surrounding Miranda's complex love life only brought Blake..."
__ Closer to Gwen... "
"Gwen and Blake got married to Miranda in a recent play. His ex girlfriend's dating habits have had a strange effect, making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know below!”
“Is it truly over for them?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think that Brad should get back together with Angie?”
“Click here to see pics of Brad and the kids.”
“So among the divorce drama, there has been a lot of happy celebrating!”
“They have each been spending quality time with them, and there has been loads of birthday fun, seeing as Shiloh, 11, Maddox, 16, and nine-year-old twins, Vivienne and Knox, have birthdays that aren’t too far apart!”
“Right now both parents seem to be focused on their little ones more than anything else.”
“However, “if Brad came crawling back to her and begged for another chance, she would willingly drop the divorce.” But like the insider said, that’s just not what Brad wants anymore.”
“The source said that while Angie does miss Brad terribly, she is “a really stubborn person” and wouldn’t admit she’s made a mistake.”
““Brad’s done a lot of soul searching over the past few months, he’s quit drinking and he’s really cleaned up his act,” the insider said.”


"Tell us next!"
"Are they really over?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Brad should get back together with Angie?"
"Click here to see pictures of Brad and the kids."
"So in the divorce drama, there are a lot of happy celebrations!"
"Each of them had a great time with them, and a lot of birthday fun. The birthdays of Shiloh, 11, Maddox, 16, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9, are not far away!"
"Now both parents seem to pay more attention to their children."
"However," if Brad crawls back and asks her to give her another chance, she will willingly give up the divorce. "But it's not what Brad wants anymore, as people familiar with the matter say."
"Although Angie does Miss Brad very much, she is a" very stubborn person "and won't admit that she made a mistake," the source said
"Brad has done a lot of self reflection in the past few months. He has given up drinking and he has really cleaned up his behavior," the person familiar with the matter said



**Something goes wrong**
“That’s fine, because I think now I want to be a hopeful hippie.”
“And that’s fine.”
“And this hurts to say, but I even accept you as a president of the United States.”
“And so Donald Trump, I accept you.”
“Happy Hippies, we adjust and accept everyone.”
“She’s given her life to make it better ...”
“This is all she’s ever done.”
“I just wish she had that opportunity because she’s fought for so long and because I believe her when she says she loves this country.”
“I still think that in her lifetime [Hillary Clinton] deserves to be the first female president and that’s what makes me so sad.”


"That's good, because I think now I want to be a hopeful hippie."
"That's good."
"It's hard to say, but I even accept you as president of the United States."
"So Donald Trump, I accept you."
"Happy hippies, we adjust and accept everyone."
"She gave her life to make it better..."
"That's what she did."
"I just hope she has that chance, because she has been fighting for so long, because I believe she says she loves this country."
"I still think that in her lifetime (Hillary Clinton) she should be the first woman president, and that's what makes me so sad."



**Something goes wrong**
“I say unto you, only love has eyes; other than love, everything is blind.”For more exclusive celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
“...not know what love is...”
“She is doing well enjoying being on set with Lee Daniels and focusing her energy on the opportunities ahead While she has yet to make her relationship with Tyler Instagram official Paris did post a telling quote about love on Oct 23 People say love ism blind because they do...”
““It appears that Paris and Michael have parted ways for now, but their future is uncertain,” the source said, adding that Paris was very excited about her guest role on Fox’s TV drama Star.”
“Though the insider said that Paris could end up reconciling with Michael in the future, they also said that the aspiring actress was more focused on her career than her love life.”
“Back in February, a source told Us Weekly that the duo broke up after less than a year of dating.”
““She makes her own decisions, but her family wants her to make the right ones.”Paris’ family’s concerns about her latest romance come months after she finally called it quits with on-and-off boyfriend Michael Snoddy.”
““Paris is trying to walk the straight and narrow, but she’s also looking for fun,” notes the insider.”
“...death of dad Michael Jackson is smitten...”
“Tyler 25 has bragged about his wild ways on Instagram posting about months of far too much drinking and praising bottomless red wine and pure debauchery Photo Credit Splash Despite those red flags Paris who s admitted to attending Alcoholics Anonymous meetings and who says she was suicidal after the...”


"I tell you, only love has eyes; except love, everything is blind." If you want to know more exclusive news about celebrities, go to the newsstand to see the latest issue of "life and fashion"! "
__ I don't know what love is... "
"She's doing well, enjoying being on set with Lee Daniels and focusing on future opportunities, and she hasn't established a relationship with Taylor instagram yet. On October 23, Paris officially released a famous saying about love. People say that love is blind because they have done so... "
"It seems that Paris and Michael have parted ways now, but their future is uncertain," the source said, adding that Paris is very excited about her guest role as a fox star
"Although the insider said Paris might reconcile with Michael in the future, they also said the aspiring actress was more concerned about her career than her love life."
"As early as February this year, a source told us weekly that the two broke up after less than a year of dating."
"She makes her own decisions, but the family wants her to make the right decisions." Paris's family are worried about her recent relationship. She finally broke up with her off and on boyfriend, Michael snowdy, a few months ago
"Paris tries to walk straight and narrow, but she's also looking for fun," the person said
__ The death of Michael Jackson's father was defeated... "
"Taylor boasted of her wild style on instagram on the 25th, saying that she had drunk too much in recent months, and praised bottomless wine and photos of pure debauchery, even though those red flag Parisians admitted to attending an anonymous meeting of alcoholics and said that she was Then he committed suicide. "



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This song featured in the movie Act of Valor.”
“He won a 2012 Golden Globe Award for the Best Original Song “For You,”.”
“However, in a trustworthy source close to the situation assures us that Urban isn’t at all distressed about the show’s sexually explicit content.”
“For this news as well Gossip cop has found that Keith Urban is NOT upset about Nicole Kidman’s sex scenes on the HBO series “Big Little Lies,” despite a made-up tabloid report.”
“For this kind of site, there is Gossip cop which always finds the source and corrects all of these fake news.”
“There have been many cases where the news are made so believable but actually, all of it is fake.”
“...be easy for him Fake News Viral There are many sites likewise who have confused many fans of the star by giving the false report...”
“A so called source tells the magazine Keith must be going nuts with jealousy watching his wife expose her naked body to another actor and the world An insider adds He s in showbiz too so he knows there are things you have to do sometimes but it can t...”
“According to the National Enquirer, the country singer is troubled by his wife’s many racy sex scenes with Alexander Skarsgard, who plays her husband on the show.”
“Let’s see how much of this rumor is true!”


"This song appeared in the movie brave action."
He won the 2012 Golden Globe Award for his best original song for you
"However, a reliable person familiar with the matter assured us that urban was not bothered by the explicit pornography in the play at all."
"For this news as well as gossip, police found that Keith Urban was unhappy with Nicole Kidman's sex scene on HBO series" big and small lies, "despite a fictional tabloid report
"For this kind of website, there are always gossip police, who can always find the source and correct all these false news."
"In many cases, the news is so credible, but in fact, all of this is false."
__︹ For him, fake news is easy to spread - similarly, many websites confuse fans of many stars by providing false reports... "
"A so-called source told Keith magazine that Keith would go crazy with jealousy to see his wife expose her nakedness to another actor. One insider added that he is also in the show business, so he knows that sometimes you have to do something, but you can't do it.... "
According to the national inquirer, the country singer is upset by the many pornographic scenes in which his wife plays her husband with Alexander Skarsgard
"Let's see how much of this rumor is true!"



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift is no exception, and it’s unlikely we’ll see her until she ready for us to see her—with an album in tow.”
“But all these hoodies and grainy photos just go to show that if the most famous people in the world don’t wish to be seen, they won’t be seen.”
“Well, her exact words were, “As far as I know I'm only doing one show in 2017, and as far as I know, this is that show,” spoken during a pre-Super Bowl concert in February.”
“So that’s maybe less of a vow and more of a calendar update.”
“Regardless.”
“In October 2015 she ventured this thought: "I think I should take some time off.”
“I think people might need a break from me.” And then, off-the-record, she told Kanye West in the infamous call tapes, “I’m like this close to overexposure.”Like many celebrities before her, Taylor recognized that it was possible to be too famous.”
“But unlike many of them, she took action to fix it, and then actually kept her word.”
“Fourth of July came and went without her annual Rhode Island celebration, known colloquially as Taymerica.”
“The only photos of the star released publicly since the February concert have been taken with new boyfriend Joe Alwyn, and they’re grainy, as if taken with an incredibly long lens.”


"Swift is no exception. We're not likely to see her until she's ready for us to see her with an album."
"But all these hoodies and rough photos are just to show that if the most famous people in the world don't want to be seen, they won't be seen."
"Well, her exact words are," as far as I know, I only did one show in 2017, and as far as I know, this is the show, "she said at the Super Bowl concert in February
"So it may not be an oath, but a calendar update."
"Anyway."
In October 2015, she boldly put forward the idea: "I think I should take a break."
"I think people may need to take a break from me." Then, in private, she told Kanye West on the infamous tape, "I'm almost overexposed." Like many celebrities before her, Taylor realized that it's possible to be too famous. "
"But unlike many of them, she took action to solve the problem and then actually kept her promise."
"July 4 came and went, without her annual Rhode Island celebration, which is commonly known as taymerica."
"Since the concert in February, the only public photos of the star have been taken with his new boyfriend Joe Alwyn, and they are grainy, as if they were taken with a very long lens."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to In Touch, the actor was caught flirting with other women behind Holmes’ back at a Fourth of July party, so he’s now attempting to […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk this fake news.”
“A new report claiming Jamie Foxx plans to rent out Disneyland for an after-hours date with Katie Holmes is completely fabricated.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"According to contact magazine, the actor was found flirting with other women behind Holmes' back at a party on July 4, so he is now trying to ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"The gossip police can expose this fake news exclusively."
"A new report claims that Jamie fox plans to rent Disneyland and date Katie Holmes after work, which is a complete fabrication."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementWhat is right for her, may not be right for someone else; and, no one knows what goes on behind closed doors.”
“Jennifer Aniston went on to say that the subject of having a baby is a sensitive topic for her, and no one has the right to judge other people’s choices.”
“She said it is no one’s business whether or not she has a baby.”
“Aniston told Glamour magazine back in August that not only are the pregnancy tabloid stories guilty of body shaming, but they are also an invasion into a private matter between her and her husband.”
“This is the same magazine that published a story earlier this year claiming Aniston herself was pregnant, but then didn’t mention that at all in its latest baby claims.”
“But many think the tabloid story is completely false and contradictory quotes prove the story is garbage, questioning why the insider is sharing such private and secret information with a tabloid.”
“But then the source says the actress is hoping to choose the right woman soon, completely contradicting the earlier quote, which is a huge red flag that something isn’t right with this claim.”
“And she’s vowed to raise the baby alone,” tells the insider.”
“?…❤️✌️ A post shared by @justintheroux on Aug 5, 2017 at 4:23pm PDT“Privately, she has told friends that she’s secretly gone ahead and hired a surrogate mother to carry her child to birth.”
“The publication claims to have a source that reveals Aniston’s marriage is “on the rocks,” and she is planning to be a single mom.”


"Notice what's right for her, it may not be right for others; and no one knows what's going on behind closed doors."
"Jennifer Aniston went on to say that the topic of having children is a sensitive topic for her, and no one has the right to judge other people's choices."
"She said it was nobody's business whether she had children or not."
Aniston told Glamour magazine in August that the pregnancy tabloid reports not only hurt her health, but also violated her and her husband's private affairs
"It's the same magazine that published a report earlier this year claiming that Aniston was pregnant herself, but that wasn't mentioned at all in the latest baby statement."
"But many people think that the tabloid report is totally false. The contradictory quotation proves that the report is rubbish and questions why insiders share such private information with tabloids."
"However, the source later said that the actress wanted to choose the right woman soon, which completely contradicted the earlier statement. This is a huge danger signal that this statement is not correct."
"She vowed to raise the child on her own," the person familiar with the matter said
_?_ _わ____  @Justintheroux shared a post at 4:23 p.m. Pacific time (PDT) on August 5, 2017: "in private, she told a friend that she had done it secretly and hired a surrogate mother to bring her baby to birth."
"The publication claims that sources have revealed that Aniston's marriage is" on the rocks "and that she is planning to become a single mother."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In early May, the two were spotted together in New York City, on a group outing with a whole crew of A-list pals, including Paul Rudd and his wife Julie Yaeger, Rooney Mara, and photographer friend to both Gomez and Theroux, Petra Collins.”
“Related article: All Of The Celebrity Breakups Of 2018There’s certainly truth that Gomez and Theroux have been spending some time together.”
“...years and friend respectively...”
“It s all simply speculation no confirmation has come from Gomez Theroux or either of their reps though Life Style s source adds fuel to the gossip by suggesting that Jennifer Aniston is not happy about the rumored love connection between her Theroux and Gomez her former husband of two...”
““Initially, they leaned on each other for emotional support after going through messy breakups,” the sourced continued.”
“...each other for years through their manager an insider explained to the publication adding that their shared experience of both going through headline breaking splits has pushed the pair closer...”
“According to Wednesday s initial reports from Life Style the 25 year old Bad Liar singer and the 46 year old ex husband of Jennifer Aniston have recently become closer than ever Related article Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber s Break Is Apparently Turning Into A Breakup They ve known...”
“Following very public breakups, longtime-acquaintances-turned friends Selena Gomez and Justin Theroux have reportedly become romantically involved.”


"In early May, they were found in New York City together, traveling with a large group of first-rate friends, including Paul Rudd and his wives Julie yeag and Rooney Mara, as well as Petra Collins, a cameraman friend of Gomez and serux."
"Related article: all celebrity breakups in 2008 have the fact that Gomez and Cyrus have been together all the time."
"Respectively Year and friends... "
"All this is just speculation, without confirmation from Gomes ceroux or any of their representatives, although lifestyle sources suggest that Jennifer Aniston is not satisfied with the rumored love relationship between ceroux and her two children's ex husband Gomes, which adds fuel to the gossip..."
"Initially, after a messy breakup, they relied on each other for emotional support," the person familiar with the matter continued
__︹ Over the years, through their manager, an insider explained to the media that the two splits in the headlines they had experienced together had brought them closer together.... "
"The 25-year-old bad liar singer and Jennifer Aniston's 46 year old ex husband have recently become more intimate than ever, according to a preliminary report in lifestyle magazine on Wednesday. The article says that the breakup between Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber is clearly becoming their known breakup... "
"After the public breakup, it's reported that long-time acquaintances Selena Gomez and Justin serrux became friends and started a relationship."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Jenner Leans On New Girlfriend For Support As She Goes DeafCaitlyn's Hearing Hell!”
“Jenner Leans On New Girlfriend For Support As She Goes Deaf New arm candy Sophia Hutchins doesn’t judge former Olympian for wearing hearing aids.”
“Caitlyn Jenner has been spotted sporting hearing aids, sparking fears the transgender star may be heading toward another transition — deafness, but thankfully, the former Olympian has new girlfriend Sophia Hutchins as a shoulder to lean on.”
“Jenner, 68, was snapped wearing the devices during her recent beach holiday in Mexico with her 21-year-old new trans arm candy.”
““Cait’s hearing has gotten worse over the years, and she can’t hear much without them,” a source told RadarOnline.com exclusively.”
““She’s tried covering them up with her hair, but the beach wind exposed them to the world!”Sophia, a student at California’s Pepperdine University, credits the famous former athlete for inspiring her gender reassignment surgery.”
“What’s more, she’s been totally supportive as Caitlyn struggles with hearing issues.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Jenna relies on her new girlfriend for her support because she went to the hearing hell of Dave Caitlin!"
"Jenna relies on her new girlfriend's support because she's deaf, and Sophia Hutchins won't judge a former Olympic athlete for wearing a hearing aid."
Caitlin Jenner was found to be wearing a hearing aid, raising concerns that the transsexual star may be heading for another transformation - deafness, but thankfully the former Olympic athlete has a new girlfriend, Sophia Hutchins, as her backing
Jenna, 68, was photographed wearing these devices with her 21-year-old new trans arm candy while on holiday on a Mexican beach recently
A source told reporters: "over the years, Kate's hearing is getting worse and worse. Without them, she can't hear anything." RadarOnline.com Exclusive to the website. "
"She tried to cover them with her hair, but the beach wind exposed them!"! Sophia, a student at Pepperdine University in California, praised the famous former athlete for inspiring her to undergo sex change surgery
"More importantly, she has always been fully supportive of Caitlin in solving her listening problems."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cait’s local Pets-R-Us must have had a spike in profits since Bertha came home!””
““But this dog is going to leave her broke if she keeps it up.”
““There’s no doubt she’s filling the void left by her family,” the buddy disclosed.”
“But while the pooch is providing some much-needed canine cuddles, the source worried whether Caitlyn’s dependence on her new furry friend is healthy.”
“The snitch revealed the former Olympian is making plans to have La Petite Maison build Bertha an extravagant doghouse valued at 25 000 that will have a custom designed bathtub...”
“She s bought an array of little vests and doggy clothes as well as a diamond studded collar and a 2 000 Gucci travel bag Caitlyn Jenner Kris Set To Blast Ex In Tell All There s more to come...”
““Caitlyn is spending more on the dog than herself right now,” the confidant squealed to The National ENQUIRER.”
“A pal in Caitlyn’s inner circle spilled the 67-year-old has been giving her new Labrador, Bertha, “the best of everything” — from daily home-visit dog groomers to puppy therapists.”
“Caitlyn Jenner is spoiling her brand-new puppy rotten — and we’re not talking about extra treats and rawhide bones!”


"Since Bertha came home, the profits of Kate's pet - US - must have soared!"
"But if the dog keeps on, she'll be broke."
"There is no doubt that she is filling the gap left by her family," the friend revealed
"But even though the puppy provided some much-needed dog hugs, the source was concerned about the health of Caitlin's dependence on her new furry friend."
"The informant revealed that the former Olympic athlete is planning to have La Petite Maison build a 25000 pound luxury dog house with a custom designed bathtub in it..."
"She bought a series of vests and dog clothes, a diamond studded collar and 2000 Gucci travel bags, Caitlyn Jenner Kris, ready to tell her former girlfriend that there is more to do..."
"Caitlin now spends more money on dogs than on herself," the confidant screamed to the national inquirer
A friend of Caitlin's revealed that Caitlin, 67, has been giving her new Labrador, Bertha, "the best of everything" - from the dog beautician she visits every day to the dog therapist
"Caitlin Jenner spoils her brand new puppy - we're not talking about extra treats and raw bones!"



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““For me, I have no idea what the future holds.””
“I am also tired of tucking the damn thing in all the time.”“Gender confirmation surgery is something I think anybody in my position, or the girls’ position, of course you look into,” Jenner previously said of undergoing the surgery on a 2016 episode of I Am Cait.”
“Which is why this is the first time, and the last time, I will ever speak of it.”RELATED VIDEO: Caitlyn Jenner Considered Sex Change in 1985, Ex-Wife Linda Thompson Reveals“I just want to have all the right parts.”
“You want to know, so now you know.”
““So all of you can stop staring.”
““I am telling you because I believe in candor,” she says.”
“...if she would have it done...”
“The surgery was a success and I feel not only wonderful but liberated she writes in the memoir according to RadarOnline calling the decision to undergo the surgery complex Jenner says she decided to be open about the surgery in order to stop the questions and inquiries about when or...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In her new memoir, The Secrets of My Life, the gold medal-winning Olympian–who confirmed her transition from male to female and revealed her new identity as Caitlyn in June 2015–says that she underwent gender reassignment surgery in January 2017, PEOPLE has confirmed.”


"For me, I don't know what the future will be like."
"I'm tired of putting this damn thing in my stomach all the time, too." "Gender confirmation surgery is what I think anyone in my position, or a girl's position, of course, you will consider," Jenner said of surgery in a 2016 episode of I'm Katie
"That's why this is the first and last time, and I'm going to say that." Related video: Caitlin Jenner thought about sex change in 1985, ex-wife Linda Thompson revealed, "I just want to have all the right parts."
"You want to know, so now you know."
"So you don't have to stare anymore."
"I tell you because I believe in frankness," she said
__ If she wants to... "
"The surgery was successful, and I think it's not only great, but liberating," she wrote in her memoir. According to radaronline, she called for a decision to have surgery. Jenner said she decided to be open to surgery in order to stop talking about when or Questions and inquiries. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In her new memoir, the secret of my life, the gold medalist confirmed her transformation from a male to a female and revealed her new identity as Caitlin in June 2015. She said she underwent sex change surgery in January 2017 and people confirmed that."



**Something goes wrong**
“Are you super excited to them reunited?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Selena and The Weeknd are meant to be?”
“Why are they spending time apart?”
“Having a boyfriend in the music business has been a blessing and a curse for Selena Gomez.”
“The Weeknd totally has a crazy schedule like her, but it means they can’t always be together.”
““Selena misses her boyfriend dearly as she is hard at work with her music career which is taking off again,” a source in the industry revealed EXCLUSIVELY to HollywoodLife.com.”
“Selena s music obligations mean time away from her amazing boyfriend Abel whose own music career is just as busy Selena totally knocked it out of the park with her latest single Fetish but she reportedly has been thinking of...”
“...her BF a ton...”
““It is bittersweet for Selena who feels accomplished with all of the great music she is putting out,” the insider continued.”
““She just wishes Abel could be by her side every step of the way.”


"Are you super excited about their reunion?"
"Holly bugs, do you think Serena and the weekend are predestined?"
"Why did they separate?"
"It's a blessing and a curse for Selena Gomez to have a boyfriend in music."
"The weekend schedule is as crazy as she is, but it means they can't be together all the time."
"Selena misses her boyfriend very much because she is working hard and her music career is taking off again," an industry source told reporters
"Serena's music obligation means that she is far away from her equally busy boyfriend Abel. Serena has completely driven her out of the park with her latest single fetish, but it is reported that she has been thinking..."
__ She has a lot of boyfriends... "
"It's bittersweet for Serena, who has a great sense of accomplishment in all the great music she plays," the person familiar with the matter continued
"She just wanted Abel to be by her side every step of the way."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your opinions here!”
““Jen fears that Ben’s reckless past may haunt their children and she is doing her best to protect them from any negativity in the world,” the source continued.”
“Read more details about how she feels here!”
“Jennifer Garner, 45, isn’t too thrilled with the sexual harassment allegations that have been coming out this week regarding her ex, Ben Affleck, 45, and now her main focus is to protect their children.”
““Jen is heartbroken over Ben’s situation and all of the horrible things that are being said about him,” a source close to Jennifer EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““Jen is worried for their children and especially their daughters.”
“She is doing her best to teach the kids that their father is a good man but still everyone is human and we all make mistakes sometimes Former TRL host Hilarie Burton 35 publicly revealed on Oct 10 that Ben grabbed her breast inappropriately during the taping of a segment...”
“...of the show back in 2003 and since then other women have come forward also accusing the actor of sexual assault at a Golden Globes party...”
“Ben took to Twitter to post an apology to Hilarie on Oct. 11.”
“SEE PHOTOS OF JEN AND BEN WITH THEIR ADORABLE KIDS HERE.”


"Let us know your opinion!"
"Jane is worried that Ben's reckless past may haunt their children, and she is doing her best to protect them from any negative influence in the world," the source continued
"See how she feels here!"
"Jennifer Garner, 45, is not too excited about the sexual harassment charges that came out this week about her 45 year old ex boyfriend Ben Affleck, and now her main focus is on protecting their children."
A source close to Jennifer told reporters: "Jennifer is sad about Ben's situation and all the terrible remarks about him."
"Jane is worried about their children, especially their daughters."
"She is trying her best to educate the children. Their father is a good man, but everyone is human, and we all make mistakes. Sometimes Hilarie Burton 35, a former TRL host, disclosed publicly on October 10 that Ben improperly grabbed her breast when recording the clip..."
__︹ In the 2003 show, since then, other women have come forward to accuse the actor of sexual abuse at the Golden Globe Awards party. "
"On October 11, Ben tweeted an apology to Hillary."
"Look at the pictures of Jen and Ben and their lovely children here."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““This is a disaster.”
“The anchor got her own hour on ‘TODAY’ in September.”
“Megyn Kelly is struggling to fill out her TODAY studio, RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal!”
““First, she can’t get A-list guests and now she can’t get an audience!” an insider told Radar.”
““They are having such trouble getting an audience to her live show that they are now getting Megyn to ask viewers to visit Today.com/MegynToday for tickets — on her show!” the insider added.”
““She’s literally now giving live shout outs on air to try and get a studio audience.”“Rachel Ray and Kelly [Ripa] and Ryan [Seacrest] have a six month waiting list, and it’s almost impossible to get into Wendy Williams’ and Jimmy Fallon‘s audience,” the insider noted.”
““Yet at Megyn you can hear crickets.”“When you can’t get 150 people to watch the show in the audience at 30 Rock, what chance do they have to get anyone to watch the show from home?” the insider added.”
“Now it’s getting humiliating.”“Staffers are giving out tickets to the folks that stand outside the windows of Matt [Lauer] and Savannah [Guthrie]‘s show, but that isn’t enough,” the insider concluded.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"It's a disaster."
"The anchor has his own time on today in September."
"Megan Kelly is trying to fill her studio today, RadarOnline.com The website can be disclosed exclusively! "
"First she couldn't get A-level guests, now she can't get audiences! "An insider told radar."
"It's hard for them to let the audience watch her live show. Now they ask Megan to invite the audience to visit today / megyn today to buy tickets - in her show! "The source added
"She's really yelling in the live broadcast now, trying to attract the studio audience," the person familiar with the matter said "Rachel ray, Kelly [Ripa] and Ryan [Seacrest] have a six-month waiting list, and it's almost impossible to get into Wendy Williams and Jimmy Fallon's audience."
"In Megan, however, you can hear crickets." "When you can't get 150 people to watch the show in the audience of 30 Rock, what chance do they have for anyone to watch the show at home? "The source added
"It's getting more and more embarrassing now." "Staff are handing out tickets to people standing outside the windows of Matt (Raul) and Savannah (Guthrie), but that's not enough," the person familiar with the matter concluded
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even after the robbery and everything, it’s just I’ve been staying home and I’ve been looking to him to just take care of everything while I stay home.””
“I feel a sense of responsibility just with the pressure of taking care of everything.”
“Want to keep up with the latest from PEOPLE?”
“He has a great love for Kim, but in his mind he doesn’t think Kim is a genius, and he’s telling her he knows what he’s doing,” adds the source.”
““She’s trying her best to support him on social media and show a different side of things, but it’s just not working.”“He genuinely believes he’s God and a genius and that he can do everything on his own.”
““Kim is trying to control him and the situation, but he can’t be controlled,” says the source about the couple, who are parents to 3-month-old Chicago, Saint, 2, and North, 4½.”
“He stirs the pot.”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Has Fun with Kanye’s Advice That ‘Sometimes You Need to Get Rid of Everything’Kardashian West playfully responded to her husband on social media, but the source close to the situation says it was an attempt to take charge.”
“He’s always been like that.”
“Says the source: “A lot of this is just Kanye.”
“In one recent tweet, West suggested the need to “get rid of everything.”A source close to the rapper contends that while West can be “eccentric and erratic,” not everyone sees his latest actions as cause for concern.”


"Even after the robbery and other things, it's just that I stay at home all the time, and I always hope that he can take care of everything when I stay at home."
"With the pressure to take care of everything, I feel a sense of responsibility."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
The source added: "he likes Kim very much, but in his opinion, Kim is not a genius and he tells her he knows what he's doing."
"She did her best to support him on social media and show the other side of the story, but it didn't work at all." "He sincerely believes that he is God and genius and that he can do anything."
"King tried to control him and the situation, but he couldn't," the source said, adding that the couple were the parents of three month old Chicago saints 2 and 4 / 2 North
Related video: Kim Kardashian's advice to Kanye is interesting. Kardashian West mischievously responds to her husband on social media, but people familiar with the matter say it's to take control
"He's always been like this."
"A lot of this is just Kanye," the source said
"In a recent tweet, West hinted at the need to" get rid of everything. ". A source close to the rapper believes that while West may be "eccentric," not everyone thinks his recent behavior deserves attention. "



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're listing all the similarities between J-Rod that makes their compalibility look solid as rock.”
“And there's a lot more that these two have in common than Rodriguez named.”
““Our kids get along really well, we’re both from New York, we’re both Latin, we’re both in our forties, we’re really enjoying life, but she really is one of the most impressive and smartest human beings I have ever met," he told Extra.”
“Many fans think the two celebrities have finally met their match— and Rodriguez agrees.”
“Lopez and Rodriguez have been hitting it off as a couple since they started dating back in March.”


"We've listed all the similarities between j-rods to make their compatibility seem rock solid."
"These two people have a lot more in common than Rodriguez said."
"Our kids get along well, we're all from New York, we're all Latin, we're all in our 40s, we really enjoy life, but she's really one of the most impressive and intelligent people I've ever met," he told extra
"A lot of fans think that the two celebrities have finally met their rivals - Rodriguez agrees
"Lopez and Rodriguez have been on good terms since they started dating in March."



**Something goes wrong**
“...wanting to hook up with Kardashians Kourtney 39 Khloe 34 and Jenner sisters Kendall 22 and Kylie 21”
“A black tracksuit clad Kris smiled and responded “I love Kanye” while helping her ma into an awaiting car.”
“We’ve got her mom Kris Jenner’s reaction to Yeezy’s wild new song.”
“Kanye West‘s epic appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live last week apparently wasn’t enough to satisfy his urge for people to keep talking about him.”
“On Aug. 11 he released the song “XTCY” where not only did he rap about the club drug, he also rhymed about how much he fantasized about having sex with wife Kim Kardashian‘s four hot sisters.”
“TMZ caught up with the ladies’ mom Kris Jenner, 62, on Aug. 15 and got her take on her son in law’s creepy desires.”
“As usual, Kris totally played things like a pro to make sure no one in her family came off looking bad.”
““Kris, what did you think when you heard Kanye’s new song about having fantasies about his sisters in law?”
“What was going through your mind Kris?”
“Was that just more of that crazy Kanye talk?” A TMZ cameraman asked as the Kar-Jenner matriarch was leaving Nate and Al’s Deli in Beverly Hills with her mom MJ.”


__ Trying to hook up with Kardashian Courtney 39, Chloe 34, Jenna sisters Kendall 22 and Kelly 21 "
Chris, wearing a black sportswear, replied with a smile, "I love kenye" and helped her mother get into a waiting car
"We saw her mother Chris Jenner's reaction to Jesse's new song."
"Kanye West's epic appearance at Jimmy Kimmel last week is obviously not enough to satisfy his impulse to keep people talking about him."
On August 11, he released the song "xtcy", in which he not only talks about club drugs, but also rhymes his fantasy of having sex with four Spice Girls of his wife Kim Kardashian
"On August 15, TMZ met Kris Jenner, a 62 year old woman's mother, to let her accept her son-in-law's creepy desire."
"As always, Chris plays like a professional to make sure that no one in the family looks bad."
"Chris, what do you think when you hear Kanye's new song" fantasizing about my sister-in-law "
"Chris, what are you thinking?"
"Is that more like that crazy Kanye conversation? "Asked a TMZ photographer as Carl Jenner's matriarch and her mother, MJ, left knight and Al's Deli in Beverly Hills



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s been through low points before, and she knows people make mistakes.””
““She’s very forgiving towards him, especially since he is the father of her children,” the source said.”
“...focuses on his music after a series of explosive tweets and interviews Kim Kardashian admits she didn t realize just how deeply much her ordeal being held at gunpoint during the 2016 Paris robbery affected her husband...”
“Appearing on Live with Kelly and Ryan on Friday, the mom of three admitted she wasn’t fully aware of the anxiety plaguing the rapper.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Not really, because he always is so strong,” she said.”
“Obviously he made a lot of changes with our security detail but as far as emotionally he always was really strong and my rock Image zoom Credit Evan Agostini Invision AP Now I can read the reports of what the people in jail said they said they had been following...”
“...me for two years and that s crazy she added...”
“There was a couple dozen people involved so they definitely were such a machine that they figured out when he wasn t going to be there Kardashian 37 was robbed in her Paris hotel room in October 2016 by masked men who tied her up while they stole two cellphones...”
“...and approximately 10 million worth of jewelry including a 4 million ring...”


"He's had a bad time before, and she knows people make mistakes."
"She was very tolerant of him, especially because he was the father of her child," the source said
__︹ After a series of explosive tweets and interviews, Kim Kardashian began to follow his music. She admitted that she didn't realize how much the pain of being pointed at by gunpoint in the 2016 Paris robbery affected her husband.... "
"When performing live with Kelly and Ryan last Friday, the mother of three admitted that she was not fully aware of the anxiety that plagued the rapper."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Not so good, because he's always so strong," she said
"Obviously, he's made a lot of changes to our security details, but emotionally, he's always been strong, and my rock image is like Evan Agostini invision (AP). Now, I can read reports that people in prison say they've been following..."
"I've been working for two years and it's crazy," she added
"There are dozens of people involved, so they must be a machine. They know when Kardashian is not there. In October 2016, Kardashian was robbed by masked men in a Paris hotel room on the 37th. They tied her up when they stole two mobile phones..."
__ And jewelry worth about 10 million, including a 4 million ring... "



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Curtis is also a mom to son Ethan, 20, who she shares with ex Steven Cimini.)”
“March...”
“...demanding sole custody...”
“The Rehab Addict star 41 has been hit with new allegations from Shane Maguire the father of her son Harper claiming she is not a fit mother and has allegedly been intentionally sabotaging the relationship between the boy and his...”
“...dad according to legal documents obtained by The Blast...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Maguire s filing states that the HGTV and DIY Network personality played games with the times and locations at which they were supposed to exchange Harper of whom they currently have joint custody noting that coparenting has proven to be...”
“...a nightmare and things have deteriorated between the parents to the detriment of Harper Image zoom Credit Nicole Curtis Instagram It also claims that the home renovation TV star has been doing all she can to prevent any sort of...”
“...set schedule that would allow Harper to be with both of his parents without interference including an alleged episode that turned into a game of cat and mouse on Father s Day when Maguire says he had to drive to...”
“...several different locations over two and a half hours to try and track down Curtis and take custody of Harper...”


(Curtis is also Ethan's mother. Ethan is 20 years old. She is a half parent of former Steven simini.)
"March..."
__ Request separate custody... "
"Drug star No. 41 has been newly charged by Shane Maguire. Her son Harper's father claims that she is not a healthy mother and that she has been deliberately destroying the relationship between the boy and his son..."
__ Dad, according to the legal documents from the explosion... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The paper submitted by Maguire points out that HGTV and DIY network celebrities play games at the time and place where they should exchange Harper. They currently have joint custody of Harper and point out that joint custody has proved to be..."
__ A nightmare and things worsen between the parents of Harper image scaling credit Nicole Curtis instagram, which also claims that the home decoration TV star has been doing her best to prevent any form of
__ Set a schedule for Harper and his parents to be together without interference, including a so-called episode that turns into a cat and mouse game on father's day, and Maguire says he has to drive to... "
__ For two and a half hours, trying to track Curtis and detain Harper in several different places... "



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I don’t even want to think about that too much.”
“While preparations for the pair’s wedding are (finally) underway, Justin is adamant that his god pal Terry do the photography.”
“Considering the recent rash of Theroux interviews, I’ve been finding it a bit odd that Uncle Terry has not been quoted at all.”
“After all, Terry and Justin DO spend a lot of time together.”
“Jennifer used to hang out with Terry too – Terry took the first exclusive photos of Justin and Jennifer together, and subsequently did portraits of JustJen months later as well.”
“But that was back in 2011.”
“I haven’t heard much about Jennifer spending time with Terry recently, just Justin.”
“So maybe this Star Mag story is true?”
“Terry Richardson does not have a friend in Jennifer Aniston.”
“Richardson, 48, who is currently facing accusations of sexual assault by multiple models, has caused major tension between Jen and her fiancé of nearly two years, Justin Theroux.”


"I don't even think about it too much."
"When the wedding preparations were (finally) underway, Justin insisted that his divine partner Terry take photos."
"Considering the recent spate of interviews, it's a bit strange that uncle Terry hasn't been quoted at all."
"After all, Terry and Justin did spend a lot of time together."
"Jennifer used to spend a lot of time with Terry - Terry first took an exclusive picture of Justin and Jennifer and then a few months later took a portrait of Justin and Jennifer."
"But it was in 2011."
"I haven't heard much about Jennifer and Terry recently, just Justin."
"Well, maybe the story of this star magazine is true?"
"Terry Richardson and Jennifer Aniston have no friends."
"Richardson, 48, is currently facing charges of sexual assault by several models, and her relationship with her fiance of nearly two years, Justin serrux, is seriously strained."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She waved to crowds as she entered alongside Kate, who wore a white dress.”
“...very congruent friendship with her sister in law...”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Examining the sisters-in-law at Wimbledon, Ms James said it is clear they share a close bond which is due to the unusual situation they have found themselves in.”
“It is also partly due to Meghan Markle adopting Prince Harry’s fun personality.”
“Ms James said: “Kate is always very much the pitch-perfect princess in terms of her regal-but-warm-looking body language and the levels of confidence she displays at royal events.”


"She came in with Kate in her white dress and waved to the crowd."
__ The friendship with her sister-in-law is very harmonious. "
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"When inspecting the sisters in law at Wimbledon, James said it was clear that they had a close relationship because they found themselves in an unusual situation."
"Part of the reason is that Megan markel adopted Prince Harry's interesting personality."
"Kate is always the perfect princess, whether it's the dignified and passionate body language or the level of confidence she shows in Royal events," Ms. James said



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“5.”
“News.”
“'”2.”
“Because if I don’t, I’m going to die.”
“I’m going to use it now.”
““It wasn’t until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened up a channel for me to be like, ‘God gave me a gift.”
“She came out with a new album that includes a single titled, “Used To Love You.”“It was really a life-saver record for me,” she told Time.”
“Gwen had a messy divorce from Gavin Rossdale after she reportedly found out he cheated.”
“Although the singer has made a new album about the end of the relationship, there is still mystery surrounding what caused the divorce.”
““That’s when it became painfully obvious that it wasn’t going to work out in my ­marriage,” he told Billboard.”


_5._
"News."
_'_2._
"Because if I don't, I'm going to die."
"I'll use it now."
"It wasn't until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened a channel for me, making me feel like" God gave me a gift. "
"She has released a new album, including a single called once loved you." "It's a life-saving record for me," she told time
"Gwen is reported to have had a messy divorce with Gavin Rosedale after she found out he was cheating."
"Although the singer made a new album about the end of the relationship, the reason for the divorce is still a mystery."
"Since then, I have painfully realized that my marriage will not bear fruit," he told billboard



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SO EXCITED FOR #HannibalHester — anne ☆ (@mshappychele) August 18, 2016In short, she’s giving a whole new definition to the term “slay.”The post Lea Michele as Hannibal Lecter is a “Scream Queens” moment to die for appeared first on HelloGiggles.”
“#ScreamQueens — daniah (@legschele) August 18, 2016@msleamichele I'm genuinely scared of horror but you could make me watch anything and make me love it.”
“Can't wait for September #hannibalhester — Jessie (@alwaysLoveLea) August 18, 2016@msleamichele IM so excited to see you slay as Hester!!”
“@msleamichele one promo and we are already in love with this new Hester!”
“Story continuesTons of people are stoked to see what antics these dangerous women will get into next season and are crawling out of their skin to see Lea reprise her awesomely villainous role.”
“The reaction to the trailer (which also features some of the biggest and most exciting names we’ll get to see in the new season, including Jamie Lee Curtis, John Stamos, Taylor Lautner, and, of course, Emma Roberts) has been extremely positive.”
“...nightmaresSo it only seems right that Lea begin to make Hester more and more like the iconic and goosebumps-inducing character as she works her way back in to the Kappa Kappa Tau world.”
“And even though he was genuinely terrifying, we still couldn’t help but be strangely be charmed by him.”
“Hannibal, like Hester, was both incredibly intelligent and manipulative (not to mention a total sociopath).”
“It’s a choice that is totally perfect for her given the truly malicious potential of her Hester character.”


"I'm very excited about # Hannibal Hester Anne (@ mshappychele). In short, she gives a new definition of" slow ". "After that, Lea Michele's Hannibal Lecker is a moment of" Scream Queen ", which first appeared on hellogles."
"Scream Queen Danya (@ legschele) August 18, 2016 @ msleamichele I'm really scared of horror, but you can show me anything I like."
"Can't wait for September 幡 Hannibal Jesse (@ alwayslovelea) August 18, 2016 @ msleamichele I'm glad to see you killed like Hester!"
"@ msleamichele one promo, we have fallen in love with this new Hester!"
"The story goes on, and people want to know what antics these dangerous women are going to put on next season. They want to see Leia play her awe inspiring evil role again."
"The response to the trailer has been very positive (there are some of the greatest and most exciting names we will see in the new season, including Jamie Lee Curtis, John Stamos, Taylor Lautner and, of course, Emma Roberts)
__︹ Nightmares, so Leia, in her return to the world of kappa kappa Tao, began to make Hester more and more like an iconic, goosebumping character, which seems to be right
"Although he is really terrible, we can't help being fascinated by him."
"Hannibal, like Hester, was both clever and manipulative (not to mention a total antisocial)
"Given the potential for real malice in Hester's character, the choice was perfect for her."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Blows the Whistle on Elite Hollywood […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“The website Neon Nettle, which mixes real news and fake, is falsely blaring in a headline, “ Robert Downey Jr.”
“Gossip Cop can expose what’s going on with this misleading story.”
“Robert Downery Jr. did not “blow the whistle” on a supposed “elite Hollywood pedophile ring,” despite an outrageous report.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Sound the clarion call of Hollywood elite [ ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"The neon nettle website, which mixes real news with false headlines, is false," says Robert Downey Jr
"Gossip police can reveal the truth of this misleading story."
"Robert downley Jr. didn't" whistle "on a person who was considered to be an" elite Hollywood pedophile Gang, "despite an outrageous report



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The bloated, double-chinned mother of two was wobbly as she made her way to a waiting car and nearly passed out as soon as she got inside.”
“...was spotted spilling out of LAX airport barely able to walk...”
“There s real concern that she s on her way to a serious health problem possibly even an overdose if she continues down this path ABUSING HER BODY After a boozy coast to coast flight on Aug 10 Jessica 37”
““Lately, she’s been looking trashed, slurring her words, not making sense — no wonder people think she’s drunk, on drugs or both.”
““Poor Jess really seems to be losing it,” confides a friend.”
“Rather, it’s her wine-swilling, bingeand-purge lifestyle that’s endangering her health and could ultimately cause her children to be taken from her.”
“But it’s not her shocking 40-pound weight gain or sloppy attire that has loved ones worried.”
“SONGBIRD turned fashion mogul Jessica Simpson is bursting at the seams, looking anything but pulled together lately.”
“Boozed Up and 40 Pounds Overweight, Jessica Simpson Could Lose Her Kids if She Can’t Clean Up Her Act.”


"The bloated, double chin mother of two staggered to a waiting car and nearly fainted as soon as she entered the house."
__ Found spilling from Los Angeles Airport, almost unable to walk... "
"What people really worry about is that after a coast to coast binge flight on August 10, Jessica 37, if she continues to abuse her body on this road, she will face serious health problems, possibly even overdose."
"Recently, she looks slovenly, blurry and meaningless - no wonder people think she's drunk, on drugs, or both."
"Poor Jesse really seems to have lost it," a friend revealed
"To be more precise, it was her drinking, drinking and purifying lifestyle that endangered her health and could eventually lead to her children being taken away."
"But it's not her amazing 40 pound weight gain or sloppy clothes that worries her lover."
"Jessica Simpson, a fashion tycoon born in songbird, looks excited recently and doesn't look like anything."
"She's drunk and 40 pounds overweight, and if Jessica Simpson can't turn over, she may lose her baby."



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLife reached out to Khloe and Tristan’s reps for comment.”
“They can’t get through one conversation without it turning into a huge argument.”Speculation as to where Khloe would live long-term sparked when the Cleveland Cavaliers player was caught on camera allegedly cheating on his then-pregnant girlfriend.”
“A new report claims they’ll be living on the west coast again very soon – but not with each other.”
“Here’s what we know!”
“Khloe Kardashian, 33, has been living in Cleveland with Tristan Thompson, 27, and their daughter True Thompson, but they might all be packing up their things very soon!”
“A new report claims that the family will be headed back to Khloe’s hometown of Los Angeles, but they won’t all be together when they get there.”
““They’re both leaving Cleveland and heading to LA, but they’re going to live apart,” a source told Life&Style.”
““They’ve been fighting nonstop.”
“The insider is saying that Tristan’s actions still haven’t fully been forgiven.”
“But now that her baby girl is slightly older and her baby daddy is off-duty, going back to be around the rest of the KarJenner crew for the summer might be a good idea.”


"Hollywood Life contacted representatives of Khloe and Tristan for comments."
"It's impossible for them not to cause a heated argument in a conversation." When a Cleveland Cavaliers player was caught on camera cheating on his then pregnant girlfriend, speculation about where Chloe would live for a long time was triggered
"A new report says they will soon be living on the West Coast again - but not together."
"We know that!"
"Khloe Kardashian, 33, Tristan Thompson, 27, and their daughter true Thompson have been living in Cleveland, but they may be packing up soon!"
"A new report says the family will return to Khloe's hometown of Los Angeles, but they won't all be together when they get there."
"They're all leaving Cleveland for Los Angeles, but they're going to be separated," a source told life & style
"They've been fighting all the time."
"People familiar with the matter said that Tristan's behavior has not been fully forgiven."
"But now that her baby girl is a little older and her little father is off work, it might be a good idea to go back to the other crew in kajana for the summer."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Amy Poehler Sports Food On Her Feet For A Grocery Store Run — See Photos...”
“See How His Recent Beach Shots Compare To The Instagram Thirst TrapsPHOTOSSay Cheese(burger Sneakers)!”
“LooksPHOTOSAre Max Ehrich's Abs Too Good To Be True?”
“Sarah Jessica Parker Models Sexy Shoes At Her Own Retail Boutique In New York CityPHOTOSHarry Styles Isn't Afraid To Break The Rules When It Comes To Fashion — See His Most Memorable (& Talked About!)”
“Take A Peek At Cobie Smulders & Taran Killam New Year's PurgePHOTOSIs That You, Manolo?”
“See The Laguna Beach Alum s Most Daring Photos PHOTOS Southern Charm Star Madison LeCroy Is No Stranger To Being Involved In Several Love Triangles See Her Sexiest Photos PHOTOS Out With The Old In With The New...”
“PHOTOS Ivanka Trump Relaxes On Miami Balcony In Chic Maxi Dress Ahead Of Dad s Second Impeachment Trial Photos PHOTOS Bad Boy Trey Songz Is No Stranger To Stripping Down On Stage See The Rapper s Sexiest Pics PHOTOS Kristin Cavallari Has Always Been A Hot Commodity On Reality TV”


"Amy Poehler is running in the grocery store with sports food on her feet - see photo..."
"Take a look at his recent photos on the beach and compare them with instagram shout trapsphotossay cheese!"
"Look at the picture. Is Max Ehrlich's ABS great?"
"Sarah Jessica Parker models sexy shoes at her own retail boutique in New York City. When it comes to fashion, she's not afraid to break the rules - look at his most memorable (and talked about!) "
"Look at the new year cleaning photos of Kobe smolder and Taran kiram. Is that you, Manolo?"
"Look at the boldest picture of alum on Laguna Beach, southern glamour movie star Madison LeCroy is no stranger to participating in several love triangles. Look at her sexiest picture, always out and new together..."
"Photos Ivanka trump in a chic dress on the Miami balcony relaxing before dad's second impeachment trial bad boy Trey songz undressed on stage is no stranger to see the sexiest picture of rap singer Christine cavalari has always been a hit on reality TV"



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Of course the Queen may also choose to make an exception for Harry's children, like she did for William.”
“Prince Harry would then likely become HRH The Prince Henry, meaning Meghan would become HRH The Princess Henry.”
“While she will become a princess by marriage, for someone to assume the title of Princess, they must be born into the Royal Family, just like Princess Charlotte is a Princess because of her father's status.”
“So why won't Meghan be given a Princess title?”
“...she wished...”
“Prince Harry is currently busy prepared for his spring wedding Picture REUTERS Joe Giddens Pool Catherine Duchess Of Cambridge who was just known as Kate Middleton before she married Prince William Duke Of Cambridge in April 2011 could also go by the name of HRH Princess William of Wales if...”
“Other titles available are Clarence and Buckingham.”
“This view is actually shared by a number of experts who previously predicted the title, that has sat vacant since 1843, would be given to Prince William before he became the Duke of Cambridge.”
“'Her rank would be a princess by marriage of the United Kingdom, Great Britain and Northern Ireland.'”
“'Meghan would be HRH the Duchess of Sussex,' Joenig has previously told Royal Contral.”


"Of course, the queen may choose to make an exception for Harry's children, just as she did for William."
"Prince Harry is likely to be Prince Henry, which means Megan will be princess Henry."
"Although she will become a princess through marriage, in order to get the title of princess, they must be born in the royal family, just as Princess Charlotte became a princess because of her father's status."
"Then why didn't Megan get the title of princess?"
__ She wants to... "
"Prince Harry is currently busy preparing his spring wedding photos for Reuters Joe Giddens, Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge, who has just been known as Kate Middleton before she married Prince William in April 2011. The Duke of Cambridge can also pass the name of Princess William of Wales if..."
"Other titles include Clarence and Buckingham Palace."
"This view is actually supported by some experts who have predicted that the title that has been vacant since 1843 will be awarded to Prince William before he becomes Duke of Cambridge."
"Her rank will be princess of England, Great Britain and Northern Ireland."
"Megan will be the Duchess of Sussex," jonig had previously told the Royal control



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Paris Jackson "planning big career like dad Michael" is made-up story...”
“Jennifer Lopez "upset" Victoria Beckham hung out with Marc Anthony?”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk this story.”
“A rep for the actor tells us there's no truth to it.”
“John Lamparski /Getty Images for New York Fashion Week: The ShowsAn alleged insider, however, tells RadarOnline that Theroux "was sweet on Selena when he and Jen hung out with her," and now the newly-single actor is pursuing the singer via text.”
“The questionable source adds, "He's asking for major trouble by trying to hang out with her so soon after his and Jen's split."”
“The supposed tipster goes on to say that Gomez has been receptive to the actor's advances, before further speculating that Aniston will be infuriated when she finds out.”
“The seemingly phony insider says the actress believed the pop star was "very much her friend, not Justin's," so she'll likely see their communications as a betrayal.”
“None of this is remotely true.”
“While the blog hides behind an anonymous and untraceable source, Theroux's rep tells Gossip Cop on the record that he hasn't been exchanging flirty texts with Gomez.”


"Paris Jackson" plans big business like his father Michael "is a fabricated story..."
"Jennifer Lopez" sad "Victoria Beckham with Mark Anthony?"
"The gossip police can completely expose this story."
"A representative of the actor told us that there was no reason."
"John lamparski / Getty Images of New York Fashion Week: however, showsan, known as an insider, told radarlonline that Theroux" was nice to Selena when she was dating, "and now the new single actor is texting the singer
The suspicious source added: "he's asking for trouble when he wants to be with Jane so soon after breaking up with her."
"It is speculated that the informant went on to say that Gomez had accepted the actor's progress, and then further guessed that Aniston would be angry when she found out."
The hypocritical insider said the actress thought the pop star was "very much like her friends, not Justin's friends," so she was likely to see their communication as betrayal
"None of this is true."
"Although the blog is hidden behind an anonymous and untraceable source, Theroux's representative told the gossip police on record that he did not exchange flirting messages with Gomez."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Witherspoon is repped by CAA and LBI Entertainment; Smith is with Verve, Kaplan/Perrone and attorney Karl Austen; McCullah is with Jaret Entertainment.”
“But the film has been a staple for young-female audiences who’ve rediscovered it on DVD or through the hit stage musical that continues to tour.”
“The pic is coming together quickly.”
“Kirsten “Kiwi” Smith and Karen McCullah, who adapted the Amanda Brown novel for the 2001 first film, are in final talks to write the script.”
“Original producer Marc Platt and his Platt Productions president Adam Siegel are producing, and they will be joined this time by Witherspoon, through her Hello Sunshine banner.”
“The scribes will begin writing immediately and the next step is to secure a director.”
“Robert Luketic helmed the original pic.”
“MGMIt has been 17 years since the original, and the sequel, Legally Blonde 2: Red, White & Blonde came out in 2003.”
“The original grossed $141 million worldwide on an $18 million budget, and the sequel brought in $124 million on a $45 million budget.”
“The project reunites Smith and McCullah, who as a team generated such comedies as Legally Blonde, 10 Things I Hate About You and House Bunny, and with credits on She’s the Man and The Ugly Truth.”


"Witherspoon is represented by CAA and LBI entertainment; Smith works with verve, Kaplan / Perrone and attorney Karl Austen; McCullah works with Jaret entertainment."
"But the film has always been a staple food for young female audiences, who rediscovered it on DVD or through popular musicals that continue to tour."
"The pictures came out very quickly."
Kirsten Chevy Smith and Karen McCullah, who adapted Amanda Brown's novel for their first film in 2001, are in final negotiations on the script
"Mark Pratt, the original producer, and Adam Segal, the president of his Pratt production company, are working on it, and this time they will be joined by Witherspoon through her" Hello sunshine "banner."
"The scribe will start writing immediately, and the next step is to find a director."
"Robert luketich is in charge of the original."
Mgmit has been 17 years since its original work. The sequel "legal blonde 2: red, white and blonde" came out in 2003
"The original won $141 million in the global box office with a budget of $18 million, and the sequel won $124 million with a budget of $45 million."
"This project reunited Smith and McCullah. As a team, they produced comedies such as" legal blonde "," 10 things I hate about you and bunny "and won high praise on" she's a man "and" ugly truth. "



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get more Miley and Liam goss:”
“"She's still been going to parties, but not nearly as many as she used to, and it's always with Liam glued to her side.”
“Things are better than ever between Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth.”
“In fact heat can reveal that the delay to their summer wedding plans is actually because they want to start a family For the last couple of months Miley and Liam have been talking about when not if they have a baby says an insider close to the A list...”
“...pair who first dated from 2010 2013 before reuniting nine months ago at New Year and getting re engaged...”
“"They're not admitting anything officially, but all their friends reckon they're already trying and could even be pregnant already – a Christmas baby would be perfect."”
“©GettyThe internet was alight with rumours last week, after pics emerged of actor Liam, 26, out for lunch with Miley, 23, who was wearing a very baggy shirt over what Twitter users pointed out could be a 'baby bump'.”
“And insiders say the singer – who’s always been open about her love of marijuana and partying – has been cleaning up her act in recent months.”
“"She's eating really healthily, hasn't touched alcohol in forever, and even stopped dyeing her hair!"”
“...says the friend.”


"More Miley and Liam Goss?"
"She still goes to parties a lot, but not as much as before. She's always stuck with Liam."
"The relationship between Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth is better than ever."
"In fact, the heat can reveal that delaying their summer wedding plans is actually because they want to start a family, and in the past few months, Miley and Liam have been talking about when not, if they have a child," said an insider close to the list
__ They dated for the first time from 2010 to 2013, met again and got engaged again in the new year nine months ago. "
"They don't officially admit anything, but all their friends think they're trying, maybe even pregnant - a Christmas baby is perfect."
"? gettyth last week, the Internet was rife with rumors that after photos of 26 year old actor Liam and 23-year-old Miley having lunch, she was wearing a very loose shirt, which Twitter users pointed out could be a" baby lump. "
"The singer, who has always been open-minded about marijuana and parties, has been cleaning up her behavior in recent months, according to people familiar with the matter
"She eats healthily. She hasn't been drinking for a long time. She doesn't even dye her hair!"
__ My friend said



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And Zahara and Viv want to help their mum pick out a dress.'”
“Even with all the drama, he’s come out a better person, and he’s grateful to Angie for kicking him in the pants when he needed it most.'”
“USA that the former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track.”
“'They’ve called off their legal attack dogs and are working through the logistics of withdrawing their divorce petitions… They don’t want to throw away the 11 years they spent together,' a source spilled to the magazine.”
“The pair have been spending more time together ever since Ange 42 and the kids moved into a mansion just down the road from Brad 54 making it easier for the Fight Club star to spend more time with their children Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and...”
“...twins Knox and Vivienne nine...”
“Pitt and Jolie share six children Getty'Things are so much better among the entire family now,' continues the insider, confessing that Brad is now fully committed to being sober.”
“'He’s sober and attending weekly therapy sessions.”
“In fact, the shock split may have been Angie’s plan to get Brad to shape up.”
“'Shiloh and Knox will be in charge of food and music selection.”


"Zahara and vivi want to help their mother choose a dress."
"Even with so much drama, he's become a better man and he's grateful to Angie for kicking his pants when he needs them most."
"The former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track."
A source said: "they have stopped legal assault dogs and are withdrawing divorce applications through logistics They don't want to lose the 11 years they spent together. "
"Since Angie, 42, and her children moved into a mansion near Brad 54, they have spent more and more time together, which makes it easier for the fight club star to spend more time with the children, 16 from Maddox, 14 from Zahara, 11 from Shiloh, and..."
__ The twins Knox and Vivian nine... "
"Pete and Julie have six children, and Getty's" family is much better now, "the insider continued, admitting that Brad is fully committed to staying awake."
"He's sober, and he's in therapy every week."
"In fact, this shocking breakup may be Angie's plan to cheer Brad up."
"Shiloh and Knox will be responsible for the choice of food and music."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementJennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have not commented on their relationship since their joint statement announcing their split.”
“But, if the Friends star is thinking about rekindling their romance, it seems that Theroux isn’t necessarily on the same page.”
“It seems that Aniston is pining for Theroux now that Brad Pitt is with Neri Oxman, and she would like to give her marriage another shot, even if it is just for a trial period.”
““Jen’s done a lot of meditating and says she forgives Justin for messing her around so badly.”
“She’s keen to move on and forge a good relationship with him, instead of arguing over money or slinging mud back and forth among their mutual friends,” claims an insider.”
“The source added that if Theroux gave Aniston another chance she would take him back in a heartbeat When the couple called it quits back in February they had been living separate lives for months and they couldn t come to an agreement over where to live or if they...”
“...should start a family...”
“Also, during their two years of marriage, Theroux allegedly had a wandering eye and got too close to actress Naomi Watts, which upset Aniston.”
“Last week, their mutual friend, Jimmy Kimmel, threw a birthday party for his 1-year-old son Billy, and Theroux purposely left early to avoid his ex.”
“Sources say Cardenas is nothing like Aniston and is cool in a “New York way.” But, it is nothing serious, and insiders claim he is playing the field and enjoying being single again.”


"Since Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru announced their separation in a joint statement, they have not commented on their relationship."
"But if the stars in friends are thinking about rekindling their relationship, friends doesn't seem to be on the same page."
"Now that Brad Pitt and nery Oxman are together, Aniston seems to miss Cyrus very much. She wants to give her marriage another chance, even if it's only on probation."
"Jane meditated a lot and said she forgives Justin for making such a mess of her."
"She would like to continue to build a good relationship with him instead of arguing about money or throwing mud back and forth between their mutual friends," said one person familiar with the matter
"The source added that if seru gave Aniston another chance, she would bring him back as soon as the couple announced their separation in February. They have been separated for several months and they can't just live there or whether they..."
__ We should have a family... "
In addition, during the two years of their marriage, it was said that seru had a lost eye and was too close to the actress Naomi Watts, which made Aniston very unhappy
Last week, their mutual friend, Jimmy Kimmel, held a birthday party for his 1-year-old son, Billy. Serux left early to avoid his ex girlfriend
It is reported that Cadenas is not like Aniston at all. He is cool in "New York Style". However, this is not serious. Insiders say that kadenas is playing games and likes to be single again



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyDo you think The Weeknd should be worried that Selena is working with Jude?”
“In addition to his three kids with Sadie, the actor has two more children from two different women.”
“Jude has been in multiple relationships since his split from his wife Sadie Frost in 2003.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyHowever, The Weeknd might have reason to worry!”
“Source: BACKGRID“Everything’s been going great in their relationship but this jealousy of his is getting on her nerves,” the insider admitted.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAccording to the source, The Weeknd has even been keeping tabs on Selena’s phone to see if she’s getting texts from Jude!”
“Source: BACKGRID“She’s annoyed that he doesn’t seem to trust her,” the insider said.”
“But The Weeknd’s been a real pill about it,” the source told OK!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID“Selena is really excited about working with one of her favorite directors and her crush Jude Law.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Source: do you think you should worry about Selena and Jude working together this week?"
"In addition to having three children with Sadie, the actor has two children of different women."
"Jude has been in multiple relationships since he broke up with his wife Sadie frost in 2003."
The article continues with the following advertising source: however, there may be reason to worry about the weekend! "
Source: backgrid, a person familiar with the matter, admitted: "their relationship has always been good, but jealousy of him has made her nervous."
According to the source, Selina has even been following her cell phone this week to see if she has received a text message from Jude
"Source: backgrid," said the person familiar with the matter. "She was annoyed that he didn't seem to trust her."
"But this week is really a pill," the source told OK. "
"Serena is really happy to be working with one of her favorite directors and her infatuated Jude Law."



**Something goes wrong**
““She’s convinced she’s found the one!””
“Things quickly heated up after she introduced him to close friends — including Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux — at a July 4 party at her home in Austin, Texas.”
“She’s so in love with photographer and model Bryan Randall that she’s headed for the altar, said pals.”
“The marriage even has the blessing of her closest friend, actor George Clooney!”
““George is telling Sandra not to be scared to take the plunge again,” said a source.”
““He knows she’s gun-shy after her marriage to Jesse James exploded in a cheating scandal five years ago.”
““But he’s met Bryan and likes him — and he sees how happy he’s making Sandra!”George, 54, finally gave up his own single status last year when he wed international law and human rights attorney Amal Alamuddin.”
““He’s telling Sandra that if he can find true love again, so can she,” added the insider.”
“Sandra, 51, and 49-year-old Bryan were secretly dating for months and only recently went public.”
“A month later, Bryan was Sandra’s plus-one at Jennifer and Justin’s surprise wedding.”


"She's sure she found that!"
"On July 4, she had a party at her home in Austin, Texas, where she introduced him to close friends, including Jennifer Aniston and Justin selux, and then things quickly got hot."
"She loves photographer and model Bryan Randall so much. She's walking towards the altar," friends said
"The marriage was even blessed by her closest friend, actor George Clooney!"
"George told Sandra not to be afraid to take another risk," one source said
"He knows she's shy because her marriage to Jesse James broke out in a fraud scandal five years ago."
"But he met Brian and fell in love with him - he saw how happy he had made Sandra! "Last year, George, 54, married Amal alamuddin, an international law and human rights lawyer, and eventually gave up his single status."
"He told Sandra that if he could find true love again, she could find it," the person familiar with the matter added
Sandra, 51, and Bryan, 49, dated secretly for several months and only recently became public
"A month later, at the surprise wedding of Jennifer and Justin, Brian was Sandra's other half."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His crush on the actress was revealed in 2016, a year after he apparently ensured she had a small part in The Big Short, which he produced.”
“It’s not the first time Brad’s feelings for Margot have been reported.”
“An insider told Radar Online: ‘Brad is very taken with Margot, and their chemistry is the talk of the cast.’Sadly for Brad, however, the actress is happily married to Tom Ackerley, whom she wed in 2016.”
“According to an on-set observer, Brad, 54, is clearly smitten with the Aussie beauty.”
“The pair are co-starring in Quentin Tarantino’s Once Upon A Time In Hollywood, which has just started production in Los Angeles.”
“To add to Jennifer’s drama, Brad Pitt’s wandering eye has once again landed on the gorgeous and talented Margot Robbie.”


"His infatuation with the actress came to light in 2016, and a year ago, he apparently ensured that she played a small role in his big short films."
"It's not the first time Brad's feelings for Margot have been reported."
"Brad loves Margot very much, and the chemistry between them is the subject of the actors," an insider told radar online Unfortunately for Brad, however, the actress happily married Tom ackerley, who married in 2016. "
"Brad, 54, was clearly fascinated by the Australian beauty, according to a live observer
"The two are co starring in Quentin Tarantino's" once on a time in Hollywood, "which just started shooting in Los Angeles
"In order to add color to Jennifer's drama, Brad Pitt's wandering eyes once again fall on the gorgeous and talented Margot Robbie."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But there’s a drive that comes with your career.”And, seeing as Turner's forthcoming movie schedule is pretty jam-packed, it looks like fans will have to be pretty patient while waiting to see her tie the knot with the oldest Jo bro.”
“During an interview with People earlier this year, Turner seemingly confirming the Turner/Jonas wedding won't happen until at least 2019, adding that she was "holding off on wedding dress shopping" because "you never know what’s going to be fashionable next year".”
“But cute as they may be, one question about the Turner/Jonas love story that continues to bother my mind just as much as that elusive 2019 Game of Thrones finale is, when are Sophie Turner and Joe Jonas getting married?”
“By the looks of things, I wouldn't get your hopes up quite yet, Turner and Jonas stans.”
“During a recent interview with the Evening Standard, Jonas was asked if he felt "in any kind of a hurry to get married".”
“His response?”
“A pretty clear indication the couple won't be walking down the aisle anytime soon.”
““No, no," Jonas said.”
“"We’ve been trying to take some time off while running around Europe."”
“Jonas then elaborated on the sentiment that his wedding to Sophie Turner won't be anytime soon, by revealing the pair are currently content with "just being tourists".”


"But you also have motivation in your career." Moreover, given Turner's full schedule of upcoming films, it seems that fans have to be quite patient while waiting for her to get married with the oldest Joe bro
"In an interview with people earlier this year, Turner seemed to confirm that the Turner / Jonas wedding would not take place until at least 2019, adding that she" delayed buying wedding dresses "because" you never know what's going to be popular next year. "
"But as cute as they may be, there's a question about the Turner / Jonas love story that still bothers me, just like the unpredictable ending of game of thrones in 2019, when will Sophie Turner and Joe Jonas get married?"
"On the surface, I can't give you too much hope, Turner and Jonas stans."
In a recent interview with the evening news, Jonas was asked if he felt "anxious to get married"
"His answer?"
"It's clear that the couple won't get married in the near future."
"No, no," Jonas said
"We've always wanted to take a break while running all over Europe."
Jonas then elaborated on his view that the wedding with Sophie Turner will not be held soon. He revealed that the two are only satisfied with "being tourists"



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Chris Soules Heading To NYC During Fashion Week Before TrialParty Before Prison?”
“Chris Soules Heading To NYC During Fashion Week Before Trial ‘The Bachelor’ star is going to court in January for his fatal hit-and-run arrest.”
“Chris Soules is heading to court in January for his fatal hit-and-run trial – and in the meantime he’s going to the Big Apple!”
“RadarOnline.com has obtained exclusive documents that reveal the former star of The Bachelor has requested permission to travel to New York City.”
““As a condition of Pretrial Release, Mr. Soules is prohibited from leaving the State of Iowa without written consent from the Court,” court papers obtained from Iowa District Court read.”
““Mr.”
“Soules seeks the Court’s permission for a trip to New York City, New York, from September 7, 2017 through September 11, 2017.”READ THE COURT PAPERS!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Chris sules went to New York for fashion week before the fitting party in front of prison?"
"Chris soules went to New York during fashion week. Before the trial, the 'Bachelor' star will appear in court in January for his fatal hit and run arrest."
"Chris sules will appear in court in January for a fatal hit and run trial, while at the same time, he will go to big apple!"
_ RadarOnline.com The website has obtained exclusive documents, revealing that the former star of the bachelor has applied for permission to travel to New York City. "
"As a condition of pre-trial release, Mr. suers may not leave Iowa without the written consent of the court," the court document obtained from the Iowa District Court wrote
"Sir."
"Sules sought court permission to travel to New York City from September 7, 2017 to September 11, 2017." Read the court papers! "



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“...lot of her work is only to benefit her own ego We pay for juicy info...”
“For someone to claim to not care about what the press says about her Angie seems deeply engaged and in the know about what the public perception of her is While the source noted Jolie s Iraq trip had been planned before the custody deal was leaked Brad thinks a...”
““Angie had already been fuming that details of the temporary custody agreement for the kids this summer had been made public, and according to Brad, she probably hoped the trip to Iraq would deflect negative coverage of her,” said the source.”
“The exes’ eldest son, Maddox, 16, can decide for himself how much time he spends with his famous dad.”
“Vivienne and Knox...”
“Brad wasn t surprised that Angie went to Iraq over the weekend when he was with the kids for Father s Day As Radar reported Pitt 54 recently won more visitation rights with the kids he shares with Jolie Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 12 and 9 year old twins...”
““Brad used to admire Angie’s humanitarian work, but is now more suspicious of her true motivations,” a source exclusively told RadarOnline.com.”
“...than helping refugees on her mind...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
__ A lot of her work is just to benefit herself, we pay for interesting information... "
"If someone claims that they don't care what the media says about her, Angie seems to be very involved and knows what the public thinks about her. The source points out that Julie's trip to Iraq was planned before the custody agreement leaked, Brad said
"Angie has been annoyed at the details of this summer's interim custody agreement being made public, and according to Brad, she may hope that her trip to Iraq will divert the negative coverage of her," the source said
"The eldest son of his ex girlfriend, 16-year-old Maddox, can decide on his own time with his famous father."
"Vivian and Knox..."
"Angie went to Iraq with the children for father's day at the weekend, and Brad was not surprised, because according to radar, Pete 54 recently won more visitation rights to share his children with Julie parks, 14-year-old Zahara, 13-year-old Shiloh, 12-year-old and 9-year-old twins..."
"Brad used to appreciate Angie's humanitarian work, but now he's more suspicious of her real motives," an exclusive told reporters RadarOnline.com Website. "
__ Instead of helping the refugees in her mind... "



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...still pretty challenging Are you excited to see Meghan and Harry get married HollywoodLifers...”
“Heavens, no!”
“Yet, we’ve EXCLUSIVELY the Queen’s helping her out!”
“Who knew being a member of the British monarchy would be so hard?”
“Meghan Markle, 36, is learning firsthand.”
“After saying “yes” to Prince Harry, 33, the Suits star’s world has been turned upside down!”
“Thankfully, she has Harry and Queen Elizabeth, 91, to help her learn the ropes.”
“Meghan has been on this crazy fairy tale romance rollercoaster and it s only just starting to sink in quite how different her life will be from now on a palace insider EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife com Being an actress she...”
“...s used to being in the public eye but nothing really can prepare somebody to suddenly become a member of the British royal family...”
“It s not just the fact that as a royal her every move will be scrutinized and analyzed she s also got to learn a ludicrous amount of etiquette and rules that are specific to the royal family many of...”


__︹ It's still very challenging. Are you excited to see Megan and Harry marry Hollywood stars... "
"My God, no!"
"However, we already know that the queen is helping her!"
"Who knew it would be so hard to be a member of the British monarchy?"
"Megan markel, 36, is learning firsthand."
After saying "yes" to the 33 year old Prince Harry, the world of the suit star has been turned upside down
"Thankfully, she has Harry and Queen Elizabeth, 91, to help her learn the tricks."
"Megan has been on this crazy fairy tale romantic roller coaster, it's just beginning to sink into quite a lot of different, her life will be from now on, an intrauterine exclusive told Hollywood Life website, as an actress, she..."
__︹ He is used to appearing in public, but nothing can really prepare people to suddenly become a member of the British royal family... "
"As a member of the royal family, her every move will be carefully examined and analyzed. This is not only a fact, but also she must learn some ridiculous etiquette and rules, which are unique to the royal family. Many of them..."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve been there done that.”
“Caitlyn had said:“To be honest with you, I can’t see myself dating women in the future.”
“There was no mention of Caitlyn Jenner anywhere.”
“These posts were dedicated to her ex-husband, Robert Kardashian, her six children and her mother.”
“She did not include her ex-husband, Caitlyn Jenner in any of her three Instagram posts she uploaded for Mother’s day.”
“Kris Jenner felt that she has been portrayed in a bad shape and has since excluded her ex from her life.”
“Caitlyn goes on to say that she would have continued with the marriage if Kris Jenner was a bit more understanding.”
“In this autobiography, Caitlyn Jenner has mentioned that she had never been comfortable having sex with Kris Jenner.”
“Kris Jenner has fallen apart from her husband Caitlyn Jenner (then Bruce Jenner) after he launched his autobiography ‘The Secrets of my Life’.”
“The lonely Mother’s DayIt was seen that her ex-wife Kris Jenner celebrated Mother’s day with her 6 children: Kourtney Kardashian (38), Kim Kardashian (36), Khloe Kardashian (32), Rob Kardashian (29), Kendall Jenner (21) and Kylie Jenner (19).”


"I did it there."
Caitlin once said, "to be honest, I don't think I'll date women in the future."
"Caitlin Jenner is not mentioned anywhere."
"These posts are dedicated to her ex husband Robert Kardashian, her six children and her mother."
"None of the three instagram Posts she posted on Mother's day included her ex husband, Caitlin Jenner."
"Chris Jenner felt that she was portrayed as a bad image, and since then she has excluded her ex boyfriend from her life."
"Caitlin went on to say that if Chris Jenner understood a little, she would continue the marriage."
"In this autobiography, Caitlin Jenner mentions that she never felt comfortable having sex with Chris Jenner."
"Chris Jenner parted ways with her husband, Caitlin Jenner (then Bruce Jenner), after he released his autobiography the secret of my life."
"Lonely mother's day people see her ex-wife Chris Jenner and her six children celebrate Mother's Day: Courtney Kardashian (38), Kim Kardashian (36), Chloe Kardashian (32), rob Kardashian (29), Kendall Jenner (21) and Kelly Jenner (19)."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stormi will have to ~werk~ for her perks some day, too!”
“He graduated from a public high school and went on to attend University of Texas at San Antonio.”
“It's no secret that Kylie Jenner only wants the best of the best for her daughter, Stormi Webster, whether it be clothes, strollers, or baby luggage.”
“However, her baby daddy, Travis Scott, is apparently getting annoyed with it all.”
“He doesn't think Kylie should be spoiling Stormi the way she is, and he's ready for it to stop ASAP.”
“"Kylie's spending a fortune on Stormi's designer carriers, strollers, clothes, and accessories, but Travis thinks it's too much and wants her and her family to stop spoiling Stormi," a source exclusively told Life & Style.”
“"She's just a baby.”
“Travis didn't have everything handed to him as a child and he wants the same for his baby."”
“Travis was born in Houston, TX, and grew up in a middle-class town just outside of the city.”
“The 26-year-old ended up dropping out of college after his sophomore year to pursue music in NYC, which is when his parents cut him off financially after they didn't agree with his decision.”


"One day, I'll give her a bonus, too!"
"He graduated from a public high school and went to the University of Texas at San Antonio."
"It's no secret Kylie Jenner just wants the best things for her daughter, stormi Webster, whether it's clothes, prams or baby luggage."
"However, her little father, Travis Scott, was obviously annoyed by all this."
"He doesn't think Kelly should spoil Tommy like she does. He's ready to stop as soon as possible."
"Kelly spent a lot of money on stoy's brand name trolleys, baby carriages, clothes and accessories, but Travis thinks it's too much and hopes she and her family won't spoil stoy any more," an exclusive told life and fashion
"She's just a baby."
"Travis didn't give everything to him when he was a child. He wanted his children to do the same."
Travis was born in Houston, Texas, and grew up in a middle-class town outside the city
"At the age of 26, he dropped out of school after his sophomore year to study music in New York. At that time, his parents didn't agree with his decision and cut off his financial resources."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““What a dope.”The ACLU Twitter feed also took note of Trump’s use of the term “ban.””
““Attention Supreme Court –>Now he’s calling it a travel ban again and giving you reason to uphold the lower courts’ rulings, “Scarborough wrote.”
“We need the Travel Ban as an extra level of safety!” The reference to Trump’s executive order — which Press Secretary Sean Spicer previously insisted is not a “ban” despite Trump’s words to the contrary — was criticized by many online, including MSNBC host Joe Scarborough.”
“We need the courts to give us back our rights.”
““We aren’t relaying president’s retweet, as the info is unconfirmed.”Later, President Trump tweeted, “We need to be smart, vigilant and tough.”
“Trump has used Twitter to share news report on London incident,” the NBC News feed wrote.”
““Pres.”
“That retweet drew the ire of many online, including NBC News, which called out the president for passing along unconfirmed information.”
“In the wake of Saturday’s attack, President Donald Trump first retweeted a post from the Drudge Report about the incident.”
“Other celebrities to send words of support included authors J.K. Rowling, Stephen King, and Neil Gaiman, Spider-Man: Homecoming star Tom Holland, singers Demi Lovato, Joe Jonas, and Liam Gallagher, and actors Gina Rodriguez, Cara Delevingne, Kumail Nanjiani, and Gregg Sulkin.”


"What a fool." The ACLU tweet also noted Trump's use of the word "ban."
"Take note of the Supreme Court, which he now calls the travel ban, and give you reasons to support the lower court's ruling," Scarborough wrote
"We need a travel ban as an extra level of security! "The mention of Trump's executive order - despite Trump's words to the contrary, press secretary Sean Spicer previously insisted that it was not a 'ban' - has been criticized by many netizens, including MSNBC host Joe Scarborough."
"We need the court to return our rights."
"We didn't forward the president's message because it wasn't confirmed." Later, President trump tweeted, "we need to be smart, alert and tough."
"Trump used twitter to share news reports about London events," NBC News Network wrote
"Pressure"
"This forwarding has aroused the anger of many netizens, including NBC news, which accused the president of delivering unconfirmed information."
"After the attack on Saturday, President trump first forwarded a post about the incident in Draghi's report."
Other celebrities also expressed their support, including writers J.K. Rowling, Stephen King and Neil Gayman, spider man: Homecoming star Tom Holland, singers Demi Lovato, Joe Jonas and Liam Gallagher, actors Gina Rodriguez, Kara delaviny, Kumar nanjani and Greg sulkin



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...stop Katie from continuing to go out and enjoy herself...”
“Noting that Holmes described the pregnancy as "perfect timing," the insider adds:"Katie's always wanted a sibling for Suri and now she'll have a little sister."”
“We still don't know exactly how long the actors have been together, but it seems they're moving very quickly.”
“Despite the fact that Foxx doesn't even tell his friends about Holmes (The man is seriously committed to maintaining his privacy.”
“), sources say the relationship is already very serious.”
“In fact, sources are now claiming that there's a very good reason Holmes and Foxx decided to finally go public with their relationship last week.”
“According to Australian tabloid NW, Holmes and Foxx are expecting a child together.”
“Insiders tell the magazine that the pregnancy was planned, and Katie is roughly three months along.”
“"Katie had always wanted to have another baby and knew her biological clock was ticking - and, at long last, it's happening!"”
“...says one source.”


__ Stop Katie from going out... "
Noting that Holmes described pregnancy as "the perfect time," the insider added: "Katie has always wanted to have a brother and sister for Suri, and now she will have a little sister."
"We still don't know how long the actors have been together, but they seem to be moving very fast."
"Despite the fact that fox didn't even tell his friend Sherlock Holmes (who was very committed to his privacy),"
Sources said the relationship between the two sides has been very serious
"In fact, it is now reported that Holmes and fox decided last week to disclose their relationship for good reason."
According to Australian tabloid NW, Holmes and fox are having a baby
"People familiar with the matter told the magazine that the pregnancy was planned and Katie was probably three months pregnant."
"Katie always wanted to have another child. She knew her biological clock was ticking - finally, it happened!"
__︹ A source said



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The whole thing's ridiculous.")”
“I don't think he even knows.”
“Kirby had been in a relationship with actor Callum Turner for about two years, but the tabloids seemed to forget that detail after she was photographed kissing Cruise on the set of their upcoming blockbuster.”
“"Even though the crew were there, it was all [in the tabloids] like, 'The next wife falls at his feet,'" Kirby recalls in the August issue of Marie Claire U.K. (on sale now).”
“"The most disconcerting thing was the people I didn't think would believe it did, and they were texting my boyfriend, asking, 'Are you OK?'”
“I don't think they believe anything they read now because you just can't.”
“None of it is real.”
“To be getting married to him?”
“Not even a snog—it was marriage."”
“(The actress first denied romance rumors last year, telling The Daily Mail, "There's literally zero truth in it.”


"The whole thing is ridiculous.")
"I don't think he knows."
"Kirby has been dating actor Karem turner for about two years, but the tabloids seem to have forgotten that detail because she was photographed kissing cruise on the set of the upcoming blockbuster."
"Even though the crew was there, everything in the tabloid was' the next wife fell on his feet '," Kirby recalled in August of Mary Claire Claire.
"The most disturbing people are the people I don't think I will believe. They text my boyfriend and ask," are you ok? "
"I don't think they believe anything they read now, because you just don't believe it."
"It's not true."
"Marry him?"
"Not even a kiss. It's marriage."
"(the actress denied romantic rumors for the first time last year, telling the Daily Mail:" there is no truth in fact. "



**Something goes wrong**
“The floor of the venue in Bel Air was covered in pink balloons and on the wall a neon sign said 'Baby Thompson'Kylie Jenner was the first sister to share a photo of Khloe at the animal-themed shower.”
“Maria was also enamored with the elephant motifNeon lights!”
“The Good American founder paired her fancy long-sleeve frock with a long-line satin pink duster and nude pumpsWoman of the hour!”
“Hot mama!”
“The shower was hosted by Amazon Baby Registry.”
“She adorned herself with just a few pieces of silver jewelry including a set of moderately large hoops.”
“...line satin pink duster and nude pumps...”
“The 33 year old reality star who is just weeks away from giving birth to her baby girl was joined by her sisters and friends to celebrate her first child with boyfriend and NBA player Tristan Thompson The Good American founder paired her fancy long sleeve frock with a long...”
“Khloe Kardashian showed off her large baby bump in a glamorous pink bejeweled dress on Saturday for her baby shower at the Grand Ballroom in Los AngelesMommy-to-be!”
“It's a girl!”


"The floor of bel air is covered with pink balloons, and the neon sign on the wall says" Thompson baby. "Kelly Jenner is the first sister to share colo's photos at an animal themed shower
"Maria is addicted to neon lights, too!"
The great American founder paired her chic long sleeve dress with a long Satin Pink rag and the most popular nude female toilet
"Hot mom!"
"This shower is hosted by Amazon baby registration center."
"She only wore a few pieces of silver jewelry, including a set of medium-sized hoops."
__ Silk powder duster and bare pump... "
"The 33 year old reality TV star is only a few weeks away from giving birth to a baby girl. Her sisters and friends celebrate her first child with her boyfriend, NBA player Tristan Thompson. The excellent American founder has put her chic long sleeve dress and a long..."
Khloe Kardashian showed off her huge baby lump in a glamorous Pink Jewel dress at a baby shower at the grand ballroom in Los Angeles on Saturday
"It's a girl!"



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Comment below with your thoughts!”
“They’re kindred, unconventional spirits — so much so that I think Jared could be the perfect guy for Angie if she’s ever ready for a new love in her life.”That is some seriously heavy romance talk.”
“A wild new report claims that newly single Angelina Jolie is ‘getting close’ with none other than Hollywood bachelor, Jared Leto.”
“OMG!”
“Did Angelina Jolie, 41, trade ex Brad Pitt, 53, in for a slightly younger model?”
“It’s hard to believe anyone would want to pass on Brad, but Star magazine is reporting that Angelina is cozying up to Jared Leto, 45.”
“Whoa!”
““There has always been a spark between them,” a source told the magazine inside their February 27 issue.”
““Now, during these tough times for Angie, it seems Jared has helped her cope and even brought her out of her funk.”
“The sources added that Angelina and Jared have shared some “secret” time together since it was revealed she would be divorcing Brad.”


"Comment on the following with your ideas!"
"They're all like-minded, eclectic people - so much so that I think if Angie is ready for a new love in her life, Jared might be the ideal person for her." These are serious and heavy romantic topics
Angelina Jolie, who has just been single, is "in close touch" with Hollywood bachelor Jared Leto, according to a crazy new newspaper
"My God
Did Angelina Jolie, 41, swap 53 year old former Brad Pitt for a slightly younger model? "
"It's hard to believe anyone would want to pass Brad on, but according to star magazine, Angelina is courting Jared Leto, 45."
"Wow
"There has always been a spark between them," a source told the magazine in a February 27 issue
"Now, in Angie's difficult times, Jared seems to have helped her cope with, or even freed her from fear."
The source also said Angelina had some "secrets" when she was with Jared because of news that she would divorce Brad



**Something goes wrong**
“"So that is the glamorous way that I found out I was going to have my little nugget!"”
“We were filling up with gas, so I went in the gas station and took the test and it was positive," she recalls.”
“I was like, 'Okay, I will.'”
“My friend was like, 'Why don't you just take a test?'”
“I thought it was just stress with work and all kinds of different things.”
“"I was riding around in my mom's little convertible and I had not been feeling well.”
“News' Ken Baker.”
“Now 22, Britney Spears' little sister opens up about her life as a mom and an aspiring country singer in an exclusive interview with E!”
“Then 16, the Zoey 101 star retreated to her home state of Louisiana to raise Maddie, her daughter with ex-boyfriend Casey Aldridge.”
“Watch : Jamie Lynn Spears Gives Birth to MusicFans weren't the only ones shocked when Jamie Lynn Spears announced that she was pregnant in December 2007.”


"So that's how I found out I wanted to eat my little nuggets!"
"We were refueling at the time, so I went to the gas station and tested positive," she recalled
"I said," well, I will. "
"My friend said," why don't you take a test? "
"I thought it was just work pressure and all kinds of things."
"I was driving around in my mom's little convertible, and I didn't feel comfortable all the time."
"I'm kenbeck."
Britney Spears' 22-year-old sister is accepting "E!"
At the age of 16, Zoe 101 returned to her home state of Louisiana to raise Marty, the daughter of her ex boyfriend Casey Aldrich
"Observation: when Jamie Lynn spears announced her pregnancy in December 2007, it wasn't just Jamie Lynn spears who was shocked."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Purnell's representative told us he had no official comment on the report.”
“"She's furious about Brad's interest in Ella and her being cast in 'Sweetbitter,'" In Touch's source reportedly said.”
“A source close to the actress tells INSIDER that the report is "completely made up."”
“Purnell played a teenage version of Angelina Jolie's character in "Maleficent."”
“Brad Pitt isn't dating 21-year-old actress Ella Purnell — who played a teenage version of his soon-to-be-ex-wife Angelina Jolie's character in the 2014 Disney movie "Maleficent" — despite the reports.”
“The reports are "completely made up," an individual close to Purnell told INSIDER on Thursday.”
“According to In Touch, Pitt cast her as the main character in "Sweetbitter," a drama he's producing for Starz through his production company Plan B. Pitt was reportedly impressed by her performances in "Miss Peregrine's Home for Peculiar Children" and this year's "Churchill."”
“As a series, "Sweetbitter" is a project run by director Richard Shephard, who won Director's Guild of America award and Emmy awards for his work on "Ugly Betty" and is also known for his work on "Girls."”
“Casting director Laura Rosenthal is finding actors for the rest of the roles, according to Deadline.”
“Pitt does not seem to be involved with the project on a casting level.”


"Pernell's representative told us that he had no official comment on the report."
"She was angry about Brad's interest in Ella and her role in sweet and bitter," according to a source in touch
A source close to the actress told people the story was "totally fabricated."
In mischief, Purnell plays a teenage role in Angelina Jolie
"Brad Pitt didn't date 21-year-old actress Ella Purnell - despite reports that Ella Purnell played a teenage role in his upcoming ex-wife Angelina Jolie in the 2014 Disney movie villain."
"These reports are completely fabricated," a person close to Mr. Purnell told inside on Thursday
According to contact magazine, Pitt played her leading role in sweet and bitter, a play he produced for Stuart through his production company plan B. Pitt is reported to have been impressed by her performances in "Miss Peregrine's special children's home" and this year's "Churchill."
"As a series, sweet and bitter is a project hosted by Director Richard Sheppard. He won the American Directors Association Award and Emmy Award for Ugly Betty, and is also famous for the girl."
Casting Director Laura Rosenthal is looking for actors for other roles, according to deadline
"Pete doesn't seem to be involved in the project."



**Something goes wrong**
““All you want to do is hit a home run.””
““Baseball is just like life,” she said.”
“Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to walk down the aisle with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone.”
““I do believe in marriage,” the Shades of Blue actress, 48, told Harper’s Bazaar in a story published on Thursday, March 15.”
““And I would love to grow old with somebody in a committed relationship.”
“But I’m not forcing anything right now.”As far as her relationship with the 42-year-old former Yankees player, she said: “It’s good, it’s healthy; we communicate well.”
“We understand each other’s lives in a way that most other people couldn’t.”She added: “We both entered the public eye in our early twenties and overachieved right from the start.”
“And that affects every dynamic in your life, from your family to your work to your relationships.”
“We have a similar makeup.”The pair celebrated their anniversary in February in Minneapolis, where the singer performed a concert ahead of the Super Bowl.”
“During the show, she debuted her single “Us” written by Poo Bear and produced by Skrillex, and dedicated it to Rodriguez, who was in the audience.”


"You just want to hit a home run."
"Baseball is like life," she said
"Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to get married with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone."
"I do believe in marriage," the 48 year old "blue shadow" actress told Harper market in a report published on March 15 (Thursday)
"I also want to grow old with someone who has feelings."
"But I'm not forcing anything right now." On her relationship with the 42 year old former Yankee, she said: "it's good, it's healthy; we communicate well."
"Our understanding of each other's lives is beyond most people's comprehension," she added. "We all came into the public eye in our early 20s and made remarkable achievements from the beginning."
"It affects every aspect of your life, from family to work to relationships."
In February, the two celebrated their wedding anniversary in Minneapolis, where the singer gave a concert in front of the super bowl
During the performance, she released her first single "we", which was created by bear dung, produced by scrilex and dedicated to Rodriguez in the audience



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below!”
“...exclusively.”
“After a long absence from the spotlight, the “Look What You Made Me Do” singer, 27, is set to release her brand new album Reputation in November.”
“The release marks the end of Tay’s seclusion from the public eye.”
“For months, Taylor has kept a low profile, which enabled her to maintain a relationship with British actor Joe, 26.”
“And according to an OK!”
“...insider, Taylor is terrified her comeback means losing Joe!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Getty“Aside from when she’s been recording, Joe’s had her all to himself since they got together,” the source told OK!”
““Taylor’s been in the game long enough to know that as soon as her album drops, everything will change for them.”Source: GettyWhile the insider says Joe has promised Tay “he’s in it for the long haul,” Taylor has her doubts.”
“Source: GettyDo you think Joe and Taylor’s relationship will survive her comeback?”


"Please let us know in the comments below!"
__︹ Exclusive. "
The 27 year old singer "look what you made me do" will release her new album "reputation" in November, long after leaving the spotlight
"The release marks the end of Tay's isolation from public view."
"Taylor has been keeping a low profile for months, which has allowed her to maintain a relationship with 26 year old British actor Joe."
"And according to an OK!"
__ Inside, Taylor is afraid that her comeback means losing Joe
The article continues in the following ad source: Getty "except when she's been recording, Joe's all her own because they're together," the source told OK! "
"Taylor has been in the game long enough to know that everything will change once her album goes down." Source: gettywhile insiders say Joe has promised ty "he's in it for a long time," and Taylor has her doubts
"Source: do you think the relationship between Joe and Taylor will continue after her comeback?"



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That said, Markle is at the forefront of a whole new era, particularly when it comes to royals and the public.”
“Oprah (who has interviewed pretty much everyone on the planet) never sat down with Diana or Charles or Queen Lizzie herself.”
“In summation: Either Meghan Markle does not have a secret first husband (smart money), or she does, and anyone who knows about it better sleep with one eye open.”
“Except that unless they have a time machine, this is a story with way too many loose ends.”
“...her Majesty’s Secret Service) probably “scrubbed the records” to conceal Markle’s past, which is totally something that MI-5 would try to do.”
“The Enquirer’s insider speculates that MI-5 (a.k.a.”
“Never mind the fact that even “hush-hush annulments” are a matter of public record.”
“So we’re supposed to believe that not one of them would have mentioned old what’s-his-name?”
“For his recent book Meghan Markle: A Hollywood Princess, royal biographer Andrew Morton spoke to dozens of people who knew Markle long before she was one half of a commemorative plate design.”
“And even if we run with this idea of a secret ex-hubby (whom The Enquirer never names, btw), wouldn’t we already know about him?”


"In other words, markel is at the forefront of a new era, especially in the royal family and the public."
"Oprah (who interviewed almost everyone on earth) has never sat with Diana, Charles or queen Lizzie."
All in all: either Megan markel doesn't have a secret first husband (smart money), or she does, and anyone who knows about it is better to sleep with one eye open
"Unless they have a time machine, it's a story with too many loose endings."
__︹ Her Majesty's Secret Service) may be "scrubbing records" to cover up markel's past, which is exactly what mi-5 has to do. "
"Insiders of the inquirer speculated that the mi-5 (also known as
"Don't mind, even" shush shush "is a matter of public record."
"So we should believe that none of them will mention his former name?"
Andrew Morton, a British Royal biographer, talked with dozens of people who knew him in his recently published book Megan markel: the princess of Hollywood. Long ago, markel was not half of a commemorative design
"Even if we think of a secret ex husband (who, by the way, is never named), don't we know him yet?"



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anne Hathaway is also set to take home $15 million for the 2020 film “Barbie,” while Jennifer Lawrence took home that same amount to play a Russian spy in “Red Sparrow.””
“His payday came just behind Daniel Craig, who is reported to receive $25 million for the latest James Bond film.”
“Johnson will be paid $22 million for his upcoming 2020 film “Red Notice,” with $1 million of that ensuring he will promote the film on his Facebook, Twitter and Instagram accounts.”
“The same Variety report also looked at his earning power, as Johnson is one of the few celebrities who has managed to cultivate an attentive following on social media, which has resulted in him having over 12 million followers on Twitter and over 100 million followers on Instagram.”
“Convicted Of Manslaughter According to the report Johnson will likely be 2018 s highest paid actor due to the volume of movies he cranks out...”
“The Rampage star is asking for a 1 million social media fee as part of his package for the upcoming Red Notice that includes promoting the film on the likes of Twitter and Facebook OTHER NEWS YOU MIGHT HAVE MISSED Man Who Stabbed Morgan Freeman s Step Granddaughter 25 Times...”
“It’s going to cost you.”
“But one item in particular, from Variety, stood out:‘Want access to Johnson’s 104 million Instagram followers?”
“[videowaywire video_id=”34579E1A3BCC5CBD”]*The salaries of Hollywood’s biggest stars for 2018 were recently revealed, with Dwayne Johnson, Anne Hathaway, Daniel Craig, Jennifer Lawrence and Vin Diesel taking home the biggest paychecks per film.”


Anne Hathaway will also take $15 million in the 2020 film Barbie doll, and Jennifer Lawrence will take the same money when she plays a Russian spy in red sparrow
He is second only to Daniel Craig, who is reported to have received $25 million for his latest James Bond film
Johnson will receive $22 million for his upcoming 2020 film, red notice, of which $1 million will ensure that he promotes the film on Facebook, twitter and instagram accounts
"The same variety story focuses on his ability to make money, because Johnson is one of the few celebrities who has successfully cultivated attention on social media, which makes him have more than 12 million followers on Twitter and more than 100 million on instagram."
"According to the report, Johnson, who was convicted of manslaughter, is likely to become the highest paid actor in 2018 because he makes a large number of films..."
"The rampant Star asked to pay $1 million for social media as part of his upcoming red notice, which includes promoting the film on sites such as twitter and Facebook. The other news you might miss is a man who stabbed Morgan Freeman's stepdaughter 25 times... "
"It's going to cost you."
But there's a particularly compelling line in variety: "do you want to visit Johnson's 104 million instagram fans?"
__videowaywire video_ Id = "34579e1a3bcc5cbd"] * Hollywood stars have recently announced their pay in 2018, among which Dwayne Johnson, Anne Hathaway, Daniel Craig, Jennifer Lawrence and Vin Diesel have the highest pay. "



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Wonderful.”Moran is the third regular cast member of the show to die since “Happy Days” went off the air in 1984 — following TV dad Tom Bosley (2010) and Arnold’s owners Al Molinaro (2015) and Pat Morita (2005).”
““She was the quickest, fastest little kid.”
““This breaks my heart,” Moran’s TV mom Ross, 88, told NBC in Los Angeles.”
“God has you now, Erin.”Moran’s “Happy Days” mom, Marion Ross, also said Sunday she wished to remember the child star in happier times.”
““I always hoped she could find peace in her life.”
““May people remember Eric for her contagious smile, warm heart, and animal loving soul,” her “Joanie Love Chachi” co-star Scott Baio tweeted on Sunday.”
“Moran was 56.”
“An autopsy is pending,” according to a sheriff’s statement.”
““It was determined that Erin Marie Moran Fleischmann was deceased.”
“Harrison County Sheriff’s deputies declined comment on Sunday, only saying that they got a 911 call at 4:07 p.m. on Saturday and found an unresponsive Moran.”


"Great." Moran is the third regular actor to die since happy time went off the air in 1984, following Tom Bosley (2010), Arnold's boss al Molinaro (2015) and pat molita (2005)
"She's the fastest and fastest child."
"It breaks my heart," rose, Moran's 88 year old TV mother, told NBC in Los Angeles
"God has you now, Irene." Marion Ross, Moran's "happy time" mother, also said Sunday that she hopes to remember the child star in her happy time
"I always wanted her to find a peaceful life."
"May people remember Eric because of her infectious smile, warm heart and animal loving soul," her "Joanne aichachi" co star Scott bio tweeted on Sunday
"Moran is 56."
"Autopsy is in progress," according to the sheriff's statement
"Make sure Irene Mary Moran Fleshman is dead."
Deputies to Harrison County Sheriff declined to comment on Sunday, saying they received a 911 call at 4:07 p.m. on Saturday and found an unresponsive Moran



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[10]References [ edit ]”
“...high school...”
“Monica also tells a crestfallen Joey that she will not be cooking a turkey because of Will's, Chandler's, Rachel's and Phoebe's aversion to the poultry.”
“Will is completely dumbfounded by this revelation, but takes pleasure in the fact that Ross got Rachel pregnant but is not going to marry her.”
“They agree to be civil and reveal to Will that they are now having a baby together.”
“...that they have too much of an important history to fixate on the past...”
“Rachel demands that Ross recant the rumor by calling everyone from school but Monica puts them both in their place by reminding them that Rachel s rumor put Ross on the social radar that Ross and Will s rumor had no effect whatsoever on Rachel s queen bee status and...”
“Rachel feels betrayed by Ross, until Monica reminds her that she started a rumor of her own that Ross made out with the school's 50-year-old librarian, though a horrified Ross confirms it as true.”
“Rachel is immediately attracted to Will unable to recognise him but Will is openly hostile and this culminates in his proud announcement that he and Ross founded the I Hate Rachel club in high school and initiated a rumor that she was a hermaphrodite which was spread throughout their entire...”
“Throughout the episode, Joey battles the enormous turkey, eventually changing into Phoebe's maternity clothing to ease the strain on his stomach.”


"[10] reference [Edit]"
__ High school
"Monica also told dejected Joey that she couldn't make Turkey because will, Chandler, Rachel and Phoebe hated poultry."
Will is stunned by the news, but he's glad rose got Rachel pregnant and doesn't want to marry her
"They agreed to be polite and revealed to will that they are having a baby together now."
__ They have too much important history to focus on the past... "
"Rachel asks Ross to call everyone in the school to turn down the rumors, but Monica reminds them that Rachel's rumors make Ross get the attention of the society. Ross and will's rumors have no influence on Rachel's status as queen bee, and...."
"Rachel felt betrayed by rose until Monica reminded her that she started spreading rumors that rose was making out with the 50 year old librarian at the school, even though a frightened rose confirmed that it was true."
"Rachel was quickly attracted by will, because will could not recognize him, but will openly expressed his hostility to him, which made him proud to announce that he and rose set up" I hate Rachel club "in high school, and launched a rumor that she was androgynous, which spread all over their family..."
In this episode, Joey fights with the huge turkey and finally changes into Phoebe's maternity dress to relieve the pressure on her abdomen



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Kristin Grannis and the actor ‘kept their relationship under wraps.’Jamie Foxx has been caught straying from Katie Holmes with his baby mama he managed to keep secret for nine years!”
“The blatant betrayal came after The National ENQUIRER unmasked Kristin Grannis as the mother of Foxx’s youngest daughter, Annalise.”
“After the bombshell exclusive report, Foxx brazenly stepped out with Grannis, 40, for a recent date — and Holmes was nowhere to be seen.”
““They’ve kept their relationship under wraps for nearly a decade, so to finally be exposed in The ENQUIRER probably came as a relief,” a friend said.”
““It still doesn’t excuse Jamie’s behavior,” continued the pal.”
““He’s supposed to be with Katie, she will be devastated!”
“No doubt she’ll demand answers from Jamie.”Holmes, 39, started dating Foxx, 50, on the down-low in October 2013, but the romance has cooled since they were snapped holding hands on a beach last fall, said an insider.”
““Katie’s friends believe she was the one trying to push their relationship, and it’s Jamie who likes to keep things covert,” noted the insider.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Christine Grannis and the actor" keep their relationship secret. ". Jamie fox was caught walking away from Katie Holmes with his mother, who had kept a secret for nine years
"After the National Enquirer revealed that Christine Grannis was the mother of fox's youngest daughter, annalis, the overt betrayal took place."
"After the scoop, fox cheekily went out on a date with Grannis, 40 - Sherlock Holmes disappeared."
A friend said: "they have kept their relationship secret for nearly a decade, so it may be a relief to finally expose it in the inquirer."
"It still can't forgive Jamie's behavior," the friend continued
"He should be with Katie. She'll be sad!"
"There is no doubt that she will ask Jamie for an answer." Sherlock Holmes, 39, has been dating fox, 50, since October 2013, but the relationship has cooled down since photos of them holding hands on the beach were taken last fall, a person familiar with the matter said
"Katie's friends think she's the one trying to push their relationship, and Jamie likes to hide things," the person familiar with the matter said



**Something goes wrong**
“Their royal wedding is scheduled on Saturday, May 19.”
“The couple was engaged in November, 2017.”
“(Also Read: Meghan Markle Prince Harry Wedding: 10 wedding gown suggestions for the bride-to-be)Meghan Markle and Prince Harry have been dating since 2016.”
“She feels like she is letting him down and he assured her that it is not the case,” an insider was quoted as saying.”
““Harry isn’t bothered at all by all of this drama that is going on with her family and told her he doesn’t care about any of it.”
“Meghan s family...”
“Meghan would not be able to handle all of this stress without her mom there the source said adding Doria is one of the most grounded women ever and can calm Meghan down more than anyone The report also adds that Prince Harry is least bothered about the tensions in...”
“However, thankfully for Meghan, her mother Doria Ragland arrived in London on Wednesday to be by her side.”
““All of this stuff with her dad is extremely bothersome but she is just so relieved that he is okay,” a source close to Meghan told the publication.”
“Meanwhile, according to a report in Radaronline, the condition of her father coupled with the pressure of the wedding has left Meghan a ‘nervous wreck’.”


Their royal wedding is scheduled for Saturday, May 19th
"The couple were engaged in November 2017."
(read also: Megan markel Prince Harry's wedding: 10 wedding dress suggestions for brides to be) Megan markel and Prince Harry have been dating since 2016. "
"She felt that she had let him down and he assured her that it was not the case," the report quoted a person familiar with the matter as saying
"Harry didn't worry at all about the farce in her house. He told her he didn't care at all."
"Megan's family..."
"Megan would not be able to handle all the stress without a mother. The source said that Doria is one of the most down-to-earth women ever and can calm Megan down more than anyone else. The report also added that Prince Harry was very interested in I don't care about the tension in the world
Thankfully, however, Megan's mother, Doria Raglan, arrived in London on Wednesday to accompany her
A source close to Megan told the Wall Street Journal: "these things with her father make her very upset, but she is just relieved because he is OK."
"At the same time, according to a report on radaronline, Megan's father's condition, coupled with the pressure of the wedding, has made Megan" nervous breakdown. "



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementKim also confirmed that Caitlyn had cut ties with the Kardashian family.”
“...on her 38th bday looking soooo good A post shared by Kim Kardashian West kimkardashian on Apr 18 2017 at 7 34pm PDT On the April 28th episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show Kim slammed Caitlyn for attacking her family in her new memoir and for insulting her mother...”
“The person revealed She s hoping her daughters Kendall and Kylie were able to persuade their mother not to discuss Caitlyn in depth Caitlyn thinks is awful that Kris is basically calling her a liar and possibly damaging her relationship with the girls Kourt looking for zero fucks to give...”
“She knows they aren’t going to say nice things about her, so why subject herself to the insults.”The tipster went on to explain that the 67-year-old television personality is upset that her daughters – Kendall and Kylie – took part in the charade.”
“Swish A post shared by Kim Kardashian West (@kimkardashian) on Mar 31, 2017 at 4:39pm PDTA source close to the former “I Am Cait” star said she will not watch Kelly’s interview and added: “Caitlyn has no intentions on watching their interview with Megyn Kelly.”
“The retired Olympic gold medal-winning decathlete, who is currently promoting her new memoir, “The Secrets of My Life,” is embroiled in a nasty fight with ex-wife, Kris Jenner, and is said to be allergic to all things Kardashian.”
“As for Kanye West being absent, no explanation was given – as the saying goes, Kanye does what Kanye wants.”
“It was made known that Caitlyn Jenner and Rob Kardashian had opted to skip the chitchat and for obvious reasons, Blac Chyna and Tyga were not invited.”
“Last week, pictures surfaced on TMZ that showed Mrs. Kelly, the new face of NBC, on the Los Angeles set of “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” after conducting a lengthy interview with Kris Jenner and all of her daughters – Kendall and Kylie Jenner, and Kourtney, Kim, and Khloé Kardashian.”
“Caitlyn Jenner is putting her foot down and has refused to watch Megyn Kelly’s highly anticipated interview with the Kardashian and Jenner clans that is set to air in June.”


"The ad money also confirmed that Caitlin had severed ties with the Kardashian family."
__ Looking good on her 38th Thursday, Kim Kardashian and Sikkim Kardashian shared a post in episode 28 of the Ellen DeGeneres Show at 7:34 p.m. on April 18, 2017. Kim attacked Caitlin for attacking her family and insulting her mother in her new memoir... "
"According to the source, she hopes her daughters Kendall and Kelly can persuade their mother not to discuss Caitlin in depth. Caitlin thinks that the terrible thing is that Chris is basically saying that she is a liar and may damage her relationship with the girl. Kurt is looking for zero manipulation to..."
"She knew that they would not speak well of her, so why should she be insulted?" The informant went on to explain that the 67 year old television celebrity was upset that her daughters Kendall and Kelly had taken part in the guessing game
"Swish Kim Kardashian West (@ KimKardashian) said in a blog post at 4:39 p.m. on March 31, 2017 that she would not watch Kelly's interview, adding:" Caitlin has no intention of watching their interview with Megan Kelly. "
"The retired Olympic gold medalist decathlon is currently promoting her new memoir, the secret of my life. She is involved in a fierce fight with her ex-wife Chris Jenner and is said to be allergic to everything about Kardashian."
"As for Kanye West's absence, there is no explanation - as the saying goes, Kanye does whatever he wants."
"You know, Caitlin Jenner and rob Kardashian chose to skip the chat, and for obvious reasons, Blake ziner and TEGA were not invited."
"Last week, there were some pictures on TMZ showing NBC's new face. Mrs. Kelly appeared on the" keep up with Kardashian "crew in Los Angeles after a long interview with Chris Jenner and all her daughters Kendall and Kelly Jenner, as well as coultney, Kim and Carol Kardashian."
"Caitlin Jenner is keeping a low profile and refuses to watch Megan Kelly's much anticipated interview with Kardashian and the Jenner family, which will air in June."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on the royal wedding:”
“Prince Harry went on: "Whatever we have to tackle together or individually, will always be us together as a team."”
“That means Markle will leave behind both her acting career and her political pursuits.”
“Successful people say your choice of spouse is the most important career decision you can make — and it seems like Prince Harry and Markle have spent time thinking about how they can jointly change the world.”
“The royal wedding is (almost) upon us.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle will tie the knot on Saturday, about two years after they were set up on a blind date by a mutual friend.”
“Markle's new life will look drastically different from her life before she met her future husband.”
“Not only will she move from the United States to the United Kingdom and become a British citizen; she'll also transition from an acting career to being full-time royalty.”
“In the couple's first interview after announcing their engagement, Markle, who is 36 years old, addressed her decision: "I don't see it as giving anything up, I just see it as a change."”
“She added that she had already been working on the television series "Suits" for seven years.”


"More about royal weddings:
"Whether we are going to deal with it together or alone, we will always be a team," he added
"It means that markel will give up her acting career and political pursuit."
"Successful people say that your choice of spouse is the most important career decision you can make - Prince Harry and markel seem to spend time thinking about how to change the world together."
"The royal wedding is coming."
"Prince Harry and Megan markel will get married on Saturday, and they were arranged a blind date by a mutual friend about two years ago."
"Marcel's new life will be very different from her life before she met her future husband."
"She will not only move from the United States to the United Kingdom to become a British citizen; she will also transition from an acting career to a full-time member of the royal family."
In his first interview after announcing his engagement, the 36 year old talked about his decision: "I don't think it's giving up anything, I just think it's a change."
She added that she had worked for the TV series suit for seven years



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


__ With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But we’re all liquid – we change, we grow.””
“I’m obviously in love, so if people want to say I’m gay, that’s great.”
““[My parents] have been so, so supportive.”
“Delevingne has said of her “liquid” sexuality: “As a child I used gay as a bad word, as in, ‘That’s so gay.’ All my friends did.”
“...once again spotted holding hands as they went for dinner...”
“It s early days and Cara doesn t really have time for a proper relationship due to her non stop filming commitments with Carnival Row but there s no denying there s a spark The women have been seen looking close during fashion week in London in February and were...”
“...nights singing and jamming on the guitar...”
“The Sun then reported that the pair spent much of the Christmas break together as they hopped between London Italy and the Czech Republic where Delevingne was filming her Amazon series Carnival Row A source said at the time They re both really into their music and have been spending...”
“The following month Delevingne invited Jackson as her guest of honor to the Christmas Burberry X Bash in London – where they were again seen trying to sneak out together.”
“Delevingne and Jackson first fueled romance rumors when they were spotted leaving a nightclub hand-in-hand in November 2017.”


"But we are all mobile - we change, we grow."
"I'm obviously in love, so it's great if people want to say I'm gay."
"(my parents) have been very supportive of me."
"When I was a child, I used homosexuality as a bad word, like 'that's too gay,'" delaviny said of her "mobile" sexual orientation All my friends say that. "
__ Once again, I saw them go to dinner hand in hand... "
"It's still early, and Carla has no time to fall in love, because she has been committed to shooting Carnival street, but it's undeniable that at London Fashion Week in February, two women were seen watching closely, and there was a spark between them..."
__ Singing and playing guitar at night... "
The sun later reported that the two spent most of their Christmas holidays together as they hopped between London, Italy, and the Czech Republic, where Delevin was filming her Amazon Carnival platoon. A source said that at that time, they all liked their music very much and spent money all the time... "
"The following month, delaviny invited Jackson as her guest of honor to the Burberry x Christmas party in London - where they were once again seen trying to sneak out together."
"In November 2017, delaviny and Jackson were found to have left a nightclub hand in hand, which first fueled romantic rumors."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She saved my life … I feel incredibly lucky,” she said at the time.”
“...scared I might die I was like What...”
“Raisa, 29, made the remarks to Self in a video clip that was published on Wednesday.”
“Gomez, she said, told her over FaceTime she was a match.”
““And I’m like, ‘Yay... what?”
“How do you know this?’” the “Grown-ish” actress said.”
““I had a way that I wanted to tell her when I made the decision.”
“I knew it was gonna happen, I just needed that time, like it’s a big thing.”She continued, “So I hang up, and I call my social worker, and I’m angry.”
“And she told me, ‘It’s gonna be hard: the recipient is gonna glow, and she’s gonna recover a lot faster than the donor is ‘cause she’s receiving something she needs.”
“You’re losing something you don’t need to lose.”


She said at the time: "she saved my life I feel very lucky. "
__ Afraid I'm going to die, I'm like
The 29 year old told self in a video released on Wednesday
"Gomez, she said, told her at FaceTime that she was a match."
"I said," Yeah... What? "
"How do you know? "Mature," said the actress
"I have a way to tell her when I make a decision."
"I know it's going to happen, I just need time, as if it's a big deal," she continued, "so I hung up and called my social worker, and I was angry."
"She told me," it's hard: the recipient will glow, and she will recover much faster than the donor because she gets what she needs. "
"You've lost something you don't need to lose."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This flick might be bigger than the original Baywatch — from the production budget to its stars' muscles — but lacks the cheesy fun.”
“...to the team as a PR stunt...”
“Unfortunately, nothing after that is as lovably ridiculous in this new paean to the 1990s Z-grade TV hit with David Hasselhoff and Pamela Anderson.”
“This Baywatch (** out of four; rated R; in theaters nationwide Thursday night) has its share of hilarious moments but never fully commits to the absurd, and even the cleverest jokes get so many callbacks, they’re beating a dead seahorse.”
“The comedy directed by Seth Gordon (Horrible Bosses) rests on the boulder shoulders of The Rock, who plays the old Hoff role of Baywatch honcho Mitch Buchannon.”
“Instead of just giving out random suntan-lotion rubdowns and helping the occasional victim of a bad wave, these lifeguards are part-time superheroes who take on fiery boat accidents, jewelry-stealing grifters and rampant drug dealing along their beloved Emerald Bay.”
“When a passerby asks Mitch if he’s Batman, our hero responds, “Sure, pal.”
“Just bigger.”
“And browner.”Zac Efron talks 'Baywatch' wipe-out: 'I just totally tripped'How did David Hasselhoff get his 'Baywatch' body?”
“Workouts with The Rock.”


"From the production budget to the muscles of the stars, this movie may be bigger than the original" Bay watch ", but it lacks vulgar fun."
__ As a PR stunt for the team... "
"Unfortunately, there is nothing more lovely and ridiculous than this new hymn, which is the lead singer of the 1990s z-class TV series, starring David Hasselhoff and Pamela Anderson."
"This Baywatch (quarter; Rated R; released in theaters across the country on Thursday night) has some funny moments, but it has never been fully involved in ridiculous things, and even the smartest jokes get so many echoes that they are beating a dead seahorse."
Seth Gordon's comedy on the shoulders of the stone is played by Becky Mitch Buchanan, who plays old Hoff
"These lifeguards don't just hand out sunscreen or help the victims of bad waves. They are part-time superheroes. They are responsible for fierce ship accidents, jewel stealing swindlers and rampant drug trade in the beloved feicui Bay area."
When a passer-by asked Mickey if he was Batman, our hero replied, "of course, friend."
"A little bigger."
"And Bronner." Zach Efron said of the sweeping away of "Bay watch": "I'm totally tripped." how did David Hasselhoff get his body? "
"Rock training"



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They’ve since gone at each other in song, with Tay’s “Bad Blood” and Katy’s “Swish Swish,” but the AI judge as softened up over the past year, openly wishing that they’d put their past differences aside.”
“It all started when Katy allegedly lured away three dancers from Taylor’s Red tour in 2013 to work on her Prismatic tour and Taylor vented about it to Rolling Stone, albeit not naming Katy directly.”
“I really want to clear the air” and “I’m deeply sorry.”Taylor made it clear she had accepted whatever else Katy had to say in her letter and now the pair’s long feud is over.”
“This means so much to me.” While only the start of the note can be seen, it appears to read “Hey Old Friend — I’ve been doing some reflecting on past miscommunications and hurt feelings between us.”
“She showed off a video off on social media and writing “Thank you Katy”, and saying “So, I just got to my dressing room and found this actual olive branch.”
“Tay shocked the world when on the opening night of her North American stadium tour on May 8, she revealed that Katy sent her a literal olive branch and a handwritten note.”
“The AI 2018 season finale is a two night affair starting on May 20, and Tay will be in between playing dates at Pasadena’s Rose Bowl and Santa Clara’s Levi’s Stadium.”
“It is an open door policy,” our insider adds.”
“As for when this amazing duet could happen, “If Taylor wanted to come this season for the finale since she has the night off she would be invited, and if she wanted to do it next year that would be fine as well.”
“She had mixed emotions at first, but realized how important their friendship can be because what they can do as a team instead of enemies,” a source close to Katy tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"They later attacked each other in their songs, Tay's" bad blood "and Katie's" whoosh, whoosh, "but AI judges have softened in the past year, openly hoping that they would put aside their past differences."
"It all started in 2013 when Katie lured three dancers from Taylor's red tour to her prism tour, and Taylor revealed it to rolling stone, although Katie was not named directly."
"I really want to clarify" and "I'm so sorry." Taylor made it clear that she had accepted everything Katie said in the letter, and now the long-term feud between the two is over
"It means a lot to me." Although I only saw the beginning of the note, it seemed to read "Hey, old friend, I've been reflecting on the past communication mistakes and the hurt feelings between us."
She showed a video on social media, wrote "thank you, Katie" and said "so, I just came to my dressing room and found this real olive branch."
"On May 8, on the opening night of the North American Stadium Tour, ty showed the world the olive branch and handwritten note sent by Katie, which shocked the world."
"Ai's 2018 season finale will be two nights from May 20, when Tay will be between the match dates at Pasadena's Rose Bowl and Santa Clara's Livy stadium."
"It's an open policy," our insiders added
"As for when this amazing duet will be on," if Taylor wants to come to the finals this season because she's off at night, she'll be invited, and if she wants to do so next year, that's fine
A source close to Katie told reporters: "she was in a mixed mood at first, but realized how important their friendship was because they could do something as a team rather than an enemy." Exclusive to Hollywood life



**Something goes wrong**
“Treat yourself, we hope she’s saying.”
“It’s not an unusual knock lobbed at Hadid and models of that ilk.”
“After posting a picture of her reflection while on vacation, she responded to a commenter that said she lost weight.”
““It’s called growing up,” she wrote.”
““I loved my body as a 17-year-old athlete and I love my body now.”
“Yes, I’ve lost some ‘baby fat,’ but muscle mass from my intensive volleyball training in high school has changed over the years into lean muscle from boxing, and work stress can have its affect [sic], but purposefully changing my body has never been my thing.”
“I still eat what I want, I’m still strong, and I’m still healthy.”
““Your comment won’t get me down,” she continued, “but next time, please think about the young women who may read body-judgement comments and judge themselves as they see their bodies growing and therefore naturally changing, too.”A year ago, the script was flipped.”
“Her detractors would cite her non-standard curves as evidence that she landed jobs due to her social-media following.”
“Blanca Padilla, a model who’s walked in the Victoria’s Secret Fashion Show, told Spanish show Al Rincón:Most of us have to conform to extreme measurements because otherwise we won’t book any jobs while others have the privilege to say that designers love them despite their curves.”


"Be kind to yourself, we hope she says so."
"For Hadid and similar models, it's not a rare blow."
"After posting a photo of her holiday, she replied to a comment that she had lost weight."
"It's called growth," she wrote
"I loved my body when I was 17, and I love my body now."
"Yes, I've lost some" little fat ", but the muscle group in high school volleyball training has changed from boxing to lean muscle over the years, and work pressure will also have an impact (SIC), but purposeful change of my body has never been my favorite."
"I still eat what I want, I'm still strong, I'm still healthy."
"Your comments won't disappoint me," she went on, "but next time, think about young women who might read reviews of body judgments and judge themselves when they see their bodies growing and therefore changing naturally." A year ago, the script was turned over
"Her critics will cite her nonstandard curve as evidence that she got a job because of social media attention."
Blanca Padilla, a model at Victoria's Secret Fashion Show, told Spanish fashion show al rinc 贸 n: most of us have to follow extreme standards of measurement because otherwise we won't book any work, while others are lucky to say that designers like them, even though their curves are good



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’re in it for the long haul?”
““Jamie and Katie have been talking at great length about having a child together,” a source for the magazine recently told the publication.”
“Looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, may be more serious than fans previously thought!”
“While the couple had kept their relationship hidden for years, the two stepped out as a duo just last year.”
“Since then, they’ve been spotted out and about together in public on multiple occasions — including making a big splash sitting side-by-side at Clive Davis’ pre-Grammy gala in NYC on Jan. 27.”
“From the photos, Katie and Jamie looked happier than ever, and a new report claims that could be because they’re FINALLY on the same page about wanting to start a family together!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Katie Holmes with her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“Although it reportedly took some time for Katie to be on board, she apparently feels ready to have a baby with her new man — at least according to Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s crazy about her and thinks they’ll have an adorable baby.” In fact, some witnesses at the gala last month allegedly think Katie could actually already be expecting.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — would you love to see Jamie and Katie have a child together?”


"Do you think they will be involved for a long time?"
"Jamie and Katie have been talking about having a child together," a source for the magazine recently told the publication
"It looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, may be more serious than fans thought before!"
"Although the couple have been hiding their relationship for years, just last year, they came out as a couple."
"Since then, they have been found together in public many times - including Clive Davis sitting side by side at the Grammy Awards in New York on January 27."
"From the photos, Katie and Jamie look happier than ever, and a new report says it may be that they have finally reached a consensus on how to form a family together!"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of Katie Holmes and her daughter Suri cruise."
"Although it was reported that it took Katie some time to get on the plane, she clearly felt ready to have a baby with her new boyfriend - at least according to life and fashion magazine."
"He was fascinated by her and thought they would have a lovely child." In fact, some witnesses at last month's party claimed that Katie might be pregnant
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - would you like to see Jamie and Katie have a baby together?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Everyone will, inevitably, remain worried until the final product appears onscreen, but perhaps we can rest just slightly in the meantime.”
“It’s also perhaps a reminder that those involved with this move love the mythology — and loved Fisher as a person — as much as anyone else, if not more so, and will be approaching it with the utmost care.”
“If nothing else there can t be that much extraneous unseen footage from 2015 s Star Wars The Force Awakens she was barely in that movie so unless large swaths of scenes were shot but never even hinted at by anyone involved in the production there s limited material to...”
“...draw from in the first place and surely not everything available will be used...”
“Considering the context of the footage, it also limits the potential use for Episode IX.”
“Leia appeared in few scenes and locations in The Force Awakens.”
“Leia was on Takodana, rescuing Han, Chewbacca, Rey and Finn, and then at the Resistance base on D’Qar, where she takes part in planning, and later monitoring, the attack on Starkiller Base.”
“Aside from brief interludes with Han and, later, Rey, she’s very much in “harried leader” mode throughout the movie.”
“Does this mean that this is the Leia we’ll see in Episode IX, even after losing her ex-husband, and then her brother, in the previous two movies?”
“(It’s possible that the Fisher footage will end up being just a minor flashback, used to punctuate a contemporary moment; memories during her funeral, as some on social media have already suggested.”


"Everyone will inevitably remain worried until the final product appears on the screen, but in the meantime, maybe we can take a break."
"It may also remind people that the people involved in this operation love myth as much as others - and Fisher as well - and that they will approach it very carefully if they don't love myth more."
"If there were nothing else, there would not be so many unseen scenes in star wars in 2015. The force awakened, and she hardly appeared in that film. So unless she shot a large scene, but no one involved in the production ever hinted, there would be only limited material
__ Draw from the beginning, of course, not all the available things will be used... "
"This also limits the potential use of Episode 9, given the background of the shot."
"Leia appears in a few scenes and locations of the force awakening."
"Leia rescued Han, Chewbacca, ray and Finn in tacodana, and then at the resistance base in degar, where she participated in the planning of the attack on the interstellar killer base and later monitored it."
"Except for the short interlude with Han Han and later ray, she is in a very" irritable leadership "state throughout the film."
"Does that mean that this is Leia we're going to see in Episode 9, even in the first two movies, she lost her ex husband and then her brother?"
"(it's possible that Fisher's lens turns out to be a little flashback, punctuating a contemporary moment; memories of her funeral, as some on social media have suggested."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Then his facial features suddenly changed.”
“Cheek fillers Keith’s face started to look unhealthy and we could see sunken cheeks.”
“There were:laugh lines and wrinkles around his cheek and jaw area;visible lines on his forehead;heavy eye bags.”
“He didn’t look young and fresh anymore but now we see that his face totally changed.”
“All of the years of having drug problems including cocaine, ecstasy and alcohol addiction would have done enormous damage to Keith’s skin.”
“So using drugs has effected on Keith’s looks.”
“He got some treatment in the care center in Nashville.”
“He was struggling with the addiction for years since he decided to leave the habit in 1998.”
“It led him to using the cocaine and he became addicted to it.”
“Urban was suffering from several ups and downs during his early years.”


"Then his features suddenly changed."
"Keith's face is starting to get unhealthy, and we can see the sunken cheeks."
"There are: smile line, wrinkles around the cheek and chin; obvious wrinkles on the forehead; heavy bags under the eyes."
"He no longer looks young and fresh, but now we see his face completely changed."
"All these years of drug problems, including cocaine, ecstasy and alcohol addiction, will do great harm to Keith's skin."
"So the drugs affected Keith's appearance."
"He was treated at a care center in Nashville."
"He has been fighting drug addiction for several years since he decided to quit in 1998."
"It led him to cocaine and made him addicted."
"There were ups and downs in his early years."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She must be terrified she’ll never find love again!” Photo credit: Mega...”
“It’s really sad, because it’s backfired and ended in total disaster.”
“As a result, they claim, the diva is now looking “terrible” and totally different from just a year ago.”
“The 50-year-old star underwent the makeovers in an attempt to turn a new page in her life since her hubby of 21 years, manager René Angélil, died of cancer in 2016 at 73.”
““She totally lost her looks,” said one shocked source, “and is unrecognizable.”
“The word is she went under the knife to try and give herself a fresh start.”
“But whatever she s done it clearly hasn t turned out very well Celine Dion s Plastic Surgery Disaster 1 of 3 Close gallery 1 of 3 Boston plastic surgeon Dr Dave David who hasn t treated the songstress notes the changes are so drastic he wouldn t recognize her...”
“...now adding She looks terrible haggard and homely He believes that Celine has had a nose job Botox in the upper lip fillers in her cheeks and under the eyes and had her eyebrows thinned and lightened...”
“Photo credit: Mega 2 of 3 “She got rid of the gummy smile,” added Dr. David.”
““Her teeth look better.”


"She must be afraid that she will never find love again! "Image source: Mega..."
"It's really sad, because it didn't work out as expected and eventually led to a disaster."
As a result, they claim, the heroine now looks "terrible," totally different from a year ago
"The 50 year old star has gone through this transformation, trying to turn a new page in her life, as her 21-year-old husband and manager Ren 茅 ang 茅 lil died of cancer in 2016 at the age of 73."
"She's completely lost her face, completely unrecognized," said a shocked source
"It's said that she had a knife and wanted to give herself a new start."
"But no matter what she did, the result was not very good. Celine Dion's plastic surgery disaster closed one third of the gallery. Boston plastic surgeon Dr. Dave David did not treat the singer. He noticed that the change was so dramatic that he could not recognize her..."
__ Now he added that she looked very haggard and simple. He thought Celine had done nose shaping and Botox injection on the upper lip filler under her cheeks and eyes, and her eyebrows became thinner and brighter... "
"Photo source: 2 of 3," Dr. David added. "She's got rid of the gel smile."
"Her teeth look much better."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See Loop's video taken November 30, 2017, at Rihanna Drive in Barbados, with Rihanna's speech below:”
“Freundel Stuart intervened hastily and shocked parents removed their children.”
“In a video being circulated which is entitled Rihanna If Jesus Hasn t Answered Your Prayers Try Satan published December 2 2017 on the World News Today YouTube Channel a scripted voice says that Rihanna told the audience that growing up in Bridgetown was not easy and that you have...”
“...to work twice as hard to make it...”
“And the British anonymous voice went on to say that she said:"You have to hustle.”
“I’m still hustling, but I am living proof that you can do anything...”
“If you came here for tips I can give y’all the biggest one straight off..."If y'all have prayed to Jesus for years, prayed with all your hearts and got nothing back from him?”
“... Jesus doesn't care about you.”
“Do you really even think he even listening?”
“Hot tip y'all because you are my people, be efficient, go to satan."”


"See the video taken by loop on November 30, 2017 at Rihanna Avenue in Barbados. Rihanna's speech is as follows:
"Flanders Stewart stepped in and the shocked parents took the child away."
"In a video entitled try Satan if Jesus doesn't respond to your prayers released on world news today on YouTube on December 2, 2017, a voice in a script says that Rihanna tells the audience that it's not easy to grow up in Bridgetown, and you've already..."
__ Redouble your efforts to achieve it... "
The voice of the British anonymous went on, saying, "you have to hurry."
"I'm still busy, but I'm a living proof that you can do anything..."
"If you come here for tips, I can give you the biggest one directly..." If you all prayed to Jesus for many years, with all your heart and soul, and got nothing in return from him? "
"... Jesus doesn't care about you."
"Do you really think he's listening?"
"I'll tip you, because you are my people. To be efficient, go to Satan."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It just involves effort, and most people can’t be bothered to put the effort in.””
“The Good Time actor explained that he chooses to stay private so people don’t form ideas about his personality that may later change and label him as dishonest.”
“The actor appears on the September cover of GQ where he explained why he chooses to stay very quiet when it comes to his private life.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I always think the risk reward is very much weighted in the wrong direction,” Pattinson, 31, said of opening up in interviews.”
““If I could stay silent, I would.”Pattinson has been dating singer F.K.A.”
“Twigs since 2014, and recently told Howard Stern they were “kind of” engaged.”
“But when asked by GQ if he was getting married the actor who revealed he calls his girlfriend Twigs responded with a noncommittal eh Image zoom Credit Daniel Jackson GQ Pattinson said that he went to therapy a few years ago and his therapist commented that he was good at...”
“...talking without saying anything He said he uses that skill in all his interviews...”
““I want to be misunderstood,” he told the magazine after declining to talk about anything personal.”


"It just takes effort, and most people are too lazy to put in effort."
"The good actor explained that he chose to keep his privacy so that people would not form an idea of his personality, which might change in the future and label him dishonest."
"The actor appeared on the cover of GQ in September and explained why he chose to remain silent in his private life."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've always thought that risk reward is largely wrong," Pattinson, 31, said of his openness in the interview
"If I could keep silent, I would." Pattinson has been dating singer f.k.a
"Starting in 2014, twigs recently told Howard Stern that they were" a little bit "engaged."
"But when GQ asked him if he was going to get married, the actor, who revealed that he called his girlfriend twigs, replied that Daniel Jackson GQ Pattinson said he had been treated a few years ago and his therapist said he was good at..."
__︹ He doesn't say anything, he uses this technique in all interviews... "
"I want to be misunderstood," he told the magazine after refusing to talk about any personal topics



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWould you read Brad Pitt's tell-all?”
“The actor, who has been making headlines lately for his rapid weight loss, is said to be writing a tell-all -- and he's already 300 pages in!”
“Click through to learn more about Brad's alleged memoir.”
“Sources tell Life & Style, "Brad has been writing about his journey and finding it therapeutic.”
“He's completed almost 300 pages.”
“And he's been very blunt in describing what led to the breakdown of his marriage."”
“Article continues below advertisementThe insider continues, "Angie's concerned about Brad releasing his writings as a tell-all book because of the impact it could have on their kids."”
“But the snitch insists the A-Lister "isn't interested in taking down Angie."”
“"He largely blames his own emotional baggage and drinking for their problems, and he's offered to let Angie read what he's written," the source says, adding that Brad's intentions are "to help others going through similar issues."”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
Photo source: background can you read Brad Pitt's tell it all? "
The actor recently made the headlines for losing weight quickly. It is said that he is writing an easy to understand article, which has 300 pages! "
"Click here to learn about Brad's so-called memoirs."
"The source tells life and style," Brad has been writing about his journey and finding it therapeutic
"He has finished nearly 300 pages."
"He bluntly described the cause of the breakdown of his marriage."
"Angie is worried that Brad will publish his work as a book for everyone, because it may have an impact on their children," the person familiar with the matter continued
But whistleblowers insist that first-line stars "have no interest in killing Angie."
"He largely attributed their problems to his emotional baggage and alcoholism, and he volunteered to ask Angie to read what he wrote," the source said, adding that Brad's intention was "to help other people who experience similar problems."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“The insider added, “Everybody thinks Scott still loves Kourtney, but he’s no good for her and she’s moved on—and there’s no doubting that Scott isn’t happy about it.”
“Younes Bendjima and Scott Disick reportedly met at the Kardashian Christmas Party & let’s just say, they prob won’t sit next to each other at XMas dinner.”
“Kourtney Kardashian‘s ex and current boyfriend finally came face-to-face at Kris Jenner‘s annual Christmas Eve party and according to sources, it was NOT all merry and bright!”
“Younes Bendjima, 24, attended his first ever Kardashian Christmas party with Kourt, 38, and was inevitably introduced to his GF’s baby-daddy and ex, Scott Disick.”
“A source close to the Kardashian gamily told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY Scott was under strict orders to be on his best behavior at the party and to not cause any trouble with Younes and he managed to walk the line...”
“...just...”
“There was a definite tension in the air when Kourtney introduced them to each other but Scott and Younes shook hands and exchanged some pretty awkward pleasantries and that was that Sounds civil but there s no way Scott was...”
“...pleased when Kourtney started planting kisses on Younes in the infamous Kardashian photobooth and documenting them on her Snap...”
“Regardless of how badly he s treated her in the past Scott always had this fantasy in his head that he could click his fingers and Kourtney would come running However they said there s no chance Kourtney is coming...”


"Let us know!"
"Everyone thinks Scott still loves Courtney, but he's not nice to her, she's gone, and there's no doubt Scott isn't happy about it," the source added
"It's reported that yones benjima and Scott Disick met at Kardashian's Christmas party & we can say they may not be sitting together at Christmas dinner."
"Kurtany Kardashian's ex boyfriend and current boyfriend finally meet at Chris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party. According to the source, the party is not all fun and light!"
"Yones benjima, 24, and Kurt, 38, attended his first ever Kardashian style Christmas party and were inevitably introduced to his girlfriend's little father and ex girlfriend Scott Disick."
"A source close to Kardashian garmili told Hollywood life.com that Scott was strictly ordered at the party to be the best and not to cause trouble for yones. He successfully reached the bottom line..."
__ It's just
"When Courtney introduced them to each other, there was a real tension in the air, but Scott and younes shook hands and exchanged some rather embarrassing greetings, which sounded polite, but Scott couldn't..."
__︹ When Courtney started kissing Eunice in the infamous Kardashian studio and recording it on her snapshot, she was very happy... "
"No matter how bad he was to her in the past, Scott always had such an illusion in his mind that he could press his finger and Courtney would come, but they said Courtney couldn't come..."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The news of Kylie’s pregnancy broke in September 2017.”
“Per the alleged contract, Travis cannot date (or impregnate) anyone else, the mag claims.”
“Kris allegedly drafted up a iron clad contract with strict rules Travis has to follow!”
“Kris Jenner, 62, is the ultimate momager!”
“The Kardashian/Jenner matriarch allegedly gave Travis Scott, 25, a massive pay day — aka $4 million — to stick around after Kylie Jenner, 20, gave birth to their baby daughter, Stormi Webster on February 1, according to Star magazine.”
““Kris doesn’t trust Travis to be there fore Kylie — not without a cash incentive, anyway,” a source tells the mag.”
“Kris allegedly put the cash plan into action when Travis was caught at a strip club back in December 2017.”
“At the time, “Kris asked him point-blank if he was going to be there for kylie, and he wouldn’t give her an answer,” the insider admits.”
““So, she made him an offer he couldn’t refuse.”The site goes on to report that Kris then drafted up a “contract” with some pretty strict rules for Kylie’s baby daddy.”
“And, the rapper reportedly must spend a certain amount of hours a week with Stormi and Kylie, who apparently has no idea her mother took these drastic measure, according to the source.”


"The news of Kelly's pregnancy came out in September 2017."
"Under the so-called contract, Travis can't date (or get pregnant) anyone," the magazine claims
"Chris is said to have drafted a firm contract and Travis has to abide by strict rules!"
"Chris Jenner, 62, is the ultimate mother!"
Kelly Jenner, 20, gave birth to their youngest daughter, Tommy Webster, on February 1. Kardashian / Jenner's head of family is said to have given Travis Scott, 25, a big payday, or $4 million, according to star magazine
"Chris doesn't believe Travis will come before Kelly - no cash reward, anyway," a source told the magazine
"Chris is said to have implemented a cash plan when Travis was arrested at a strip club in December 2017."
"At the time," Chris asked directly if he would go for Kelly, and he didn't want to give her an answer, "the person admitted
"So she made him an offer he couldn't refuse." The website continues to report that Chris then drafted a "contract" with some pretty strict rules for Kelly's baby dad
According to reports, rappers have to spend a certain amount of time each week with Tommy and Kelly, who apparently didn't know her mother had taken these tough measures, according to the source



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““Bey and Jay’s entourage just got a hell of lot bigger, thanks to the twins, but they have the cash to do it.”We pay for juicy info!”
“Surprisingly, adding almost two-dozen extra employees to Beyonce, 35, and 47-year-old Jay-Z’s already sizeable staff is absolutely no problem for the devoted parents, who just moved into a $25 million Malibu mansion.”
““They’ve also employed an expert to establish social media names and tags for the babies,” added the insider.”
“Rumi and Sir “even have a financial investment advisor working for them, setting up trademarks and trusts in the babies’ names,” continued the insider.”
““This includes additional security, upgraded bullet-proof vehicles, six nannies, two maids, and a 24/7 rotating team of nurses,” an insider told Radar.”
“RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal that the music power couple have added another 18 new people to the payroll now that their son Sir and daughter Rumi have joined their big sister Blue Ivy at home.”
“Money’s no object when it comes to Beyonce and Jay-Z’s newborn twins!”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Beyonce & Jay-Z Hire 18 New Employees After Twins Sir and Rumi's Arrival Newborns now have six nannies, two maids and more!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Bay and Jay's entourage just got a lot older, thanks to the twins, but they have enough cash to do it." We pay for interesting information! "
"It's amazing that Beyonce, 35, and Jay-Z, 47, already have considerable staff, plus nearly 20 additional staff, which is absolutely no problem for enthusiastic parents who have just moved into the $25 million Malibu mansion."
"They also hired an expert to create social media names and labels for the babies," the person added
"Mr. rumihe" even has a financial investment consultant working for them to set up trademarks and trust funds in the name of babies, "the source continued
"This includes additional security measures, upgraded bulletproof cars, six nannies, two maids, and a team of nurses who rotate around the clock," an insider told radar
_ RadarOnline.com We can exclusively reveal that as their son Mr. Rumi and daughter Mr. Rumi have joined their elder sister blue Ivy at home, the couple has added 18 new people. "
"When it comes to Beyonce and Jay's twins, money is not a problem!"
"Click to share on twitter (open in a new window) Click to share on Facebook (open in a new window) Beyonce and Jay-Z have 18 new employees, because twin Sir and Rumi's newborn now has six nannies, two maids and more!"



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Do you think Jamie and Katie will make it official by the end of the year?”
“In an OK!”
“...exclusive, sources reveal that Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx, who have been low-key dating for four and a half years now, are set to finally make it official and get married!”
“The two have kept their love secret for so long, but a recent outing in Malibu has shifted things for the former Dawson’s Creek star.”
“"They had some struggles after they decided to go public,” explained an insider.”
“It changed the dynamic of their relationship and briefly shook Katie s identity as a proud single mom who didn t need a man Now after Jamie has done everything he possibly can to show her he s in it for the long haul she s finally agreed to say...”
“I Do according to the insider...”
“Article continues below advertisementSo what are the details regarding their possible nuptials?”
“"There’s talk of a small, intimate ceremony, but of course they want to make sure whatever they do goes off without a hitch,” claimed the insider.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Do you think Jamie and Katie will sign up by the end of this year?"
"All right!"
__︹ According to an exclusive source, Katie Holmes and Jamie fox have been dating for four and a half years and are finally getting married! "
"Their love has been kept secret for so long, but a recent trip to Malibu has changed the life of the former Dawson Crick star."
"They struggled a bit after deciding to go public," one insider explained
"It changed the dynamics of their relationship and briefly shook Katie's identity as a proud single mother. She doesn't need a man now, because Jamie has done everything possible to show her his position in this long relationship, and she finally agreed to say..."
"According to people familiar with the matter, I know..."
What are the details of their possible wedding
"Some people say it's going to be a small, intimate ceremony, but of course they want to make sure that everything they do goes smoothly," said the person familiar with the matter



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“I don't think it works out," she quipped, telling Williams that she could not envision Markle walking the same halls as the queen: "I just don't know if I can see her waffling around the Buckingham palace!"”
“And in my dream that, for me, just no.”
“And I know my prince really well.”
“"But I know my prince, alright?”
“I don't know!"”
“"I don't know.”
“"I don't know," she gasped, before expressing her suspicious that Harry-Meghan is somehow not... real..."I still don't know if I believe [that they're in a relationship]," Ora said.”
“When asked by Wendy if she thought the prince and the American television actress may eventually get married, Ora seemed bewildered by the possibility.”
“...was brought up...”


Watch below:
"I don't think it's possible," she joked, telling Williams that she couldn't imagine Marcel walking in the same hall as the queen. "I just don't know if I can see her babbling in Buckingham Palace!"
"In my dream, for me, it's just not."
"I know my prince very well."
"But I know my prince, OK? __
"I don't know!"
"I don't know."
"I don't know," she gasped, then doubted that Harry Megan was somehow not... Really "I still don't know if I believe (they're in love)," Ola said
When Wendy asked her if she thought the prince and the American TV actress would eventually get married, ora seemed confused about the possibility
__ Raised... "



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : Brad Pitt ‘threatened to kill Harvey Weinstein’, claims Gwyneth PaltrowMORE : Jennifer Aniston enjoys post-break up night out with Ellen DeGeneres and Courteney Cox...”
“‘Angelina has been in London and is free to travel for shorter periods of time.”
“But it seems that, nearly two years after confirming their split, negotiations about their children are still being decided on.”
“And, according to E!”
“News, things have stalled over the Changeling actress wanting to bring their kids – Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox – to London while she films for Maleficent 2.”
“Angelina wants to take her six children to the UK (Picture: Getty)‘The latest issue is that Angelina wants to film in Europe for months and take all six kids with her for the duration of the shoot,’ an insider told the publication.”
“‘Brad is opposed to that and is blocking it from happening.”
“Brad will be filming in L.A. for the summer and wants to see the kids on his regular custody schedule.’AdvertisementAdvertisementThe source revealed both Brad, 54, and Angelina have been left frustrated by the situation.”
“‘He’s not OK with his kids being away for months,’ they added.”
“‘He feels that Los Angeles is their home base and this is where it is best for them to be.”


"More: Brad Pitt 'threatens to kill Harvey Weinstein', Gwyneth paltromer claims: Jennifer Aniston likes to date Alan DeGeneres and Courtney Cox on the night after their breakup..."
"Angelina has been in London and can travel freely for a shorter time."
"But it seems that nearly two years after confirming the breakup, negotiations on the children are still in the process of being decided."
"And, according to e!"
"It's said that the changeling actress wants to take their children - Maddox, parks, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivian and Knox - to London, but she's filming for maleficent 2, and it's stalled."
"Angelina wants to take her six children to the UK (photo source: Getty)" "the latest issue is Angelina wants to make a movie in Europe for a few months, with all six children during the filming."
"Brad objected to this and prevented it from happening."
"Brad will be filming in Los Angeles this summer and he wants to see the children on the regular custody schedule." Both Brad and Angelina, 54, are disappointed with the situation, according to sources
They also said that he was uncomfortable when the children were not at home for months
"He thinks Los Angeles is their base, it's their best place."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt is also revving up his acting career: He signed on alongside Leonardo DiCaprio for Quentin Tarantino’s upcoming (and controversial) film Once Upon a Time in Hollywood, about the 1969 Manson Family murders.”
“Image zoom Credit: Tim P. Whitby/Getty; Jacopo Raule/GettyBrad Pitt and Neri Oxman.”
“Does Brad Pitt have a new woman in his life?”
“The actor, 54, has been spending time with Neri Oxman, an architect and professor of media arts and sciences at the MIT Media Lab, according to Page Six TV.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Pitt and Oxman connected over their shared love of design and architecture, and their relationship “is best described as a professional friendship,” a source told the outlet.”
“While the source said the friendship is not romantic in nature, Pitt is “interested in spending more time” with Oxman.”
“A rep for the actor declined to comment to PageSix, but a friend of Pitt’s told the outlet that the two are “just friends.”The duo reportedly met through an MIT architecture project.”
“While the nature of the project is unknown, Pitt is a noted architecture enthusiast and founded the Make It Right Foundation, which builds affordable and environmentally friendly homes in New Orleans for people in need.”
“Oxman is an award-winning architect of American-Israeli decent.”


"Pete is also accelerating his acting career: he signed up with Leonardo DiCaprio for Quentin Tarantino's upcoming Hollywood film" once upon a time, "about the Mansons' murder in 1969
"Image zooming: Tim P. Whitby / Getty; Jacob Raul / Getty; Brad Pitt and nery Oxman."
"Is there a new woman in Brad Pitt's life?"
According to the TV report on page 6, the 54 year old actor has been with Neri Oxman, architect and professor of media art and science at MIT's Media Lab
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Pitt and Oxman are linked by their shared love of design and architecture, and their relationship" is best described as a professional friendship, "one source told the media
Although the source said the friendship was not romantic in nature, Pitt was "interested in spending more time" with Oxman
A representative of the actor declined to comment on page 6, but a friend of Pitt told the media that the two were "just friends.". According to reports, the two met through a construction project at MIT
"Although the nature of the project is not known, Pete is a well-known construction enthusiast and has set up the make it right foundation to build affordable green homes in New Orleans for those in need."
"Oxman is an award-winning architect of American architecture."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...a new case against the 2 women...”
“In the end the judge bought the argument that Kim and Kris did not interfere with Chyna s contract with E but did give Chyna the right to a second bite of the apple where she could try and create...”
“...contract, saying Chyna was only in negotiations with the network and didn't have an enforceable contract.”
“The judge scoffed at Chyna's claim that the Kardashians interfered with her E!”
“...wouldn't do a show where the woman is a bad mother!”
“The judge confessed he didn't watch the show, but said it's hard to imagine E!”
“...dropped "Rob & Chyna" because the Kardashians painted her as a bad mother.”
“The best part ... the judge reacted to Chyna's claim that E!”
“Holley was gunning for the judge to get her clients dismissed from the case, and the judge saw her point.”
“Chyna's lawyer, Lisa Bloom, squared off in court Thursday with Kardashian lawyer Shawn Holley.”


__ These two women's new cases... "
"In the end, the judge accepted the argument that Kim and Chris did not interfere in Zina's contract with E, but did give Zina the right to take a second bite of apple, where she could try to create..."
__ Contract, saying that Chyna is just negotiating with the Internet, there is no executable contract. "
The judge scoffed at Gina's claim that the kardashians had interfered with her! "
__ Not being a woman is a bad mother's show
"The judge admitted that he didn't watch the show, but said it's hard to imagine him doing so!"
__ Because the kardashians described her as a bad mother, they gave up rob and Gina. "
"The best part... The judge responded to Mr. chener's charges by saying "E!"
Holly urged the judge to dismiss her client's lawsuit, and the judge understood what she meant
"Gina's lawyer, Lisa bloom, reached a settlement with Kardashian's lawyer, Sean holly, in court on Thursday."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Justin Timberlake split with Jessica Biel in the spring of 2011 and by December of the same year they were engaged.”
“So, what if Jenn got back together with Brad Pitt?”
“They announced plans to divorce after being married for more than 2 years.”
“The former couple revealed they split up at the end of 2017 and that the separation was ‘mutual and loving.’They plan to remain best friends.”
“The normally private pair decided to break the news of their break-up with a statement from their publicist.”
““Normally we would do this privately, but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent, we wanted to convey the truth directly.”Jennifer Aniston is one of those celebs that people pull for.”
“She’s low key, low scandal, seemingly low maintenance.”
“We want her to find everlasting love.”
“They were Hollywood’s it couple when they married in July 2000, but the relationship ended 5-years-later when Aniston filed for divorce.”
“Plus, singer Pink and her husband Carey Hart separated after two years of marriage, but never divorced and rekindled their relationship a year later.”


"Justin Timberlake and Jessica bell broke up in the spring of 2011 and got engaged in December of the same year."
"So what if Jan and Brad Pitt get back together?"
"They announced plans for divorce after more than two years of marriage."
"The former couple revealed that they broke up at the end of 2017, that their separation was' mutual and loving 'and that they planned to continue their best friend relationship."
"The couple, who are usually in private, decided to break up with a statement from a public relations officer."
"Normally, we do it in private, but as the gossip industry can't resist the chance of speculation and invention, we want to convey the truth directly." Jennifer Aniston is one of the celebrities that people like
"She has a low profile, few scandals, and seems to have a low maintenance fee."
"We want her to find eternal love."
"They were it couples in Hollywood when they got married in July 2000, but their relationship ended five years later when Aniston filed for divorce."
"In addition, singer Pinker and her husband, Kelly Hart, separated after two years of marriage, but never divorced. A year later, they resumed their relationship."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read on to find out more about the powerhouse model.”
“Since then, she's strutted for major fashion houses like Victoria's Secret, appeared on the cover of Vogue and in commercials for Estee Lauder.”
“Kendall Jenner, the daughter of Kris Kardashian and Caitlyn Jenner, made her first major runway appearance for Marc Jacobs in 2014.”
“And while Kim (and more recently, Kylie) breaking the internet is an almost daily occurrence, one member of the family is quietly slaying the fashion industry.”
“The Kardashian-Jenners pretty much dominate the entertainment news cycle.”
“The Untold Truth Of Kendall JennerIf you haven't heard of the Kardashian family by now, please stop everything you're doing and reevaluate your life.”


"Please read on to learn more about the power station model."
"Since then, she has been swaggering around in major fashion companies, such as Victoria's secret, on the cover of fashion magazine and in Estee Lauder's commercials."
"Kendall Jenner, daughter of Chris Kardashian and Caitlin Jenner, made his debut on the runway for mark Jacobs in 2014."
"Although Kim (and, more recently, Kylie) destroys the internet almost every day, a member of the family is quietly strangling the fashion industry."
"The Kardashian Jenner couple almost dominated the entertainment news."
"The secret truth of Kendall Jannell. If you haven't heard of the kardashians yet, please stop what you are doing and reassess your life."



**Something goes wrong**
“Diana FalzoneMore Kim Kardashian and Beyonce Feud...”
“There is a strong chance a friend will be lost.”
“Remember, if a friend is happy with their new significant other, don’t hate.”
“If they take off their judgmental glasses, they may even come to like her or at least tolerate her in their group.”
“Although Jay-Z and Beyonce have preconceived notions of what Kim and the Kardashians are all about, they do not actually know who Kim is.”
“If his friends continue to snub her, then the rap star will have to distance himself from his friends until they realize he and Kim are a package deal.”
“He must let it be known that high school bully behavior toward his girlfriend is unacceptable.”
“It will be Kanye’s responsibility to lay the law down with his buddies.”
“Unfortunately, Kim cannot make Kanye’s friends like her.”
“Since Jay and Kanye are not only music collaborators but close friends, will “Kimye” stand a chance?”


"Diana fazonemore King Kardashian and Beyonce..."
"There's a good chance of losing a friend."
"Remember, if a friend is happy with their new and important partner, don't hate them."
"If they take off their critical glasses, they may even like her, or at least tolerate her in their team."
"Although Jay-Z and Beyonce have preconceptions about Kim Jong Il and everything in the Kardashian family, they actually don't know who Kim Jong Il is."
"If his friends continue to ignore her, the rap star will have to keep a distance from his friends until they realize that he and Kim are a package deal."
"He has to let everyone know that bullying his girlfriend in high school is not acceptable."
"Kanye has a responsibility to make laws with his partners."
"Unfortunately, Kim can't make kenye's friends like she does."
"Since Jay Chou and Kanye are not only music collaborators, but also close friends, will golden leaf have a chance?"



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We cannot look at Syria, and the evil that has arisen from the ashes of indecision, and think this is not the lowest point in the world's inability to protect and defend the innocent," said Jolie at the United Nations.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Privacy PolicyJolie has made 11 visits to Syrian refugees in the region since 2011, and this year even took her daughter Shiloh to visit a camp in southeastern Turkey, according to The Daily Mail.”
““She also urged council members to visit Syrian refugees and see the crisis for themselves.”Get the Monitor Stories you care about delivered to your inbox.”
“In April, Jolie criticized the UN Security Council for its inaction over the conflict, imploring the foreign minister of each of the 15 council member countries come to the table to negotiate a political solution, reported The Associated Press.”
“While much of the world didn’t come to pay attention to the ongoing crisis until this summer as headlines of European border struggles came to light, the celebrity has been pleading with political leaders to provide more aid for years.”
“...according to the UN”
“Once the adoption is finalized the source added It could take at least another four to five months before the child is brought to the United States Jolie was appointed to her role as special envoy for refugees in 2012 having served as a goodwill ambassador for several years prior...”
““Going from six children to nine was just way too much, and Brad was concerned about how it would impact their other kids.”Representatives for the actors have not responded to outlets’ requests for comment, according to The Daily Mail.”
““Angie wanted to adopt all three, but when she got back to the United States, and told Brad about it, he said no,” the source said.”
“The longtime Hollywood actors are already parents to six kids: three biological children, including eight-year-old Shiloh and six-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne, and three who were adopted, 13-year-old Maddox from Cambodia, 11-year-old Pax from Vietnam, and 10-year-old Zahara from Ethiopia.”


"We can't look at Syria and the evil in the ashes of indecision and think that this is not the lowest point in the world where there is no ability to protect and defend the innocent," said Julie of the United Nations
According to the daily mail, "by signing the contract, you agree to our privacy policy. Julie has visited Syrian refugees in the region 11 times since 2011. This year, she even took her daughter Shiloh to visit a refugee camp in southeast Turkey."
"She also urged Council members to visit Syrian refugees and see the crisis for themselves." Send the reports you care about to your in box
In April, Julie criticized the UN Security Council for inaction on the issue of the conflict and urged the foreign ministers of each of the 15 members of the Security Council to come to negotiate a political solution, AP reported
"Although many countries around the world didn't begin to pay attention to the ongoing crisis until the headlines of the European border struggle came out this summer, the celebrity has been pleading with political leaders for years to provide more assistance."
__ According to the United Nations
"Once the adoption is finalized, the source added that it will take at least four to five months for the child to be brought to the United States. Julie was appointed as a special envoy for refugees in 2012, and she served as a goodwill ambassador several years ago..."
"It's too much to go from six kids to nine kids, and Brad is worried about what it will do to other kids." According to the daily mail, representatives of the actors have yet to respond to requests for comment
"Angie wanted to adopt the three children, but when she came back to the United States and told Brad about it, he said no," the source said
"These Hollywood veteran actors are parents of six children: three biological children, including 8-year-old Shiloh and 6-year-old twins Knox and Vivian, and three adopted children, 13-year-old Maddox from Cambodia, 11-year-old parks from Vietnam, and 10-year-old Zahara from Ethiopia."



**Something goes wrong**
“The relationship started after Cruise split from actress Penelope Cruz, and Holmes and actor Chris Klein called off their long-standing engagement.”
“The two have faced repeated rumors of marriage.”
“He and 26-year-old Holmes went public with their romantic relationship in April.”
“Cruise, 42, was in Paris to promote the French release of the Steven Spielberg film "War of the Worlds" next month.”
“It's Paris, it's a beautiful city, it's very romantic."”
“Asked why he chose the famed Paris landmark, he said: "I've never been to the Eiffel Tower.”
“"Today is a magnificent day for me, I'm engaged to a magnificent woman."”
“"It was early this morning at the Eiffel Tower, so I haven't slept at all," he said.”
“The couple often shared smiles as Cruise turned to look at her, with a massive diamond ring on her finger.”
“Cruise, speaking at a Paris news conference with Holmes, said: "Yes, I proposed to her."”


After cruise broke up with actress Penelope Cruz, Holmes and actor Chris Klein canceled their long-term engagement
"The two have faced rumors of marriage many times."
"He and Sherlock Holmes, 26, made their relationship public in April."
Cruise, 42, is in Paris promoting Steven Spielberg's French film "World War" next month
"This is Paris, this is a beautiful city, very romantic."
Asked why he chose the famous landmark of Paris, he said: "I've never been to the Eiffel Tower."
"Today is a good day for me. I'm engaged to a good woman."
"I didn't sleep at all at the Eiffel Tower this morning," he said
"When cruise turns to look at her with a huge diamond ring on his finger, the couple often smile
"Yes, I proposed to her," cruise said at a press conference with Holmes in Paris



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tristan and his mother were there to celebrate.”
“The celebration was had a pink theme, respectively, and was filled with lavish flowers and table settings.”
“Check out this conversation between the two that has fans buzzing!”
“We always knew Andy Cohen, 49, was great friends with the Kardashian family.”
“However, we didn’t know they were so close that Khloe Kardashian, 33, would name her first child after the Bravo host!”
“Well, it’s a joke, but a clever joke at that, that had fans in a tizzy during a Twitter exchange on April 8.”
““Can’t wait to meet baby Andy!”
“(That’s the name right?!”
“),” Andy tweeted at Khloe while discussing The Real Housewives of Atlanta.”
““I mean, I was going to surprise you but you guessed her name,” Khloe replied, clearly joking that she’s already planned to name her baby after Andy.”


"Tristan and his mother are there to celebrate."
The celebrations were pink themed with luxurious flowers and dining tables
"Look at the conversation between the two fans
"We always know that Andy Cohen, 49, is a good friend of the kardashians."
"However, we didn't know they were so close that Khloe Kardashian, 33, would name her first child after the Bravo host!"
"Well, it's a joke, but it's a smart joke, and in a twitter conversation on April 8, fans were excited."
"Can't wait to see baby Andy!"
"That's the name, right?"
Andy tweeted in Khloe when he was talking about real housewives in Atlanta
"I mean, I wanted to surprise you, but you guessed her name," Chloe replied, apparently joking that she had planned to name the child after Andy



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2080536912751678
Correct number is  31
Total number is  149
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ clear
